<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89203-0031 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-03-89.f2.A1030</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 54, No. 21 / Thursday, February 2, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Health Care Financing Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">42 CFR Parts 405, 442, 447, 483, 488, 489, and 498 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[BERC-396-FC] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Medicare and Medicaid; Requirements for Long Term Care Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA), HHS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule with comment period.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>These final regulations with comment period revise andconsolidate the requirements that facilities furnishing long term careare required to meet to participate in both the Medicare and Medicaid programs.They contain revisions to our proposal of October 16, 1987 (52 FR 38582)based on comments submitted by the public. Long term care facilities include both skilled nursing facilities (SNFs)and intermediate care facilities (ICFs) and, as of October 1, 1990, nursingfacilities (NF) created by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987(OBRA '87). Under these regulations, one set of requirements replaces theexisting separate ones for SNFs participating in the Medicare program,and for SNFs and ICFs participating in the Medicare program. (After October1, 1990, SNFs, and ICFs participating in the Medicaid program will be knownas nursing facilities (NFs).) Although some essential distinctions imposedby the statute remain, these new requirements reflect common needs in SNFsand ICFs. These regulations do not apply to ICFs for the mentally retardedor persons with related conditions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2><T3>Effective Date: </T3>These regulations are effective August 1, 1989,except when specified otherwise. State agencies have until 90 days afterreceipt of a revised State plan preprint to submit their plan amendmentsand required attachments. We will not hold a State to be out of compliancewith the requirements of these final regulations if it submits the necessaryplan material by that date. <T3>Comment Date: </T3>To be considered, comments must be mailed or deliveredto the appropriate address, as provided below, and must be received by5:00 p.m. on May 3, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Mail comments to the following address: <ITAG tagnum="15">Health Care Financing Administration, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Department of Health and Human Services, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Attention: BERC-396-FC, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">P.O. Box 26676, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Baltimore, Maryland 21207. </ITAG>If you prefer, you may deliver your comments to one of the following addresses:<ITAG tagnum="15">Room 309-G, Hubert H. Humphrey Building, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">200 Independence Avenue, SW., </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Washington, DC, or, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Room 132, East High Rise Building, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">6325 Security Boulevard, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Baltimore, Maryland. </ITAG>In commenting, please refer to file code BERC-396-FC. Comments receivedtimely will be available for public inspection as they are received, beginningapproximately three weeks after publication of this document, in Room 309-Gof the Department's offices at 200 Independence Avenue, SW., Washington,DC, on Monday through Friday of each week from 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. (phone:202-245-7890). Organizations and individuals desiring to submit comments on the reportingrequirements discussed under the section on ``Reporting Requirements''of this preamble should direct them to the Health Care Financing Administrationat one of the addresses cited above, and to the Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs, Att.: Allison Herron, Office of Management and Budget,New Executive Office Building (Room 3208), Washington, DC 20503. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Samuel W. Kidder, (301) 966-4620.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Prior Rulemaking ActivityOn October 16, 1987 (52 FR 38582), we published a proposed rule (NPRM)that would establish consistent requirements for SNFs under Medicare andSNFs and ICFs under Medicaid. The purpose of the revisions is to focuson actual facility performance in meeting residents' needs in a safe andhealthful environment, rather than on the capacity of facility to provideappropriate services. The result of this change in focus is to enforcerequirements from the perspective of quality of care and life for longterm care residents, not only under Medicare and Medicaid, but generally,since most of these requirements pertain to all the residents of an SNF,ICF or NF. We expect that these revisions will simplify Federal enforcementprocedures by using a single set of requirements, which apply to thoseactivities common to all facilities. In the background discussion in the preamble to the NPRM, we traced thedevelopment of different statutes and regulations that established requirementsfor SNFs and ICFs under Medicare and Medicaid leading to the developmentof the existing regulations, which were proposed in 1974. Key elementsof that discussion are:andbullet; The emphasis of current rules is on process, not outcomes. Consequentlythe potential to furnish quality care, rather than actual rendition ofcare is emphasized, with undue reliance placed on staff qualifications.andbullet; Medicaid SNFs must meet Medicare SNF requirements. Questions havebeen raised whether rules established primarily for post-hospital careare still relevant, considering changes in health care delivery. andbullet; A single facility may include both SNF and ICF beds with differinglevels of care and patients transferring from more intensive to less intensivecare. Current rules are too inflexible to recognize such changes. andbullet; Current rules are difficult to administer, requiring multiplesurveys because State program needs differ from Federal program needs.andbullet; Some requirements are detailed and some are not. In 1983, we contracted with the Institute of Medicine (IoM), a group charteredby the National Academy of Sciences, to study Federal regulations thatmight enhance the ability of the regulatory system to assure that residentsreceive satisfactory care. The study concluded in 1986 with a report thatstressed the need to develop new regulations that focus on actual deliveryof care and the results of that care. Based on those findings, we developedproposed regulations revising the SNF and ICF requirements. Our proposalslargely reflected acceptance of the 1986 Institute of Medicine study, findingsand recommendations. We accepted virtually all the IoM recommendationsthat could be implemented under existing provisions of the Act. Legislative RevisionsOn December 22, 1987, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (OBRA'87), Pub. L. 100-203, was enacted, which included extensive revisionsto the Medicare and Medicaid statutory requirements for nursing facilities.These revisions were based on the IoM recommendations that we used in developingthe NPRM. These revisions were made with knowledge of HCFA's rulemakingactivities and followed extensive discussions with HCFA staff and otherinterested parties. The new statutory provisions are considerably moredetailed than the previous provisions, reflecting the intent of the Congressto specify in detail, effective October 1, 1990, requirements that theprevious law left to the discretion of the Secretary. These new provisionsare of two types. Some of them simply elaborate on existing law, whileothers institute entirely new requirements. Response to NPRMWe received more than 5,500 comments in response to our October 16, 1987NPRM. Virtually every association or organization representing nursinghomes, and the various medical and other professional employees on theirstaffs submitted comments. Individual States and major third party payerssubmitted comments and a significant number of comments were received fromor on behalf of individual patients, including numerous petitions and formletters. Principles for Developing Final RegulationsIn this final regulation we intend to implement the provisions in our NPRM(revised as appropriate) and, when possible, the new requirements containedin OBRA '87 that are effective October 1, 1990. When elements of OBRA '87are significantly different from what appeared in our proposed rule, weare making them effective on October 1, 1990. It is our intention thatthe final regulations reflect, to the extent possible, the comments onthe NPRM and the requirements of OBRA '87.In implementing OBRA '87, we plan to publish other, related regulationsin addition to this final rule. One of the regulations will implement sections4202, 4203, 4212, and 4213 of OBRA '87, dealing with the survey and certificationand enforcement processes. It will specify the tools to be used in enforcingthe facility requirements. Another regulation will contain certain newly-createdOBRA '87 requirements that are not self-implementing and must be publishedas a proposed rule. As discussed in the preamble to the proposed rule (52 FR 38582), our NPRMreflected the recommendations of the IoM. OBRA '87 was written with boththe recommendations of the IoM and our NPRM as a model. The new statutedeparts from previous Congressional practice by specifying many detailswhich current law leaves to the authority of the Secretary. It also containsentirely new requirements which are also specified in detail. In drafting the final regulation we have attempted to adapt the languageof our proposals to reflect the language used in OBRA '87 in all casesin which we believe that the requirements in question are supportable undercurrent law and reasonably flow from proposals published in the October16, 1987 NPRM. We have done this because we have had comments on the NPRMthat have recommended this course of action. We agree with the commentersand with a number of the sponsors of the legislation that it makes themost sense administratively to assure that the final requirements we putinto effect now provide a bridge to the new requirements of OBRA '87 thatare effective in 1990 and that our requirements be as consistent as possiblewith similar requirements in OBRA '87 to avoid needless disruption of nursingfacilities in making the transition in 1990. Whenever possible, therefore, this final regulation contains single provisionseffective now or in 1990. Only when current law and our NPRM differ significantlyfrom the requirements of OBRA '87 are there separate provisions, one effectiveAugust 1, 1989, and the other effective on October 1, 1990. Of course,some provisions appeared only in OBRA '87 and are not reflected in anyof the provisions effective before October 1, 1990. These provisions areappearing in final form because they are only restatements of the exactlanguage of the statute. As a result of comments and the legislative changes, we are making numerousrevisions to our NPRM. In addition to numerous technical revisions madeby OBRA '87, in this final rule, we are incorporating the following majorOBRA '87 requirements:andbullet; Assuring residents' privacy rights with regard to accommodations,medical treatment, personal care, visits, telephone communications, andmeetings with resident and family groups;andbullet; Maintaining confidentiality of personal and clinical records;andbullet; Guaranteeing facility access and visitation rights;andbullet; Issuing a notice of rights at the time of admission;andbullet; Implementing admissions policy requirements;andbullet; Assuring proper use of physical restraints and psychoactive drugs;andbullet; Protecting resident funds being managed by a facility;andbullet; Ensuring transfer and discharge rights,and issuing notices requiredof a facility;andbullet; Providing twenty four-hour licensed nursing services, and servicesof a registered nurse at least 8 hours a day, 7 days a week, subject towaivers;andbullet; Furnishing comprehensive assessments and being subject to civilmoney penalties for falsification of an assessment;andbullet; Requiring minimum training of nurse aides, competency evaluationprograms, and regular in-service education;andbullet; Prohibiting admission to SNFs and NFs of individuals with mentalillness and mentally retardation, except when they need SNF and NF servicesand have been prescreened by a State authority of mental illness or retardation;andbullet; Providing or obtaining routine and emergency dental services;andbullet; Employing a full time social worker if a facility has more than120 beds; andandbullet; Meeting disclosure of ownership requirements.EnforcementThe condition of participation (COP) format traditionally used by Medicareand Medicaid consists of condition level statements. It has been basedon the principle that each condition level statement would be a statutoryrequirement while standard level statements would be lesser requirements.A facility could be found to have deficiencies at the standard level andbe making efforts to correct them while it continued to participate inthe Medicare program but was subject to termination if it failed to meeta condition level (i.e., statutory) requirement. Regardless of the significanceof the requirement, that is, whether the requirement was a COP or a standardwithin a condition, the facility was responsible for fully complying withall requirements.Notwithstanding this long standing agency policy, we wish to be certainthat the public realize that all requirements for certification must bemet by nursing facilities if they are to avoid some measure of adverseaction. We believe that, to the extent that Federal requirements were setforth in what appeared to be a qualitative hiearchy, that there might besome misunderstanding that violations of the ``lesser'' requirements wouldnot be subject to Federal enforcement.Additionally, the OBRA '87 requirements have recast substantive requirementsso as not to use the traditional ``conditions'' and ``standards'' terminology.Accordingly, in this final rule, we have attempted where appropriate toretain the organization of the various proposed requirements, but haverevised the terminology. Thus, those requirements that previously wereidentified as conditions of participation (appearing as individual sectionswithin a subpart) are now designated as level A requirements. Those requirementsthat previously were identified as standards (appearing as individual paragraphswithin a section) are now designated as level B requirements. These designationsare intended to communicate that all of the nursing facility requirementsare binding and are not part of a qualitative hierarchy, while at the sametime recognizing that violations of these requirements (depending on theirtype or severity) may be remedied through the different enforcement mechanismsavailable to the Department.In light of the revised nomenclature of these regulations, it is our expectationthat it will be the Department's enforcement regulations that will be thevehicle to describe the manner in which we will choose among the variousenforcement devices available under the statute to remedy the differentkinds of violations of Federal certification requirements that can occurin nursing facilities. We would be interested in hearing from the publicon the manner in which the Department should approach this task as wellas on any restructuring of these final regulations that might be neededto accommodate this program objective.The comprehensive changes in the enforcement procedures in the Medicareand Medicaid programs necessitated by OBRA '87 will not be implementeduntil the full rulemaking process has been completed. Therefore, existingenforcement authorities under both programs must continue to be used fromthe effective date of this rule until the OBRA '87 final enforcement regulationis published and effective. We have made conforming technical changes toParts 442, 488, 489, and 498 (dealing with certification, provider agreements,and appeals) to reflect the revised terminology for SNFs and ICFs usedin this rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Provisions of the Proposed Rule and Public Comments</ITAG>Commenters on the NPRM focused their attention primarily on the proposedconditions of participation, and the standards that would be applied todetermine compliance with those conditions. There were no substantive commentson andSection;483.1, Basis and Scope and andSection;483.5, Definitions, hence,with the exception of adding updating changes required by OBRA '87, thesesections are incorporated in this final rule as they were proposed.Following, we present in order a brief summary of the provisions as proposed,the comments and our responses for those areas of major concern. Many commenters,while agreeing substantially with a standard, as proposed, suggested thestandard be used to determine compliance with a different condition. Wehave accepted many of these comments, which has the effect of significantlyreorganizing the NPRM. For general information, we have prepared a table,which appears at the end of this preamble, that relates the requirementsin this final rule to the correlative NPRM section from which it evolved.Where OBRA '87 provisions resulted in significant change, we so identifyOBRA '87 as the source. This table is intended merely to assist partieswho may be interested in comparing specific provisions as proposed or inOBRA '87 to those of the final rule. It does not supplant the more detaileddiscussion in this preamble.Comments and Responses<ITAG tagnum="81">General Comments</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters urged that we develop a separate setof requirements for specialized facilities such as swing-bed hospitalsand hospital-based SNFs, arguing that the basically long-term, residentialorientation of the proposed regulations is inappropriate for the particularcircumstances of these types of facilities. They noted that these facilitiesgenerally are Medicare-only and serve a more acutely ill, shorter-staypatient population than do freestanding facilities. They cited severalspecific requirements in the proposed regulations as being problematic:allowing up to 14 days from admission to conduct a comprehensive assessmentwould place the assessment near the end of the typical hospital-based SNFpatient's stay; resident participation in the resident group and in facilitydecisionmaking would lack continuity due to the relatively rapid turnover;the proposed physician visit schedule is too infrequent for this type ofpatient. Two other commenters expressed the concern that the proposed requirementsdo not adequately address the special care needs of mentally ill individuals,and the special circumstances of those facilities involved in the treatmentof alcoholism.<T3>Response: </T3>We acknowledge that certain aspects of individual requirementsin the proposed regulations may be more characteristic of long-term, residentialsettings than of those serving a short-stay, relatively acute care population.However, we believe that developing an entire separate set of regulationsfor the latter type of facility would be inconsistent with the fundamentalconcept embodied in the IoM recommendation that, to the extent possible,there should be a single, uniform set of requirements applicable to allSNFs and ICFs. This basic objective of the IoM report is further supportedby OBRA '87_which by statute, as of October 1, 1990, will combine the existingMedicaid requirements for SNFs and ICFs into a single set of nursing facilityrequirements. We also note that, to some extent, the concerns of the commentersare addressed by changes we are making to various individual provisionsbased on other comments on the proposed rule. For example, we are reducingthe maximum timeframe for conducting a comprehensive assessment from 14days to 4 days effective October 1, 1990. Also, we are reducing the maximumallowable interval between required physician visits in ICFs from thatproposed (which permitted visits as infrequently as yearly) to no longerthan 90 days.With regard to the treatment of mental illness, we note that OBRA '87 includesrequirements for preadmission screening and annual resident review, whichfocus, in part, on the special treatment needs of mentally ill individuals.These requirements are designed to direct mentally ill individuals to othersettings when appropriate, and to ensure that when mentally ill individualsreside in nursing facilities, all of their treatment needs (including thoserelating to their mental illness) are fully met. For these reasons, wedo not plan to adopt a separate set of requirements for specialized facilities.Section 483.10 Resident Rights RequirementWe proposed in andSection;483.10 that the resident has a right to a dignifiedexistence, self-determination, and communication with and access to personsand services inside and outside the facility. Also, we proposed that thefacility must assert, protect, and facilitate the exercise of these rights.Under present rules, resident rights are categorized as an individual provisionwithin a condition (i.e., a level B requirement). Over one hundred commenters offered general comments on the introductorystatement or on the requirement as a whole. Nearly half of these generalcomments stated that they strongly supported elevation of resident rightsto the status of a condition of participation. Since we do not use the``condition of participation'' or ``standard'' terminology any longer,and we are committed to enforcement of all requirements equally, we donot think the title used to describe resident rights will bring about lessor greater enforcement. <ITAG tagnum="81">General Comments on the Resident Rights Requirement as a Whole. </ITAG><T3>Comment:</T3> Comments both supported and objected to the change ofthe term ``patient'' to ``resident.'' Several commenters applauded theuse of the term ``resident'' rather than ``patient'' because it recognizesthe fact that for many individuals the nursing home is indeed their home.Opponents believed it fosters a false perception of a nursing home patientfor those persons who, due to illness and infirmity generally, are unableto assert a variety of rights, engage in a variety of meaningful activities,and cannot be taken care of with minimal resources, i.e., at a relativelylow cost. <T3>Response:</T3> Our use of the term ``resident'' is based upon the IoM'srecommendation to emphasize the concept of a nursing home as a place ofresidence for its clients. Additionally, OBRA '87 (Section 4201-MedicareProgram and Section 4211-Medicaid Program) amended the Act by defininga skilled nursing facility as an ``institution or a distinct part of aninstitution that is primarily engaged in providing to residents skillednursing care and related services for residents who require medical ornursing care * * *'' We agree that at any given time a number of the residentsmay be in need of considerable medical care; however, we believe that theterm ``resident'' rather than ``patient'' as a general term of referencebetter describes the nursing home clients who reside there to obtain long-termcare. <T3>Comment:</T3> Another group of commenters suggested structural reorganizationof the regulation. Several commenters found the division between residentrights and quality of life blurred and expressed concern that this confusionwould lead to either dilution of significant findings or multiple citationsby State agency surveyors for the same underlying problem. Some commentersremarked that concepts such as quality of life and quality of care aredifficult, if not impossible, to define in isolation from other requirements.A related criticism of the requirement, cited by commenters who did notrealize that the statement of rights at andSection;483.10 had a parallelsection concerning facility responsibilities under the administration requirementat andSection;483.75, was that the rights section had been weakened by couchingthe statements in terms of ``the resident has a right to * * *''. Theyfelt it was quite another thing to say ``the facility must do * * * toensure these rights.'' They wanted facilities to be actively and meaningfullyinvolved in the process of ensuring resident rights and requested specificityas to how the facility is supposed to assert, protect and facilitate theresident's exercise of these rights. Otherwise, the commenters believedthat the requirement could not be used successfully to initiate non-compliancefindings. <T3>Response:</T3> We are responding to the concerns of these commentersby relocating certain provisions that place responsibilities upon facilitiesfor ensuring rights from the Administration requirement to a new requirementat andSection;483.12, entitled, Admission, transfer and discharge rights.The individual provisions in this requirement include transfer and discharge,notice of bed hold policy and readmission, equal access to quality care,and admissions policy. We are also consolidating other parts of the proposed Administration condition,augmented by OBRA '87 requirements, with certain provisions in andSection;483.10.These are notice of rights and services, access and visitation rights,notification of changes, and protection of resident funds. To emphasize the importance of monitoring the manner in which nursing facilitiesmanage resident behavior, we are creating a new requirement at andSection;483.13,entitled, Resident behavior and facility practices, that includes provisionsrelated to resident abuse, the use of physical and psychoactive drugs,and staff treatment of residents. To reflect the emphasis of the new quality of life requirement, andSection;483.15, on residents' effective interaction with their environment, weare relocating certain individual provisions from andSection; 483.10 to andSection;483.15. These provisions are dignity, participation in resident and familygroups, participation in other activities, self-determination and participation,and accommodation of needs.<T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters noted that residents do not understandtheir rights and hence, must rely on strong enforcement of this provision.Several commenters suggested that we develop detailed indicators to beused in the survey process to ensure compliance with this requirement.Still other commenters, stating that the majority of facilities use verbatimtexts of rights statements in the materials they provide to residents,expressed appreciation that the language of this rights section had beensimplified and made more understandable for residents. On the other hand,several commenters were concerned that the simplified language of the proposedrights section was too vague and open to interpretation. Other commentersfelt that the approach taken to resident choice reflected unrealistic assumptionsregarding resident capabilities.<T3>Response: </T3>In order to reduce subjectivity and vagueness, we haveadded more specificity to a number of the individual provisions in thisrequirement, often by relying on the greater detail contained in the currentSNF and ICF regulations. These changes are highlighted in the paragraph-by-paragraphdiscussions below.We do not agree that these regulations are based on unrealistic assumptionsconcerning resident capabilities. Our regulations closely follow the recommendationsof the IoM study which directly related resident health to the exerciseof rights. Below, we address additional comments dealing with rights, sincethe requirement had numerous provisions involving specific rights.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a): Exercise of rights</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(a) that: (1) The resident has the rightto exercise his or her rights as a resident of the facility, and as a citizenor resident of the United States, including the right to file complaints;(2) the resident has the right to be free of coercion or reprisal fromthe facility in exercising his or her rights; and (3) An individual appointedunder State law may exercise a resident's rights when a resident has beenadjudicated to be incompetent.<T3>Comment: </T3>Comments are summarized as follows. Commenters_andbullet; Reported that language lacked specificity;andbullet; Noted that the regulation failed to address the case of a residentwho is clearly incompetent, but has not been determined incompetent bya judge;andbullet; Charged that requiring a judicial determination of incompetencybefore a relative or representative can exercise the resident's rightswould result in expensive and time consuming legal action, and would overburdenthe courts;andbullet; Noted that the proposed requirement for a judicial determinationof incompetency before a representative can exercise a resident's rightsconflicts with State laws in some cases. Some States have authorized non-judicialdesignation of legal surrogates, such as durable powers of attorney, livingwills or natural death laws (so-called advance directive mechanisms). Ifthese mechanisms are ruled out, our regulations would restrict, ratherthan enhance a resident's right to self-determination;andbullet; Requested that we retain provisions of existing regulations thatallow physicians to make determinations concerning incompetence becausesuch a determination may serve as a basis for State authorized non-judicialdesignations of surrogates.<T3>Response:</T3> We have changed the wording of andSection; 483.10 to accommodatecommenters' views. In paragraph (f), we are using wording that specifiesthat a resident has the right to voice complaints and file grievances withrespect to treatment or care, and the right to prompt efforts by the facilityto resolve grievances. In the interpretive guidelines, we will explainthat resident and family groups may serve as an effective vehicle for resolutionof many resident grievances, particularly when they involve differencesof opinion or a conflict of individual rights among residents. However,residents also have the right to take individual action to express theircomplaints.Because of the variance in State laws concerning resident rights, we havealso accepted commenters' recommendations that we defer entirely to Statelaw on this matter in andSection; 483.10(a)(3). In this final rule, to satisfycommenters, we are adopting wording concerning adjudicated cases that takesinto account the fact that gradations of incapability exist to which theStates have adopted or can adopt graduated remedies.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (b): Right To Be Informed</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(1) that the resident has the right tobe informed of his or her rights and the rules of the facility upon admission,in the language that he or she understands.<T3>Comment: </T3>Summary of comments.andbullet; A strong majority of commenters urged that we retain the conceptof resident responsibilities as a counterbalance to resident rights;andbullet; Commenters also asked that we retain the current requirementsfor written notification and acknowledgement of receipt of informationof rights and responsibilities by residents;andbullet; Some commenters also wanted us to specify, as in the current regulations,that this notification be made prior to or at the time of admission aswell as during the stay; andandbullet; Commenters requested clarification of the right to be informedof his or her rights ``in the language that he or she understands.''<T3>Response:</T3> We agree with commenters and are including a requirementfor written acknowledgement from the resident and periodic review of informationpertaining to rights. We are retaining the requirement that the residentassume certain responsibilities relative to other residents and the facility.We are also placing in andSection; 483.10(b)(9) a provision that requiresfacilities to prominently display written information and provide oralinformation to residents and potential residents about how to apply forMedicare and Medicaid benefits.``In language that the resident understands'' means that communicationof information concerning rights and responsibilities must be both clearand understandable to the resident and, if the resident's knowledge ofEnglish is inadequate for comprehension, in the foreign language familiarto the resident. For foreign languages commonly encountered in the facilitylocale, the facility must have written translations of its statement ofrights and responsibilities, and should make the services of an interpreteravailable. In the case of less commonly encountered foreign languages,however, a representative of the resident may sign that he has interpretedthe statement of rights to the resident prior to the resident's acknowledgementof receipt. For hearing impaired residents who communicate by signing,the facility would similarly be expected to provide an interpreter. Largeprint texts of the facility's statement of resident rights and responsibilitiesshould also be available for the many residents who need them.<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(2) that the residenthas a right to inspect his or her records on request.andbullet; Many commenters supported our deletion of the ``unless medicallycontraindicated'' qualifier to a number of important rights that existin the current SNF and ICF regulations, while others took a less favorableview of the deletion;andbullet; Commenters suggested that most residents could not understandthe medical terminology used in the records, and wanted us to require physicianapproval or the presence of a qualified staff person or a physician duringthe resident's inspection of records;andbullet; Commenters requested that we provide that family members and otherrepresentatives also have the right to inspect residents' records on request.andbullet; Commenters asked for clarification of the term, ``on request,''and recommended that requests for inspection of records be made in writing,and facilities be given 48 hours to respond.andbullet; Commenters suggested that the right to inspect records includethe right to photocopy records at prevailing community rates; andandbullet; Commenters suggested that records be defined to include all ofa resident's records.<T3>Response: </T3>Because of the commenters' strong support for not limitingexercise of resident rights due to medical contraindications in general,we are not imposing this qualifier even though some commenters requestedit here at andSection; 483.10(b)(2) and also at (b)(3). We do not believethat residents should be shielded from medical facts. However, we alsobelieve that it would be unreasonable to require the presence of a staffmember to interpret records for the resident. In most cases, this wouldrequire a nurse, and we believe that scarce nurse resources should be usedto provide nursing services, not medical education. The resident may permitinclusion of a staff member familiar with the record, however, if he orshe so chooses. Likewise, the resident might wish to have family membersor other representatives present. As for allowing other representativesor family members to exercise rights of inspection for the resident, ratherthan with the resident, we defer entirely to State law in this matter forresidents, including those who are judicially determined to be incompetent,as dealt with in andSection; 483.10(a)(3).Partly to facilitate the inclusion of family or other representatives,as well as to allow the facility to coordinate requests for records withtheir medical records staff, we are revising the regulations to requirewritten requests from residents and up to 48 hours for the facility torespond to the requests.We believe the right to photocopy records is an integral aspect of theresident's right to employ the assistance of others in exercising his orher rights since some persons with whom the resident might wish to consultmight not be able to be physically present at an inspection of the records.The interpretive guidelines will specify, however, that residents may becharged for this service at prevailing community rates. As explained underthe requirement on privacy and confidentiality at andSection; 483.10(e),we are defining records to include all records pertaining to the resident.<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(3) that the residenthas the right to be informed of his or her medical condition, and to havean opportunity to participate in planning his or her medical treatment.Commenters who responded to this provision wanted:andbullet; Substitution of broader terms, such as health status and totalplan of care, for the more restrictive terms of medical condition and medicaltreatment; andbullet; More resident input into assessment and care planning;andbullet; More informed consent by residents through fuller explanationand discussion of treatment options in language that the resident can understand;andbullet; Inclusion of family members or representatives in the care planningprocess; andandbullet; A requirement that every resident be informed of the name, specialty,and way of contacting the physician responsible for his or her care.<T3>Response: </T3>As noted under andSection; 483.10(b)(2), we believe thatthe resident should not be shielded from medical facts. We agree with therecommendations of commenters who suggested broader resident involvementin the care planning process and have revised andSection; 483.10(b) to includecommenters' suggestions. In the interpretive guidelines, we will explainthat the resident should be involved in the assessment and care planningprocess, including the discussion of diagnoses, treatment options, risksand prognoses. These discussions should be presented in language that theresident can be expected to understand, and the resident must be allowedto make choices based upon the information provided.Consistent with commenters' requests for a broader interpretation of aresident's right to be informed about his or her condition, we are expandingnotification of changes, andSection; 483.10(b)(10).<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(4) that the residenthas a right to refuse treatment, and to refuse to participate in experimentalresearch. The large number of comments we received on this issue are summarizedas follows:andbullet; Residents should not have the right to refuse food and liquids;some commenters saw such a refusal of treatment as a form of suicide, whichthey do not condone;andbullet; Commenters requested that we clarify how a resident's right torefuse treatment can be reconciled with a facility's obligation to providecare and treatment;andbullet; Commenters suggested that the act of refusal of treatment be well-defined,and that the facility inform the resident of the consequences of refusal;andandbullet; Commenters requested that residents not be allowed to refuse toparticipate in research projects that involve only observation.<T3>Response: </T3>As part of the quality of care requirements at andSection;483.25 (i) and (j), we are requiring that residents receive a nutritiousdiet and adequate liquids. When invasive procedures are necessary to accomplishthis end, however, the courts have generally held that these proceduresconstitute treatments that residents or their representatives may refusejust as they may refuse any other medical treatment.We are aware that this is a controversial issue, and for this reason, mustdefer to the courts and to the States which have responsibility for resolvingthe underlying legal issues. ``The right to die,'' and particularly withholdingof artificial feeding, has received considerable debate since 1976 withthe Quinlan verdict and when California passed the nation's first naturaldeath or living will law. Since that time, 38 States and the District ofColumbia have adopted such laws. Six States explicitly include artificialfeeding among treatments that the resident may refuse, thereby approvingwithdrawal of nutrition and hydration, while 7 States explicitly excludesuch procedures from the definition of treatment, thereby prohibiting thewithholding of artificial feeding. Among the remaining States, 14 are silenton the issue and 12 contain ambiguous references to comfort of the patient.Because the right to refuse treatment is protected by law, some believethe right to refuse artificial feeding exists even if a State's livingwill law has restrictive language excluding artificial feeding from thedefinition of treatment which may be refused. Such State-imposed restrictionsare, therefore, subject to judicial challenge. So far, every trial courtdecision holding that artificial feeding is unlike other treatments andcannot be refused has been reversed upon appeal. Indeed, in 3 of the 7States with restrictive language, court challenges to such restrictionshave been successful. Because of the discrepancies among State laws andthe need for a judicial resolution of this issue, we are leaving the wordingof this statement concerning the resident's right to refuse treatment unqualified,as presented in the NPRM. The use of the advance directives, such as livingwills, is dealt with under the statement on competency at andSection; 483.10(a)(3).We believe that a resident's refusal of treatment must be persistent andconsistently documented in the resident's record. Refusals of treatmentshould also be countered by discussions with the resident of the healthand safety consequences of the refusal and the availability of any therapeuticalternatives that might exist. With regard to the use of restraints, refusalsmay be dealt with in the care planning process in which the resident isto be involved, as provided for at andSection; 483.10(d)(3) and through whichtreatment to reduce dependency upon the use of restraints is to be offered,as proposed under andSection; 483.10(d). If a resident consistently refusesall treatment, discharge on the grounds that the resident's welfare cannotbe met in the facility may be the ultimate solution. Transfer and dischargerights are dealt with under andSection; 483.12.Section 483.75(d) makes reference to general Departmental regulations concernedwith the protection of human subjects of research. We also plan to clarifythat experimental research must respect the privacy of the resident. Anydirect observation or use of client-specific data requires the resident'sconsent. Non-resident-specific data, however, may be used for studies withoutobtaining permission of the individual clients.<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(5) that the residenthas the right to information on Federal, State and local agencies concernedwith enforcement of skilled and intermediate care rules, and agencies actingas client advocates, and must be afforded the opportunity to contact theseagencies.Comments are summarized as follows:andbullet; Commenters asked that the rights information provided to residentsin facilities include the name, address and phone number of all enforcementagencies, all local ombudsman programs, legal services programs, and citizenadvocacy groups;andbullet; Commenters suggested that facilities display the most recent Medicareor Medicaid survey reports and statements of deficiencies; andandbullet; Commenters suggested that ``agencies acting as client advocates''be deleted from the list of organizations about which the facility mustprovide information because most facilities do not have this information.<T3>Response: </T3>We have concluded that the intent of this proposed provisionis met by other requirements related to resident rights including the facilitymaking available to residents and the public written policies on rightsand responsibilities; providing space, privacy, and staff support for residentand family advisory groups; permitting access to Federal, State, and localenforcement agents and ombudsmen; and posting in a location accessibleto residents information concerning Federal, State, and local enforcementand advocacy agencies, the State or local legal services agency, and notificationof the results of surveys and plans of correction. For this reason, wehave chosen to eliminate proposed andSection; 483.10(b)(5).<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(b)(6) that the residenthas a right to be informed of his or her responsibility for charges, servicesavailable, changes in rates, and changes in itemized forms.Commenters_andbullet; Found the wording of this element, as proposed, confusing, particularlythe mention of itemized forms;andbullet; Wanted the regulation to be more specific;andbullet; Wanted the resident to be fully informed in advance of all chargesfor which he or she would be held responsible;andbullet; Asked that facilities notify residents of charges in writing priorto or upon admission and that copies be provided to resident representativesor family members;andbullet; Requested that facilities notify residents in advance of changes;andandbullet; Thought that residents should have a right to receive informationabout services available under Medicaid and Medicare, eligibility rules,and the application process.<T3>Response: </T3>Most concerns of the commenters regarding the wordingof the proposal have been resolved by the revised andSection; 483.10(b) (5)and (6). We believe that the revised andSection; 483.10(b) (5) and (6) willprovide residents with the knowledge of which items and services are paidfor by Medicaid or Medicare, and for which other items and services theresident can expect to be billed. Also, private pay residents should beable to determine which items and services are included in the facility'sper diem rate and which are ancillary items or services for which he orshe will be billed separately.Since neither current law and regulations nor the new OBRA '87 provisionsgive us the authority to require that residents be given advance noticeof changes in services or charges, we cannot incorporate this recommendationinto this rule. Whenever possible, however, we believe that advance notificationshould be given in order to be consistent with the intent of the law, whichis to allow residents to be fully informed of what they owe the facility.With regard to commenters who suggested that we require a facility to provideinformation on how to apply for Medicare and Medicaid benefits, we areusing OBRA '87 wording at andSection; 483.10(b)(9), effective on October1, 1990. As for comments urging us to require that copies of bills be sentto all relevant parties, we also refer readers to andSection; 483.10(b) andandSection; 483.10(e), concerning the right to be informed and the rightto privacy and confidentiality of records. These rights place limits onwho may receive copies of a resident's financial records.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c): Resident Finances</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(c) that the resident has the right to managehis or her financial affairs. A corresponding provision on resident financesunder the administration requirement at andSection; 483.75(j) proposed thatthe facility must establish and maintain a system that assures a full andcomplete accounting of the resident's personal funds entrusted to the facilityon the resident's behalf. We have consolidated proposed andSection;andSection;483.10(c) and 483.75(j) into a single provision addressing resident finances.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Requested a requirement that the facility issue quarterly statementsto the resident or to his or her representative (this was the most frequentlyexpressed request);andbullet; Believed that residents should have the option to delegate theresponsibility of managing funds to the facility, in which case, facilitiesshould be required to accept responsibility;andbullet; Wanted clarification that the resident is under no obligationto deposit funds with the facility; andandbullet; Apparently alluding to State laws concerning incompetency andexercise of rights, which are discussed in andSection; 483.10(a)(3), suggestedthat we qualify the statement that the resident has the right to managehis or her financial affairs by the phrase, ``unless otherwise determinedby State law.''<T3>Response: </T3>We have expanded upon the right of the resident to managehis own financial affairs or, if he or she so chooses, to designate anotherparty to manage them for him or her. Unless determined incompetent underState law by a judge, the resident has the right to manage his or her ownfinancial affairs, and is under no obligation to deposit personal fundswith the facility. However, if the resident chooses, the facility mustmanage the resident's funds. In managing the funds, the facility must keepthem in separate accounts, maintain a system that assures a full and completeand separate accounting, and affords the resident or legal representativereasonable access to the record. With regards to commenters' requests forquarterly reports, we proposed and made final, in andSection; 483.10(c)(4)(ii),the requirement that the financial record be made available ``on request''to the resident or his or her legal representative.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d): Restraints</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(d) that the resident has the right to befree from unnecessary drugs and physical restraints, and is provided treatmentto reduce dependency on drugs and physical restraint.<T3>Comments: </T3>In summary, commenters_andbullet; Wanted clarification or elaboration of the language;andbullet; Indicated a preference for the existing regulations, especiallywith regard to the requirements for a physician's order specifying durationand circumstances for use of restraints;andbullet; Suggested we add a statement that the purpose of restraints isto protect the resident from injury to self or others, and add provisionsfor emergency use on a one-time only basis;andbullet; Proposed a ban on use of restraints for staff convenience or disciplinarypurposes, while others suggested that we require review by an interdisciplinaryteam and documentation of attempts to use less restrictive methods;andbullet; Commended the inclusion of the statement requiring treatment toreduce drug dependency;andbullet; Found this requirement unsafe or inappropriate for some residents;andbullet; Suggested that it be left up to the physician to reduce the useof restraints;andbullet; Objected to the use of the term ``unnecessary drugs'' as vague,subjective or unenforceable. Some commenters proposed substituting ``chemicalrestraints'' for the term, ``unnecessary drugs;'' andandbullet; Requested that we implement the OBRA '87 provisions concerningrestraints and psychopharmacological drugs immediately.<T3>Response: </T3>Because the area of behavioral management of nursingfacility residents has both residents' rights and quality of care dimensions,we are placing proposed andSection; 483.10(d), Restraints, and andSection;483.10(e) Abuse, in a new requirement, Resident behavior and facility practices,andSection; 483.13.In response to comments, we are providing in andSection; 483.13(a) on theuse of physical restraints and drugs for the purpose of discipline or convenienceto staff that ``The resident has the right to be free of and the facilitymust ensure freedom from physical restraints imposed or drugs administeredfor purposes of discipline or convenience, and not required to treat theresident's medical symptoms.'' We have chosen not to use the OBRA '87 term``chemical restraint.'' This term is often used in a pejorative sense tomean drugs used without appropriate indications, in excessive doses, forexcessive periods of time, or for a combination of all three of these reasons.Many drugs are, in fact, designed to restrain certain behaviors. They onlybecome ``chemical restraints'' when used without proper indications foruse, in excessive doses or for excessive periods of time.  In a forthcoming rule, we will propose specific requirements for the administrationof drugs and the application of physical restraints in emergency and nonemergencysituations. This will address many of the commenters' other concerns. Generally,we plan to follow the provisions of the conditions of participation forintermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded published as a finalrule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on June 3, 1988 at 53 FR 20448.  We have chosen not to implement this OBRA '87 provision concerning theuse of psychopharmacological drugs in this final rule, but will addressthis requirement in a forthcoming proposed rule.  In addition, the term ``unnecessary drugs'' is defined in this preambleunder the ``Quality of care requirement, Paragraph: (i) Drug Therapy''and has been relocated to andSection; 483.25(l)  <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (e): Abuse  </ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(e) that the resident has the right to befree of physical, psychological, or sexual abuse or punishment.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters_  andbullet; Applauded inclusion of this right;  andbullet; Recommended that resident management programs not be consideredabuse when the programs are described in the plan of care in response toan identified problem, developed by the professional team and approvedby the attending physician;  andbullet; Requested a definition of abuse or interpretation of such termsas psychological or sexual abuse within the regulation;  andbullet; Requested inclusion of verbal abuse and involuntary seclusion(isolation) as forms of punishment; and  andbullet; Suggested adding a right to information about how to report abuse,neglect, or mistreatment.  <T3>Response:</T3> We agree with the commenters' recommendations. We arecreating a new requirement at andSection; 483.13 which includes provisionson restraints and abuse, and we are adding verbal and sexual abuse in responseto comments. We do not believe, however, that we can exclude all behaviormanagement techniques that might be employed within a plan of care frompossible consideration as abuse. We plan to define through example forour surveyors terms such as physical, psychological, sexual, and verbalabuse. We believe that the resident's right to information about agenciesto which abuse or neglect should be reported is adequately addressed inandSection; 483.10(k), as revised.  We are also placing in andSection; 483.13(c), a requirement related to thestaff treatment of residents reflecting a facility's responsibilities toprevent abuse through assuring that persons who have been convicted ofabusing individuals are not employed and allegations of abuse are fullyinvestigated.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (f): Privacy and Confidentiality  </ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(f) that the resident has the right to personalprivacy and confidentiality of his or her records.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters_  andbullet; Urged expansion of the right to personal privacy to include privacyregarding accommodations, treatment, personal care, visits, and meetings,whether of resident or family groups or with selected individuals suchas ombudsmen, lawyers, and clergy;  andbullet; Requested addition of specific requirements that residents betreated with consideration and respect, and be accorded the right not tohave one's condition or care discussed with family members without theresident's inclusion or expressed permission;  andbullet; Requested retention of all or parts of the more specific languageon confidentiality used in the current SNF and ICF regulations. Most frequently,commenters wanted the regulation to specify that a resident has the rightto approve or refuse the release of his or her records to any individualoutside the facility, except those required to be released by law or thirdparty payment contract; and  andbullet; Wanted the statement to specify that confidentiality extends toa resident's medical, social, and financial records so that the right cannotbe interpreted to mean only medical records.  <T3>Response:</T3> To accommodate the many requests for a more specificdefinition of privacy rights, we have revised andSection; 483.10(e) to discussprivacy explicitly in terms of accommodations, medical treatment, personalcare, visits, and meetings of family and resident groups. The clause followingnew section 1919(c)(1)(A)(xi), added by OBRA '87, specifies that privacywith regard to accommodations does not require a private room. Under thephysical environment requirement at andSection; 483.70(d), we are definingprivacy with regard to accommodations as full visual privacy around beds.We are interpreting the right to privacy to mean that the resident hasthe right to privacy with whomever the resident wishes to be private andthat this privacy should include full visual, and to the extent possible,auditory privacy. Privacy space may be created flexibly and need not bededicated solely for visitation purposes. For example, privacy for visitationor meetings might be arranged by using a dining area between meals; a vacantchapel, office or room; or an activities area when activities are not inprogress. Arrangements for private space could be accomplished throughcooperation between the facility's administration and resident or familygroups so that private space is provided for those requesting it withoutinfringement on the rights of other residents.  Under proposed paragraph andSection; 483.10(f)(1), we have not accommodatedthe request of some commenters that we retain provisions of the currentSNF and ICF regulations which require that the resident be treated withconsideration, respect, and full recognition of his or her dignity andindividuality because we believe this requirement will be addressed underthe Quality of life requirement, andSection; 483.15(a).  In proposed paragraph andSection; 483.10(f)(2), as requested by commenters,we provide generally that the resident may approve or refuse the releaseof personal and clinical records outside the facility. This change foundat andSection; 483.10(e)(2) serves to continue the more specific requirementsfrom the current SNF or ICF regulations as well as incorporates OBRA '87wording, which requires confidentiality of personal and clinical records.We will interpret this in subsequent guidelines to include all types ofrecords the facility might keep on a resident, whether they be medical,social, financial, automated, or other. We have also revised andSection;483.10(e) by adding a new paragraph (3) to include the explanation of conditionsunder which the resident does not have control over release of his records.These include transfer to another health care institution, and record releaserequired by law or third-party payment contract.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (g): Work  </ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(g) that the resident has the right to notperform services for the facility, and to be compensated for services voluntarilyperformed, unless informed prior to performing the services that the servicesare of a voluntary nature and will not be compensated.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Comments are summarized as follows:  andbullet; Many commenters found this requirement confusing, or even self-contradictory,and indicated a preference for the wording of the current SNF regulationwhich states that ``The resident is not required to perform services forthe facility that are not included for therapeutic purposes in his planof care;'' andbullet; A large majority of commenters urged retention of the conceptof work as therapy; andbullet; A majority of commenters also requested that the rule state thatthe resident has the right to perform voluntary services for the facilityjust as much as he or she has the right not to perform any services; and andbullet; Commenters objected to having the facility placed in a positionof open-ended liability for payment anytime it neglects to inform a residentbefore performing a service that the service was voluntary.  <T3>Response:</T3> In the final rule, in andSection; 483.10(h) we are acknowledgingboth the right not to work and the right to do work, as matters of residentchoice. We have restored the concept of work as therapy by requiring thatall resident work, whether of a voluntary or paid nature, be done throughthe plan of care. Documenting a resident's need or desire for work in theplan of care makes the work assignment reviewable and prevents the impressionthat every resident is expected to work. We believe a resident's desirefor work is subject to discussion of medical appropriateness. As part ofthe plan of care, a therapeutic work assignment must be formally agreedto by the resident. The resident also has the right to refuse such treatmentat any time that he or she wishes. At the time of development or reviewof the plan, the voluntary or paid nature of the work can be negotiated.The resident, thus, is able to negotiate while, at the same time, the facilityis freed of the open-ended liability that many commenters criticized. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (h): Mail</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(h) that the resident has the right to sendand receive mail that is not opened.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters all strongly supported this right and usuallyrequested more detailed protections of the right. A majority of commentersobjected to delays, for one reason or another, in the delivery of mail.Because delaying mail may be used as a form of retaliation or retribution,some commenters proposed adding the phrase ``without interference.'' Anothergroup of commenters urged requiring distribution on a Monday through Saturdaybasis or on the same day as the mail is received by the facility. Severalcommenters also requested that we add, ``the resident shall have access,at his or her own expense, to writing instruments, stationery, and postage.''One commenter proposed that we adopt the broader provisions of OBRA '87,requiring, ``privacy in written communications.'' Finally, as a way ofprotecting staff from misinterpretation of assistance as an invasion ofprivacy, two commenters proposed adding that ``facility staff may assistthe resident in sending or receiving personal mail if the resident requestsit.''<T3>Response: </T3>We have expanded this requirement by incorporating someof the qualifiers suggested by commenters. In andSection; 483.10(i), we arerequiring that mail be sent from and delivered to residents ``promptly,''which will mean delivery to the resident writing within 24 hours of arrivalin the facility and delivery to the postal service within 24 hours. Morespecific requirements concerning mail distribution might prove burdensometo facilities. While we require access to materials, we have not placedthe responsibility for provision of these items directly on the facility.We take the view that within each facility a resident group or similargroup could work with the facility's administration to make the most appropriatearrangements for their situation. In that residents have the right to requestassistance in the exercise of all their rights, we do not believe thatany particular staff protections are necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (i): Access to Facility</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(i) that the resident has the right to receivevisitors at any reasonable hour, and by arrangements at other times.<T3>Comment: </T3>A sizeable majority of commenters, usually representingfacilities, wanted ``at any reasonable hour'' defined in the regulation,qualified by ``as determined by facility policy,'' or deleted in favorof ``during visiting hours.'' Resident advocates proposed that ``reasonable''be defined as at least eight hours per day, that ``by arrangements at othertimes'' be clarified to specify between whom the arrangements are to bemade, and that facilities be required to take into consideration circumstancessuch as out-of-town visitors and working schedules of relatives and friends.Some commenters asked us to implement immediately all or parts of the OBRA'87 provisions pertaining to access to the facility, particularly the oneallowing immediate access to the resident by members of the resident'sfamily. <T3>Response: </T3>We accept the comments requesting that facilities beresponsible for granting access to visitors at any reasonable hour andare revising andSection; 483.10(j) to provide that, until October 1, 1990,the resident has the right to receive visitors, and the facility must allowvisitors to have access to the resident at any ``reasonable hour.'' Inthe interpretive guidelines, we will define ``at any reasonable hour''to mean at least eight hours per day, arranged in such a way that daytime,evening and weekend visitation times are available to meet most potentialhealth practitioners and non-family visitors' schedules. Effective October1, 1990, in andSection; 483.10(k) (vii) and (viii), we are implementing theOBRA '87 requirement that residents have the right to ``immediate'' accessfrom family, other relatives and friends. Section 411(l) of the MedicareCatastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, Pub. L. 100-360, makes certain provisionsof OBRA '87 effective July 1, 1988, including immediate access to representativeof the Secretary, the State, the residents individual physician, Stateombudsmen, and agencies responsible for the protection and advocacy systemfor developmentally disabled and mentally ill. We are including these provisionsin andSection; 483.10(k) (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), and (vi).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (j): Telephone</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(j) that the resident have the right tohave access to the private use of a telephone.<T3>Comment: </T3>The vast majority of respondents commended the additionof this provision to the statement of resident rights. A few commentersobjected to the phrase ``private use of a telephone'' on the grounds thatfacilities would incur costs by having to provide a phone room or privatelines in all patient rooms. On the other hand, several commenters askedthat we incorporate additional requirements such as wheel-chair accessibility,provision of adaptive equipment for the hearing-impaired, regular accessto a phone as opposed to ``by request to the staff'' and provision of aprivate line for resident use. <T3>Response: </T3>In regard to the provision requiring privacy in telephoneconversations, as well as adaptive equipment for the hearing-impaired,we note that section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 already establishesthe basic right to communication for handicapped individuals. Many residentsof nursing homes are hearing-impaired, and cannot effectively exercisetheir right to communication by telephone without adaptive equipment. Underthese circumstances, we believe that the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 alreadyrequires the provision of privacy during telephone conversations and adaptiveequipment and, therefore, it is not necessary to revise the regulationsspecifically to require this. In our enforcement of the privacy right,we will seek to determine if residents are afforded privacy in telephoneconversations, by whatever means, and hold the facility responsible forthe ultimate outcome. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (k): Self-Determination and Participation </ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(k) that the resident has the right to participatein normal social, religious, and community group activities and to makechoices about significant aspects of his or her life in the facility. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters responded to this provision and to the closelyrelated one under the Administration requirement at andSection; 483.75(u)which requires the facility to ensure resident participation in the facility'spolicy and operational decision-making. We are discussing both provisionsin this section. Commenters on the administration requirement overwhelminglyopposed direct resident participation in comprehensive policy and operationaldecision-making. A strong majority of commenters, while not opposed toresident involvement, wanted resident input channeled through residentgroups and limited to those areas which directly pertain to resident care.Most of these commenters urged inclusion, under this resident rights section,of a right to organize and participate in a resident or family group throughwhich recommendations concerning policies and operations could be made.A minority of commenters, however, asked us to go a step further and requirethe existence of such group. Other Comments are summarized below: andbullet; Commenters criticized the vagueness and unenforceability of thewords ``normal'' group activities and ``significant'' aspects of a resident'slife in the facility; andbullet; Resident advocates noted that the important decisions affectinga resident's life in the facility such as when to eat, whom to share aroom with, what to wear, or when to go to bed are usually out of the resident'scontrol; andbullet; Commenters cited the need for transportation to outside activitiesand residents' desire to have some choice in the selection of, or changesin, roommates. <T3>Response: </T3>Because of the strong support of commenters for theright to organize and participate in resident and family groups, we haveincluded a new provision, titled Participation in resident and family groups.Furthermore, because this provision explicitly addresses residents' socialinteractions and involvement in group activities, we have decided to placeit at andSection; 483.15(c) as part of the quality of life requirement. Thisprovision implements section 1919(c)(1)(A)(vii) of the Act. We are not mandating that resident and family groups exist because we donot believe we have statutory authority, even udner OBRA '87, to do so.We are providing that when residents or their families wish to organize,facilities must allow such organizations to exist, and must provide themwith space and privacy for meetings and staff support and liaison withthe nursing facility's administration. In response to commenters' requests, we are deleting the word ``normal''in describing the resident's right to participate in (normal) social, religious,or community activities, as some commenters requested. We are placing aprovision, titled Participation in other activities, at andSection; 483.15(d)in the quality of life requirement, as it also reflects the ability ofresidents to engage in personally meaningful social behavior. Finally, we are placing a provision, titled Accommodation of needs, inthe quality of life requirement, andSection; 483.15(e). This provision providesthe resident with a guarantee of reasonable accommodation of individualneeds and preferences. At the request of several commenters, we are incorporatinga provision concerning the right to receive notice of changes in room orroommate in this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (l): Personal Property.</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(l) that the resident has the right to retainand use personal possessions and appropriate clothing, within space allocatedby the facility, unless to do so would infringe upon the rights or securityof other residents.<T3>Comment: </T3>Summarized below are the comments on this paragraph.andbullet; Commenters supported the deletion of the ``unless medically contraindicated''qualifier to many of the rights in current regulations;andbullet; Several commenters were concerned that the way the proposed provisionwas expressed, it gave too much discretion to the facility to curtail aresident's retention of, access to, or use of his or her personal property.They proposed changing the phrase, ``within space allocated by the facility,''which was taken from the current SNF regulations to the more neutral, ``asspace permits;''andbullet; Other commenters wanted facilities to have more authority to approveor disapprove of which personal possessions a resident may retain, usuallyon the grounds of safety;andbullet; Commenters suggested that some record and response should be requiredof the facility in cases of lost or damaged personal property, such asmaintaining a written inventory of possessions, investigating incidencesof loss, and reporting suspected theft to police;andbullet; Commenters proposed that facilities be required to provide eachresident with locked storage space in his or her room and to assist residentsin arrangement of stored possessions, particularly seasonal clothing;andbullet; Another commenter proposed that resident councils be identifiedas the vehicle for establishing procedures for resolving disputes betweenresidents in the exercise of their rights to use personal property; andandbullet; Another respondent asked that furniture be explicitly includedamong the personal possessions a resident may retain because having theirown furnishings may aid in orientation of many residents suffering fromAlzheimer's disease or other dementias.<T3>Response</T3>: In view of the IoM recommendations that residents' environmentbe as homelike as possible and that residents retain as much control overtheir lives as possible, we are following the prevailing view of commentersthat the right to have and use personal possessions should not be subjectto medical contraindications. We have also substituted ``as space permits''for the phrase, ``within space allocated by the facility'', thus removingthe facility from the role of sole arbiter of which possessions a residentmay retain. In order to accommodate the legitimate safety concerns of facilities,we have also substituted ``the health and safety'' for the ``security''of other residents.Facility responsibility for lost or damaged personal property of residents,we believe, should be limited to reasonable preventive measures and investigationof incidents of loss or damage.The right to participate in resident groups and the roles ascribed to suchgroups are dealt with in andSection; 483.15(c). Participation in residentand family groups and andSection; 483.15(b), Self-determination and participation.We believe that resident and family groups are appropriate channels forresolving many types of grievances among residents, and between residentsand the facility's administration over the exercise of property rights.We believe that a facility's role in protecting a resident's rights extendsto investigation of incidents of loss or damage and taking appropriatelegal action where it is warranted. Finally, since large numbers of residentssuffer from mental confusion, we have included ``some furnishings'' amongpersonal possessions which a resident may retain.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (m): Married Couples</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.10(m) that the resident has the right to privacyduring visits by his or her spouse, and to share a room with his or herspouse, when married residents live in the same facility.<T3>Comment</T3>: Nearly two-thirds of these comments addressed deletionof the ``unless medically contraindicated'' qualifier to many of the rightscontained in the current regulations, with a strong majority of commentersapplauding the deletion of the phrase. The minority that favored retentionof the qualifer wanted to preserve some flexibility for facilities thatencountered cases of verified verbal or physical spousal abuse, or thatwanted to not accommodate a request when spouses required different levelsof care. Several other commenters mentioned level of care problems withoutproposing retention of the phrase as a solution. In States which have adoptedcase-mix based prospective payment systems such as resource utilizationgroups, commenters were particularly concerned about the cost implicationsof implementing this right.Several commenters raised the question of which spouse's right should prevailin cases where only one spouse wanted to share a room. Most of these commentersurged that consent of both spouses be required. Another sizable group ofcommenters wanted the right to share a room expanded to ``consenting adults''.Some of the commenters urged that facilities be required to state theirroom sharing policies ``up front'' in their written policies on residentrights. Finally, some commenters requested privacy with any visitor withwhom the resident wished to be private.<T3>Response</T3>: Because a number of commenters on this provision andthe one on privacy and confidentiality at andSection; 483.10(e) supportedthis expanded right to privacy during visitation, we have revised andSection;483.10(e) to provide for a general right to privacy. As originally proposed,andSection; 483.10(m)(1) implied that only married couples were entitledto privacy. We are also revising andSection; 483.10(n) to provide that aresident has the right to share a room with his or her spouse when marriedresidents live in the same facility and both spouses consent to the arrangement.In light of the strong support for our deletion of medical contraindicationsas a qualifier of the right of couples to share a room, we have maintainedthis deletion. The thrust of this entire rights section is to enable residentsto make choices for themselves. If a couple wishes to share a room, theyshould be allowed to do so without a physician making the decision forthem that to do so would be unwise or unsafe. We do believe, however, thatthe consent of both spouses should be required, and we are revising paragraph(n), accordingly. We believe that in cases of documented spousal abuse,the facility should use its staff to either resolve difficulties or encouragethe abused spouse to withdraw consent to the room sharing.In regard to level of care problems that may arise with room sharing, OBRA'87 mandates the end to the current SNF and ICF distinction by October1, 1990. In States that currently certify beds simultaneously for bothlevels of care, no barrier exists to accommodating a couple's wish to sharea room, even though they may require differing levels of care. Until October1, 1990 when the OBRA provision takes effect, level of care problems willcontinue to arise in those States that certify individual beds or wingsas either ICF or SNF, because under current law, a resident may not occupya bed certified for a level of care for which he or she is not approved.The number of couples who have simultaneous stays in the same facilityis, however, relatively small; and the number of such spouses who requiredifferent levels of care is smaller still. For the interim period untilthe statute's SNF and ICF distinction is abolished, level of care requirementsmust take precedence over this right in those relatively infrequent casesthat may emerge in affected States. Elsewhere currently, and everywhereafter October 1, 1990, a request by both spouses to share a room must behonored, even if case-mix or other classification groups vary widely. Theincidence of such cases is low enough, we believe, that facilities willnot incur inordinate financial loses by facilitating this right of marriedcouples.At this time, we do not believe that we should require that facilitiesgrant the same right to ``consenting adults'' that we require they accordto married couples by virtue of their legal status. In interpretive guidelines,however, we will require facilities to explain their policies on room sharingrequests to prospective residents prior to admission. We believe that mostfacilities attempt to accommodate residents' wishes and perferences inroommates whenever possible. Nevertheless, the guidelines will encouragesuch accommodation of residents' individual preferences.Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.10The following is a summary of the major changes we are making to andSection;483.10 in response to comments. The organization has been changed fromthe proposed rule due to adding individual Level B requirements or movingthem to other Level A requirements.andbullet; In paragraph (a), we are adding provisions on exercise of a resident'srights by the resident's representative when a resident is adjudicatedincompetent under State law.andbullet; In paragraph (b), Notice of rights and services, we are requiringthat a resident be fully informed of rights both orally and in writingin the language he or she understands.andbullet; In paragraph (b)(5), we specify that a resident has the rightto be fully informed in writing of all services available in the facilityand of charges for those services.andbullet; In paragraph (b)(2), we are requiring that a resident has theright to inspect and photocopy his or her records upon written requestto the facility. The facility is allowed 48 hours to respond to a request.andbullet; In paragraph (c), Protection of resident funds, we specify thata resident is not required to deposit personal funds with the facility,and the resident may designate another party to manage his or her finances.We are placing all requirements concerning protection of resident fundsin paragraph (c).andbullet; In paragraph (d), Free choice, we specify that a resident hasthe right to choose an attending physician, be informed in advance of careand treatment, and to participate in development of his or her plan ofcare.andbullet; In paragraph (e), Privacy and confidentiality, we are adding aresident's right to privacy in accommodations, medical treatment, personalcare, visits and meetings with family and resident groups. Paragraph (e)also provides that a resident has the right to refuse the release of personaland clinical records to any individual outside the facility, except whenrequired to release to another health care institution by law, or thirdparty payment contract.andbullet; We are creating two Level B requirements, abuse and restraints,and placing them in a new Level A requirement, andSection; 483.13, Residentbehavior and facility practices. In andSection; 483.13(b), Abuse, we specifythat a resident has the right to be free of verbal, mental, sexual or physicalabuse and involuntary seclusion.andbullet; In paragraph (f), Grievances, we are adding wording that supportscommenters views that a resident has the right to voice complaints andfile a grievance with respect to treatment or care, and the right to promptefforts by the facility to resolve a grievance.andbullet; In paragraph (h), Work, we are adding the resident's right toperform services for the facility when the need or desire for work is documentedin the plan of care. Details of the services to be performed and compensationfor services must be specified in the plan of care.andbullet; In paragraph (i), Mail, we specify that a resident has the rightto send and receive mail promptly that is unopened.andbullet; In paragraph (j), Access to facility, we are revising the provisionson access to the facility to specify that a resident has a right to receiveimmediate family members or other relatives at any hour, and other visitorsat a reasonable hour by arrangement with the facility. andbullet; We are revising paragraph (l), Telephone, to provide that a residenthas the right to the private use of a telephone. andbullet; We have created several separate requirements from the proposedparagraph (p), Self-determination and participation, reflecting resident'srights concerning activities, interaction with members of the community,accommodation of individual needs and preference, notice before a changein room or roommate, and organization of, and participation in residentand family groups. We have placed these provisions in a revised qualityof life requirement andSection;483.15(b), (c), (d) and (e). andbullet; To paragraph (m), Personal property, we are adding a resident'sright to retain and use personal possessions ``as space permits.'' andbullet; To paragraph (n), Married couples, we are adding a resident'sright to share a room in a facility when both spouses consent to the arrangement.Section 483.12 Admission Transfer and Discharge Rights Requirement In this final rule, we are creating a new Level A requirement called Admissiontransfer and discharge rights, andSection;483.12, based on wording from OBRA'87 provisions. The provisions included in this new requirement appearin the following paragraphs: (a) Transfer and discharge (proposed as andSection;483.75(r) (3), (4) and(5)). (b) Notice of bed-hold policy and readmission (OBRA '87 effective 10/1/90).(c) Equal access to quality care (OBRA '87 effective 10/1/90). (d) Admissions policy (OBRA '87 effective 10/1/90). We are responding to comments on transfer and discharge provisions at thelocation at which they appeared in the proposed rule. We are adding asparagraph (b), Notice of bed-hold policy and readmission, effective October1, 1990, which largely incorporates OBRA '87 provisions in new section1919(c)(2)(D) of the Act. This paragraph requires that facilities providewritten information to the resident and a family member or legal representativethat specifies the duration of the bed-hold policy, if any, under the Stateplan, and the facility's policies on bed hold periods before a residentis transferred to a hospital or for therapeutic leave, and at the timeof transfer. In paragraph (c), Equal access to quality care, we are implementing theOBRA '87 provision in new section 1919(c)(4) of the Act, which providesthat, effective October 1, 1990, a facility must establish and maintainidentical policies and practices regarding transfer, discharge, and theprovision of services under the State plan for all individuals regardlessof source of payment. Paragraph (d), Admissions policy, incorporates OBRA '87 provisions in section1919(c)(5) of the Act, effective October 1, 1990, which prohibit facilitiesfrom_ andbullet; Requiring a third party guarantee of payment as a condition ofadmission, expedited admission, or continued stay in the facility; andandbullet; Charging, soliciting, accepting or receiving, in addition to anyamount required to be paid under the State plan, any gift, money, donationor other consideration as a condition of admission, expedited admissionor continued stay in the facility.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Even though this regulation does not take effect until theeffective date of OBRA '87, the identical provisions are already in effectas a result of section 1128B of the Act.</ITAG>Effective October 1, 1990, a facility must not_ andbullet; Require residents or potential residents to waive their rightsto Medicare or Medicaid, and andbullet; Require oral or written assurance that residents or potentialresidents are not eligible, or will not apply for, Medicare or Medicaidbenefits. These provisions are intended to prevent discrimination againstindividuals entitled to Medicaid benefits. Section 483.15 Quality of Life Requirement In the Quality of Life requirement at andSection;483.15 we proposed thatthe facility must ensure that residents receive care in a manner and inan environment that maintains or enhances their quality of life withoutabridging the safety and rights of others by (a) treating each residentwith dignity and respect and (b) maintaining each resident's privacy. <T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter noted that the Quality of Life requirementis too vague and its individual provisions should be integrated into otherexisting requirements. For example, provisions dealing with Choice (483.15(c))and Dignity (483.15(a)) should be within the Residents Rights requirement(483.10), and the provision on Environment should be placed within thePhysical Environment requirement at andSection;483.70. The commenters reasonedthat integrating the Quality of Life provisions within other specific existingrequirements would decrease the risk that this requirement will be subjectivelyevaluated by surveyors. <T3>Response: </T3>Quality of life is a complex concept reflecting thecharacteristics of an individual's relationship to his social and physicalenvironment. Quality of life has both residents' rights and physical environmentdimensions. It reflects the relationship between the resident and the physicaland human environment in which he or she lives. After examining commentsreceived on the proposed quality of life requirement and on the proposedresident rights requirements, we have chosen to reorganize the proposedquality of life requirement to include those provisions that best reflectan individual's ability to influence, and be influenced by, his or herphysical and social environments and to participate fully in these environmentsto the full extent of his or her functional abilities.The revised provisions of the quality of life requirement appear in thefollowing paragraphs:<ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(a) Dignity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(b) Self-determination and participation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(c) Participation in resident and family groups</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(d) Participation in other activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(e) Accommodation of needs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(f) Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(g) Social services</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection;483.15(h) Environment</ITAG>Paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of andSection;483.15 have already beendiscussed under revisions to the proposed rights requirement.<T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters objected to the use of the word ``ensure''in the requirement that ``the facility must ensure that residents receivecare * * * that maintains or enhances their quality of life * * *'', aswell as in other parts of the proposed regulations, because it impliesguarantees, and it creates an unrealistic burden on the facility.<T3>Response:</T3> We agree that when used in certain contexts, the word``ensure'' could inappropriately be construed as imposing on the facilityan absolute responsibility to achieve a prescribed result, without allowingfor factors that are clearly beyond its ability to control. In these finalregulations, we are attempting to address this concern, either by limitingthe use of the word ``ensure'' to factors for which the facility appropriatelycan be held responsible (such as the conduct of its own employees), orby allowing for exceptions when warranted by external circumstances thatthe facility cannot reasonably be expected to control (see the subsequentpreamble discussion of this issue in connection with resident care outcomesunder the Quality of Care requirement).<T3>Comment:</T3> A commenter noted that andSection;483.15(a), Dignity, requiresthat the facility treat each resident with dignity and respect, and suggestedadding, ``in full recognition of his or her individuality.'' Other commentersrequested that we specify that residents must be examined or be treatedby physicians or other consultants in a private area, examination roomor other room.<T3>Response:</T3> We are modifying the wording of paragraph (a), Dignity,by adding, ``in full recognition of his or her individuality.'' With regardto assuring resident privacy during treatment or examination, we believewe have addressed this issue adequately within the resident rights requirementat andSection;483.10(e)(1), which privides that ``the resident has the rightto personal privacy with regard to accommodations, medical treatment, personalcare, visits, and meetings of family and resident groups.''<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (b): Environment</ITAG>Proposed andSection;483.15(b) requires the facility to provide a clean, comfortable,homelike environment, housekeeping and maintenance service, clean bed linensand secure and private closet space in each resident's room.<T3>Comment:</T3> Many commenters questioned the meaning of the term ``homelike,''and either wanted it clarified, defined or deleted. One commenter notedthat, while a facility may be cheerful, warm and colorful, for example,a truly homelike environment is incompatible with accepted safety and sanitationparameters. One commenter suggested adding to andSection;483.15(b)(1), ``asafe, clean, comfortable homelike, and least restrictive environment.''Another suggested that there should be a therapeutic environment whichmaximizes functional independence.<T3>Response:</T3> We wish to retain the reference to homelike environmentas one that deemphasizes the institutional character of the setting, tothe extent possible, and allows the resident to use those personal belongingsthat support a homelike environment. This is in accordance with the proposedrequirement at andSection;483.10(m) on personal property, and with section1919(c)(1)(A)(v) of the Act, added by OBRA 87, which establishes the resident'sright to ``reside and receive services with reasonable accommodations ofindividual needs and preferences.'' In this final rule we have relocatedthis provision as andSection;483.15(h), Environment, under the Quality oflife requirement.In regard to the comment requesting requirements for architectural safeguardsto accommodate a ``least restrictive environment,'' or a ``therapeuticenvironment, which maximizes functional independence,'' we do not believethese terms would be more descriptive or go any further in assisting thesurveyor in identifying non-compliant facilities than the term ``homelike.''<T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter recommended structural requirements, (e.g.,room size and furnishings) since the immediate environment has a directbearing on the quality of the resident's life. Another commenter recommendedAmerican National Standards Institute (ANSI) standards in making facilitiesaccessible to the handicapped to produce an environment that encouragesindependence. Some commenters provided specific suggestions as to requirementsfor room size, room temperatures, ventilation, lighting and sound levels,furniture arrangement (non-institutional in arrangement), and adaptablecall systems (i.e., a call system that can be used by the physically handicappedor the vision impaired).<T3>Response: </T3> The commenters' concerns regarding structural requirementsrelative to room size and furnishings are addressed in the revised physicalenvironment requirement. Section 483.70(d)(1)(ii) requires that the bedroomsmeasure at least 80 square feet per resident in multiple resident bedroomsand at least 100 square feet per resident in single resident rooms; andandSection; 483.70(d)(2)(iv) requires the facility to provide each residentwith functional furniture appropriate to the resident's needs. Specificrequirements for ventilation and lighting levels also are addressed atandSection; 483.70(g), which requires the facility to provide a comfortableenvironment for residents. With regard to the comment that we include provisions requiring that facilitiesbe accessible to the handicapped, we believe the administration requirementat andSection; 483.75 is a more appropriate place for this concern. In revisedandSection; 483.75(d), relationship to other HHS regulations, we are referencingapplicable provisions of other HHS regulations that facilities are obligedto meet, including but not limited to those pertaining to nondiscriminationon the basis of handicap. With regard to adapting call systems to the specialneeds of the physically handicapped or vision impaired, we believe theRehabilitation Act of 1973 provides that residents with handicaps mustbe provided with a means to summon staff when necessary.<T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed andSection; 483.15(b)(3) requires the facilityto provide clean bed linens. Many of the commenters wanted an expansionof this language to include bath linen that are in good condition. Onecommenter suggested the inclusion of a requirement for ``linen handlingtechniques.'' <T3>Response: </T3> We believe that this comment can best be accommodatedby expanding the environment requirement at andSection;483.15(h)(3) to read``clean bed and bath linen that are in good condition''. We do not believeit necessary to include a requirement for linen handling technique becausethis is covered within the infection control requirement at andSection; 483.65(c),which provides that personnel must handle, store, process and transportlinens so as to prevent the spread of infection. <T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed andSection; 483.15(b)(4) requires the facilityto provide secure and private closet space in each resident's room. Manycommenters wanted clarification of the word ``secure'' as some believeda locked space without appropriate facility access could have potentiallyadverse results if a resident stores food or other items inconsistent withaccepted health and safety practices. One commenter suggested adding, ``thefacility may inspect and monitor and clean out as necessary.'' Anothercommenter recommended deletion of ``secure'' and ``each,'' as often itis financially infeasible to provide ``each'' resident with a ``secure''and private closet space, thus making this requirement difficult to meet.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree with commenters that ``secure'' storage wouldbe difficult to define short of actually specifying ``locked'' storagewhich would be prohibitively expensive. We have, however, retained theword ``private'' and will expect providers to respect the privacy of residentsin this regard. The recommendation that we allow the facility routinely``to inspect and monitor and clean out as necessary'' residents' closetspace, would conflict with the IoM's recommendation for increased privacyfor residents. However, in guidelines we will allow a facility to inspecta resident's storage space when the facility has documented sound reasonto believe that stored items pose a threat to the health and safety ofresidents.<T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed andSection; 483.15(b)(5) requires the facilityto ``provide for a pest control program to ensure that the facility isfree of rodents and pests.'' A few commenters suggested deleting from andSection;483.15(b)(5) the phrase ``to ensure that the facility is free of rodentsand pests''. They believe that, although the facility should provide apest control program, the facility cannot ensure that it is free from rodentsand pests with daily deliveries of food and other supplies. One commentersuggested adding the word ``effective'' before pest control program.<T3>Response: </T3>We recognize that it is difficult to maintain an absolutelypest free environment and have deleted the word ``ensure.'' However, thefacility must maintain an effective pest control program that keeps thephysical plant as free of pests as is possible. These changes appear atandSection; 483.70(h)(4).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c): Choice</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.15(c) requires the facility to permit residentsto choose activities, schedules and health care, consistent with theirinterests, assessments and plans of care, and permit residents to interactwith members of the community both inside and outside the facility.<T3>Comment: </T3>Section 483.15(c) requires the facility to permit residentsto choose activities, schedules and health care, consistent with theirinterests, assessments and plans of care, and permit residents to interactwith members of the community both inside and outside the facility. A commenternoted that in large facilities it would be chaotic to have residents ondifferent schedules and expect quality care to be given, particularly sincenurse staffing differs on each shift. A number of the commenters objectedto the use of the word ``permit.'' One suggested instead the use of ``encourage''or ``motivate'' as the word ``permit'' gives the facility total authority,and other commenters suggested that the word be deleted.<T3>Response: </T3>We are deleting this requirement because it is coveredin the Quality of life requirement at andSection; 483.15(d), Participationin other activities, andSection; 483.10(d) Free choice and andSection; 483.15(b)Self-determination and participation.<T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters recommended that choices be limitedto ``reasonable'' choices consistent with facility schedule as a facilitymust be operated within some organizational constraints. Within this context,a commenter suggested modifying this language to ``permit residents toparticipate in making choices'' rather than allowing full control, sincethis may be medically contraindicated.<T3>Response:</T3> Since the emphasis of these regulations is on the resident'squality of life, and the sense of control over their lives is a major partof this emphasis, we chose not to limit the resident's choices consistentwith the facility's schedule. With respect to residents' making choiceswhich may be medically contraindicated, we believe the resident's planof care would provide the proper constraints necessary. In andSection;483.15(b),Self-determination and participation, we provide that residents have thefreedom to choose activities, schedules and health care consistent withtheir interests, assessments, and plans of care.<T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters suggested expansion of andSection;483.15(c)to ensure residents' opportunity to exercise choices in all areas significantto them, including not only activities, schedules and health care, butfood and diet, room decor, association (choice of roommate, physician anddirect caregivers), resident appearance, clothes and use of personal funds.<T3>Response:</T3> The residents rights requirement, in general, addressesall issues listed by the commenter except that of association (specificallychoice of roommate). We believe residents may more appropriately exercisechoice in areas indicated by the commenters through resident groups foundat andSection;483.15(c).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d): Food</ITAG>This provision requires the facility to prepare food by methods that conservenutritive value, flavor and appearance; serve attractive food at propertemperatures; and provide food that meets individual needs and offer substitutesof similar nutritive value to residents who refuse food served. Many commentsin this area were commingled with those on our dietary services requirement(proposed andSection;483.35), so the following discussion deals with commonissues.<T3>Comment:</T3> A commenter recommended modifying the dietary servicesrequirement, andSection;483.35 under the provision concerning frequency ofmeals at paragraph (d)(3), to read, ``Provide food `prepared in a formdesigned' to meet individual needs.'' The intent of this change would beto clarify that foods must not only be nutritionally adequate, but mustalso be served in a form that the resident is capable of ingesting.<T3>Response:</T3> We are modifying the requirement on dietary services,andSection;483.35(d)(3) according to the commenter's recommendation to includethe phrase, ``prepared in a form designed'' to meet individual needs.<T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters recommended that we define properfood temperatures, and distinguish between holding temperatures on a trayline and acceptable temperatures at the point of delivery. They recommended140 degrees Fahrenheit or above as holding temperatures on a tray linefor hot foods, but 110 degrees Fahrenheit as safe and acceptable when foodreaches the point of delivery. Commenters suggested 45 degrees or belowfor cold foods.<T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe that it is necessary to define temperaturelimits in regulations, but we intend to issue guidelines to ensure thatthe food is served at the proper temperature and under sanitary conditions.<T3>Comment:</T3> Proposed andSection;483.15(d)(4) requires the facilityto offer substitutes of similar nutritive value to residents who refusefood. A commenter suggested that we permit a resident who does not havean identified nutritional problem, and a resident with a diagnosed nutritionalproblem who has the approval of the attending physician, to select foodsubstitutes that are not necessarily nutritionally similar to those inregular or therapeutic diets. <T3>Response:</T3> With regard to allowing residents to select food substitutesthat are not nutritionally similar, we emphasize that the facility is ultimatelyresponsible for the health of the residents. Thus, the facility must ensurethat the resident is provided with a nutritionally adequate diet. Theremay be occasions when residents might request substitutes that are notnutritionally similar, but these occasions should not interfere with residents'long term nutritional status.<T3>Comment:</T3> A commenter suggested that in andSection; 483.15(d)(4),we replace, ``Offer substitutes of similar nutritive value to residentswho refuse food served'' with, ``must provide at least one alternativeat every meal.'' Another commenter suggested that we provide that residentsmust be consulted in advance in the planning of all menus.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe that it is necessary to retain paragraph(d)(4) of andSection; 483.15, as proposed, so that the resident be providedsome choice when a personally unacceptable food is served. However, wehave moved this provision on food to andSection; 483.35(d), under the Dietaryservices requirement. We would not want to prescribe how many alternativesthe facility must provide because the resident already has the opportunityto request a substitute that serves the same purpose. We believe that itwould not be practical for a facility to consult in advance with residentsin the planning of all menus, but residents may certainly participate inmeal planning through recommendations to their resident group, when oneexists.<T3>Comment:</T3> A commenter recommended that we add an additional requirementto proposed andSection; 483.15(d) to read, ``Where appropriate, have seasonings,condiments and beverages available for residents.''<T3>Response:</T3> We believe this recommendation is too prescriptive.We believe that, generally, facilities would be receptive to reasonablerequests from residents as long as the items requested are not medicallycontraindicated, but that facilities should be allowed to determine whatitems are available.<T3>Comment: </T3> A commenter suggested the addition of the followingrequirement on dining areas: ``Dining areas should be clean, comfortableand attractive, and there should be sufficient staff to assist residentsand promote independence in living. Assistive devices should be availableand utilized to promote independence in living.''<T3>Response:</T3> We believe it is redundant to add a provision on diningareas under this requirement since this already is addressed in the physicalenvironment requirement at andSection; 483.70(g), Dining and resident activities.Section 483.70(g) provides that the facility must provide one or more roomsdesignated for resident dining, and paragraph (h) provides that a facilitymust provide a functional, sanitary and comfortable environment for residents.We are making a change in andSection; 483.35 under the dietary services requirement.We are adding a new paragraph (b), Sufficient staff, that requires thatthe facility employ sufficient support personnel competent to carry outthe functions of the dietary service. Assistive devices, addressed in theNPRM at andSection; 483.35(e), Assistive devices, has been redesignated asandSection; 483.35(g) in this final rule, and provides that the facilitymust provide special eating equipment and utensils for residents who needthem.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (e): Activities</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.15(e) provides that the facility must provide foran ongoing program of activities appropriate to residents' needs and interestsdesigned to promote opportunities for engaging in normal pursuits, includingreligious activities of their choice. The current requirement at andSection;405.1131 (Patient Activities) requires the facility to provide an ongoingactivity program appropriate to the needs and interests of each patientand approved as not in conflict with the plan of treatment. It designatesa member of the facility's staff as responsible for the activities program,who, if not a qualified patient activities coordinator, functions withfrequent regularly scheduled consultation from a person so qualified.<T3>Comment: </T3> The majority of commenters opposed the proposal to deletethe current requirement that a professionally qualified individual be responsiblefor the activities program, or requested retention of the current requirementat andSection; 405.1131. Commenters recommended that we delineate qualificationsfor this individual to be included within the staffing qualifications atandSection; 483.75(k)(2), and suggested including therapeutic recreationspecialists, therapeutic recreation assistants, and occupational therapists,or occupational therapist assistants. Many of these commenters also wantedto add another category_a person who has attained or who is eligible toattain certification from the National Certification Council for ActivityProfessionals. They reasoned that a professionally qualified individualshould be responsible for the direction of the activities program, whichis vital to the life of the residents in a long term care facility. Theyexpressed particular concern about the present activities provision beinglowered from an A-level to a B-level requirement as they believed thissignificantly diminishes the importance of the activities program. Manyof them noted that, although volunteers are important to these programs,they did not believe that volunteers should be used in lieu of a trainedstaff, nor could volunteers be effective without the leadership of a qualifiedactivity director.<T3>Response:</T3> In accordance with IoM's recommendation, and in recognitionof the importance of resident's sense of life satisfaction, we createda new requirement on Quality of Life, which includes a provision on activities.Since activities has a strong relationship to the quality of life, we believeit is important that it remain as a part of this requirement. Also, basedupon OBRA '87 provisions, we are requiring an on-going program of activities,directed by a qualified professional, designed to meet the interests andthe physical, mental, and psychological well-being of each resident. Indoing so, we are accommodating the overwhelming number of commenters whoobjected to the deletion of the patient activities coordinator and thequalifications for this individual found in current regulations at andSection;405.1101(o). We are providing that an activities program must be directedby a qualified professional who: andbullet; Is a qualified therapeutic recreation specialist, licensed orregistered, if applicable, by the State in which practicing, and eligiblefor certification as a therapeutic recreation specialist by a recognizedaccrediting body; or andbullet; Has 2 years of experience in a social or recreational programwithin the last 5 years, 1 of which was full-time in a patient activitiesprogram in a health care setting; orandbullet; Is a qualified occupational therapist or occupational therapyassistant. Any organization which alleges competency as an accrediting body for thisdiscipline may ask the Secretary for recognition in this regard. <T3>Comment:</T3> Many of the commenters who requested that we retain thecurrent requirement at andSection; 405.1131, recommended adding another toit which would contain three types of therapeutic activities: andbullet; Supportive-activities that provide stimulation or solace to residentswho cannot generally benefit from either maintenance or empowerment activities,as defined below; andbullet; Maintenance-activities that provide a schedule of events thatpromote physical, cognitive, social and emotional health; and andbullet; Empowerment-activities that promote increased self-respect byproviding opportunities for self-expression, personal responsibility andchoice. <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that these objectives are sound and shouldbe a part of any activities program. However, we do not believe they needto be a necessary part of a regulation. As a guide to our surveyors, wewill present this material in the interpretive guidelines. Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.15In summary, the changes we are making to andSection; 483.15 are as follows:We are: andbullet; Deleting proposed paragraph (c), Choice; andbullet; Relocating paragraph (d), Food, to Dietary services andSection;483.35(d); andbullet; Including in paragraph (f), Activities, qualifications for anactivities professional to direct the activities program; andbullet; Adding social services as new paragraph (g), having relocatedthe content from proposed andSection; 483.50; and andbullet; Revising requirements included in paragraph (h), Environmentalquality of life. Section 483.20 Resident Assessment RequirementIn andSection; 483.20, we proposed that a facility must conduct initiallyand periodically thereafter a comprehensive, accurate assessment of eachresident's medical, functional and psychosocial needs. <T3>Comment:</T3> Summarized below are the major issues and concerns raisedby commenters: Time frames_Some commenters believe that the requirement that a facilitycomplete a preliminary assessment within 48 hours of admission and a comprehensiveassessment within 14 days was insufficient time; others thought the timeallowed was too long. Preliminary assessment_Commenters thought_andbullet; The assessment should be completed by a nurse; andbullet; It is unrealistic to require a physician to come to a facilityto complete a medical evaluation at the time of admission; andbullet; Preliminary assessments are duplicative of other assessments;andbullet; Rehabilitation potential should be evaluated not only by a physicianat the preliminary assessment but by an interdisciplinary team; andbullet; When a resident is admitted to a facility, there should be admissionorders by the attending physician, which address medications, treatmentand diet. Comprehensive assessment_Commenters stated_ andbullet; Dietitians should be part of the assessment team; andbullet; Assessments for ICF residents should not be as extensive as forSNF residents; andbullet; We should define ``significant change requiring a reevaluationof the comprehensive assessment'' in andSection; 483.20(b)(2)(ii); andbullet; We should institute a standard, uniform resident assessment instrument;andbullet; In the comprehensive assessment, we should include dental condition,activities potential, rehabilitation potential, drug therapy, and cognitivestatus. Accuracy of assessments_Commenters recommended that we delete the requirementthat assessments be an accurate representation of a resident's status.Comprehensive care plans_Commenters recommended that comprehensive careplans be developed by an interdisciplinary team. <T3>Response: </T3>Timeframes: Although several commenters suggested that14 days to complete the first comprehensive assessment is far too long,there was no clear mandate from commenters regarding the timeframe. Wetherefore are leaving the timeframe in the final rule at 14 days. Section1919(b)(3)(C) of the Act, as added by OBRA '87, establishing a 4-day periodfor completion of the assessment, effective October 1, 1990, which we areimplementing in andSection; 483.20(b)(4)(ii). Until October 1, 1990, in andSection;483.20(b)(4)(i), we are requiring an assessment no later than 14 days afterthe date of admission, which allows providers a transition period in whichto gradually move toward the shorter timeframe. Since the comprehensive assessment must be completed within 4 days of admission,effective October 1, 1990, we are not making final the proposed requirementthat within 40 hours of admission, a facility must complete a preliminaryassessment of each resident. <T3>Preliminary assessment: </T3>Based on our evaluation of comments, weare revising the final rule to include the following: andbullet; We are adding the requirement that at the time each resident isadmitted, the facility must have physician orders for the resident's immediatecare. This appears as a new paragraph (a), Admission orders, under thisrequirement and was proposed at andSection; 483.20(a)(1). andbullet; We are eliminating the requirement for a preliminary assessment.In the NPRM, we did not designate specific facility personnel to performthe assessment.andbullet; The need to assess rehabilitation potential has been placed underthe comprehensive assessment, which is completed by an interdisciplinaryteam including a physician.<T3>Comprehensive assessment: </T3>We respond to commenters concerns asfollows:andbullet; We agree with commenters that the comprehensive assessment shouldalso include dental condition, activities potential, rehabilitation potentialand cognitive status, and drug therapy and are modifying requirements accordingly.andbullet; Consistent with comments, we are requiring that a comprehensivecare plan be prepared by appropriate health professionals. Beginning October1, 1990, each assessment must be conducted or coordinated by a registerednurse who signs and certifies the completion of the assessment.andbullet; Consistent with the proposed rule at andSection; 483.20(b)(2)(i)and section 1919(b)(3)(C)(ii) of the Act, we are retaining the requirementthat facilities review the resident no less frequently than once every3 months, and promptly after a significant change in the resident's physicalor mental condition to assure the continuing accuracy of the assessment.andbullet; We will develop an operational definition of ``significant changes''requiring a review of the resident as part of constructing the residentassessment instrument and guidelines for its use prior to the effectiveimplementation date of October 1, 1990.andbullet; Effective October 1, 1990, section 1919(b)(3)(E) of the Act, asadded by OBRA 1987, provides that assessments should be coordinated withState-required preadmission screening programs to the maximum extent practicableto avoid duplicative testing.andbullet; In accordance with section 1919(f)(6) of the Act, added by OBRA1987, the Secretary must specify a minimum data set of core elements andcommon definitions for facilities to use in conducting comprehensive assessmentsby January 1, 1989. Further OBRA 1987 requires the Secretary to designateone or more resident assessment instruments for conducting the assessmentsbased on the minimum data set by April 1, 1990. By July 1, 1990, Statesmust designate the resident assessment instrument facilities must use;either the assessment instrument developed by the Secretary or one thathas been approved by the Secretary as including the minimum data set.andbullet; In accordance with section 1919(b)(3)(F) of the Act, we are requiringthat a facility not admit, on or after January 1, 1989, an individual withmental illness or mental retardation unless the individual requires thelevel of services provided by the nursing facility.In place of the NPRM's requirement that assessments be an accurate representationof a resident's status, we are requiring that each individual who completesa portion of the assessment must sign and certify the accuracy of thatportion of the assessment.Summary of Revisions to andSection; 483.20In addition to technical revisions, we are making the following changesto andSection; 483.20.andbullet; In andSection; 483.20, we are adding a new paragraph (a), Admissionorders, to require that the facility have physician orders for the resident'simmediate care when a resident is admitted.andbullet; We are eliminating the proposed requirement that a preliminaryassessment be conducted within 48 hours of admission.andbullet; In paragraph (b), Comprehensive assessments, we are requiringthat each assessment must be conducted or coordinated with the appropriateparticipation of health professionals, and effective October 1, 1990, bya registered nurse who conducts or coordinates the completion of the assessment.andbullet; In paragraph (b), we are including dental condition, activitiesand rehabilitation potential, drug therapy, and cognitive status amongthe required elements of a comprehensive assessment.andbullet; In paragraph (c), Accuracy of assessments, we require that eachindividual who completes a portion of the assessment must sign and certifythe accuracy of that portion of the assessment.andbullet; In paragraph (d), Comprehensive care plans, we require that thecomprehensive care plan be prepared by an interdisciplinary team whichafter October 1, 1990 includes the resident, the resident's family or legalrepresentative, a physician, a registered nurse, and other staff in disciplinesdetermined by the resident's needs.andbullet; In new paragraph (f), Requirements relating to preadmission screeningfor mentally ill and mentally retarded individuals, we provide that, onor after January 1, 1989, a facility must not admit an individual withmental illness or mental retardation unless the State mental health authorityor the State mental retardation or developmental disability authority hasdetermined that the individual requires the level of care furnished bythe facility.Section 483.25 Quality of Care RequirementIn andSection; 483.25, we proposed that each resident must receive the necessarynursing, medical and psychosocial services to attain and maintain the highestpossible mental and physical functional status, as defined by the comprehensiveassessment and plan of care.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Objected to the regulation's purpose of removing structural requirementsin favor of outcome requirements; andandbullet; Recommended that the quality of care and quality of life provisionsbe incorporated into, for example, nursing, physician, dietary, requirements,which would eliminate unnecessary duplication of deficiencies and crossreferencing.<T3>Response: </T3>We have considered these comments and, in this finalrule, we are restoring some structure and process requirements. Specifically,we are reinstating qualifications for dietitians, social workers, and activitiescoordinators. We recognize that overlap exists between the quality of careand medical and nursing requirements. We have intentionally shifted emphasison certain resident outcomes that are included in the quality of care requirement,even though those resident outcomes could fit into a specific medical ornursing area. However, the resident outcome provisions are not duplicativeand only appear in the quality of care requirement.<T3>Comment: </T3>We proposed a number of requirements that hold the facilityresponsible for ``ensuring'' that residents receive the proper care andtreatment and do not decline ``unless reasonable justification is documented.''Most of the comments on this section concerned the phrase ``the facilitymust ensure.'' Commenters emphasized that a facility cannot control orbe responsible for all variables surrounding the deterioration or diminishedcapacity of residents. Twenty commenters objected to the phrase, ``reasonablejustification is documented,'' because the proposed regulation does notmake it clear who will provide the documentation, documentation is no substitutefor care, and the heavy emphasis on documentation is already a problemarea and goes against the intent of the regulation to look at patient outcomes.<T3>Response: </T3>We recognize that a facility cannot ensure that thetreatment and services will result in a positive outcome since outcomescan depend on many factors, including a resident's cooperation (i.e., theright to refuse treatment), and disease processes. However, we believethat it is reasonable to require the facility to ensure that ``treatmentand services'' are provided, since the basic purpose for residents beingin the facility is for ``treatment and services'' and that is why the Medicareor Medicaid program makes payment on the residents' behalf. We also thinkit is reasonable to require the facility to ensure that the resident doesnot deteriorate within the confines of a resident's right to refuse treatmentand within the confines of recognized pathology and the normal aging process.We are restating the opening statement of this requirement to reflect thisemphasis.We agree with the commenters that the terminology, ``unless reasonablejustification is documented,'' could result in a focus on paperwork insteadof the resident. Therefore, we have replaced that language in the severalplaces where it was proposed (andSection; 483.25(a)(1), (c)(1), (f)(1), (g)(1),and (h)(2)) with, ``unless the individual's clinical condition demonstratesthat'' the resident care outcome (e.g., pressure sore) was ``unavoidable.''This wording will permit the facility to direct surveyor attention to anyevidence (the resident or the resident's clinical record) in order to showthat a negative resident care outcome was unavoidable.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a): Activities of Daily Living</ITAG>We proposed that a resident's ability to ambulate, dress, feed, groom,bathe, toilet, transfer (i.e., from bed to chair) does not diminish unlessreasonable justification is documented.<T3>Comment: </T3>Comments are summarized as follows:andbullet; Commenters asked that each of the resident's activities be brokenout as separate statements since activities of daily living require differentinterventions to maintain an appropriate level of functioning.andbullet; One commenter asked that foot care be included in andSection; 483.25,since foot care is a concern for the resident population and residentsshould be afforded the same access to care as for vision and hearing.<T3>Response:</T3> Summary of responses: andbullet; We have decided to break out the activities of daily living toaccommodate commenters, and we are including the ability to use speech,language, or other functional communication systems; and andbullet; We have added podiatric care to the list of special needs in andSection;483.25(k);<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (b): Vision and Hearing </ITAG>We proposed that a facility must, if necessary, assist the resident inmaking appointments and arranging for transportation to and from a medicalpractitioner specializing in the treatment of vision and hearing impairmentsor vision or hearing assistive devices. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters wanted assurance that staff time andtransportation is paid for under the Medicaid and Medicare programs. Commentersargued that making appointments and arranging transportation will not assureresidents proper assistive devices since many of the residents have nomeans to pay for such devices. This provision will only assure that theresidents are assessed. <T3>Response:</T3> The intent of this provision is to require a facilityto assist residents in gaining access to vision and hearing services bymaking appointments and arranging for transportation. In accordance withsection 1902(a)(13)(A) of the Act, States are required to provide reasonableand adequate reimbursement to meet the costs incurred in order to providecare and services in conformity with State and Federal laws and regulations.Thus making appointments and providing transportation to obtain visionand hearing services are among the services the rates must be designedto cover. These costs should be included in a facility's reimbursementrate. Vision, dental and hearing assistive devices are optional Medicaidbenefits, which are covered by some, but not all jurisdictions. Based ona recent survey of Medicaid services, 75 percent of all jurisdictions providedental services, 84 percent provide for eyeglasses, and 59 percent coverspeech, hearing and language disorders. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c): Decubitus Ulcers (Pressure Sores) </ITAG>We proposed at andSection;483.25(c) that a facility must ensure that a residententering a facility without decubitus ulcers does not develop decubitusulcers unless a physician certifies they were not reasonably avoidable,and a resident having decubitus ulcers receives necessary treatment andservices to promote healing, prevent infection and prevent new uclers fromdeveloping. <T3>Comment:</T3> A majority of commenters objected to the proposed requirementin andSection;483.25(c) that a physician certify that decubitus ulcers werenot reasonably avoidable, since physicians are not fully aware of the conditionand don't consider themselves responsible for documenting and certifyingthat decubitus ulcers were not reasonably avoidable. Several commentersasked that ``medical and nutritional'' treatment and services be specifiedin the regulation for residents having decubitus ulcers. Commenters objectedto the term ``decubitus ulcers'' since it is no longer the accepted nomenclature.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to comments regarding the term ``decubitusulcers,'' we have renamed them and this paragraph ``pressure sores.'' Weagree with the comments in regard to a physican certification of unavoidablepressure sores, and have revised andSection;483.25(c)(1) to specify, ``Aresident who enters the facility without pressure sores does not developpressure sores unless the individual's clinical condition demonstratesthat pressure sores were unavoidable.'' The requirement in andSection;483.25(c)(2)that a resident receive treatment and services include medical, nutritional,or nursing services depending on the circumstances of the resident. Consequently,we have not changed paragraph (c)(2) to include all the possible disciplinesthat might conceivably have input to these problems. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d): Antipsychotic Drugs </ITAG>In andSection;483.25(d) we proposed to require that a physician certify thatthe use of antipsychotics was necessary to treat a specific condition,and to require that residents who use antipsychotics receive gradual dosereductions, drug holidays and behavioral programming in an effort to discontinuethese drugs. <T3>Comment:</T3> About 25 commenters expressed views on this proposal.Many wanted a definition of antipsychotic drugs. Others objected becausethey felt this was a duplication of the basic objective of the drug regimenreview requirement of proposed andSection;483.60(e). A significant numberof the commenters objected to the requirement for gradual dose reduction,drug holidays and behavioral programming because such interventions arethe prerogative of the physician, or because these interventions are adisservice to residents who need these drugs to control psychotic symptoms.<T3>Response:</T3> We have relocated this provision to andSection;483.25(1),Drug therapy. The term antipsychotic drug includes the drugs from the followingchemical classes: phenothiazines, butyrophenones, and thioxanthenes. Inaddition, the individual drugs loxapine and molindone are included. Thisgroup of drugs does not include certain phenothiazines when used in thetreatment of nausea, and vomiting or itching. These drugs are commonlyused to treat psychotic disorders, and typically induce depressed initiative,decreased affect, disinterest in surroundings, suppression of complex behaviorand spontaneous movements, decreased aggressiveness and impulsivity, anddecreased psychotic symptoms. These drugs can also cause significant, sometimesirreversible side effects such as involuntary movements of the eyes, face,mouth, tongue, toes, as well as a shuffling gait, and tremors at rest.With regard to the commenters that thought the drug regimen review requirementshould adequately address the problem of inappropriate antipsychotic druguse, we point out that the drug regimen review cannot modify the fundamentaldiagnosis made by the physician upon which antipsychotic drug use is predicated.Certain authors estimate that a significant number of the elderly in nursinghomes are improperly labeled as having organic brain syndrome or seniledementia of the Alzheimers type and many of these residents are treatedwith antipsychotics. Fundamentally, this is why we have modified the finalrule by deleting the requirement that a ``physician certify'' that a residentneeds these drugs for a specific condition. Instead, the regulations simplyrequire that antipsychotic drugs are not given to residents ``unless theyare necessary to treat a specific condition.'' Enforcement of this requirementwill rely primarily on the determination of the State mental health authorityas to whether the resident is mentally ill and in need of active treatment.If the resident does not need active treatment for a mental illness, thelong term use of antipsychotics will be viewed with considerable skepticism.Section 1919(b)(3)(F)(i), added by OBRA '87, requires that a determinationbe made on each resident as to whether he or she is mentally ill and inneed of active treatment for that mental illness. The decision to use anantipsychotic drug will still be the prerogative of the individual physicianbut he or she will be aided by the judgment of experts in the field ofmental illness in the diagnostic decision. With regard to those commenterswho wanted to apply the provision to a broader category of psychopharmacologicdrugs, we cannot agree. The term psychopharmacologic drugs includes antidepressantsand antianxiety drugs that do not have the significant side effects ofantipsychotic drugs. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (e): Urinary Incontinence</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.25(e) that a facility ensure that a residentwho is incontinent of bladder receive the appropriate treatment and servicesto restore normal bladder functioning; a resident is not catheterized unlessordered by a physician; and a resident who uses a urinary catheter receivesappropriate treatment to prevent infections.<T3>Comment</T3>: Commenters questioned the need for a physician to certifythe medical necessity of a urinary catheter since in most States a urinarycatheter cannot be used unless ordered by a physician. Several other commentersasked that this provision stipulate that restoration of normal bladderfunction be related to each resident's potential since not all residentswill be able to completely restore bladder function. Finally, commenterssuggested that the provision require that the resident grant informed consentbefore the facility uses a urinary catheter.<T3>Response</T3>: We concur with comments concerning physician certificationand have removed this requirement from andSection; 483.25(e) (redesignatedas paragraph (d)). However, we note that unlike other quality of care requirements,this provision does not emphasize discouraging the use of urinary cathetersif the resident is not catheterized at the time of admission. Thus, inaccordance with changes made in other quality of care requirements, weare revising new paragraph (d) to read, ``a resident who enters the facilitywithout a urinary catheter is not catheterized unless the resident's clinicalcondition demonstrates that catheterization was necessary.'' We have addedthe phrase, ``to restore as much normal bladder function as possible,''to andSection; 483.25(d)(3) to address commenters' concerns regarding thedifficulty in restoring total bladder function. We believe the issue ofa resident's informed consent for a urinary catheter is addressed in theresident rights requirement at andSection;483.10(b)(3), which establishesthe resident's right to be informed of his or her medical condition and,in paragraph (b)(4), the right to refuse treatment.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (f): Contractures (Range of Motion)</ITAG>andSection; 483.25(f), we proposed that a facility must ensure that a residentwho enters a facility without contractures does not experience an unpredictablereduction in range of motion without justifiable cause, and a residentwith contractures receives appropriate treatment to increase range of motionand prevent further decrease in range of motion.<T3>Comment</T3>: Six commenters suggested rewording paragraph (f)(2) asfollows: ``A resident who has contractures receives treatment and servicesconsistent with professional nursing standards and designed to increaserange of motion or to maintain existing range of motion.'' The commentersbelieve that this rewording is clearer, more positive and recognizes thata facility will not be able to maintain or increase range of motion onevery resident who has contractures. Three commenters asked that a morespecific definition of ``contractures'' be included in this provision andasked if arthritis could be considered a contracture if a reduction inrange of motion occurs.<T3>Response</T3>: Because we believe that appropriate treatment encompassesboth professional nursing standards and physical therapy principles, wedo not wish to narrow this concept to nursing standards only. We have renamedthis provision, Range of motion, as it more accurately reflects the subjectmatter, and redesignated it as andSection; 483.25(e). We are including init any condition leading to a reduction in a resident's ``range of motion,''thereby eliminating the need to define ``contracture.''<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (g): Psychosocial Functioning </ITAG>We proposed that a facility must ensure that a resident who displays psychosocialadjustment difficulty receives appropriate treatment and services to achieveremotivation and reorientation, and a resident whose assessment did notreveal a psychosocial adjustment difficulty does not display a patternof decreased social interaction or increased withdrawn, angry or depressivebehavior without justifiable cause. <T3>Comment: </T3>Six commenters opposed the requirement to achieve ``remotivationand reorientation''. Some commenters suggested that we rephrase andSection;483.25(g)(1) to specify that a resident who displays psychosocial adjustmentdifficulty, receives appropriate treatment and services ``if possible,''to achieve remotivation and reorientation. Other commenters recommendedadding the phrase, ``as indicated by the plan of care.'' Still other commentersbelieved that reality orientation and remotivation are not appropriatefor all residents and that the plan of care, not the regulation, shouldstate what each resident should achieve. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with commenters and recognize that not allpatients will achieve remotivation and reorientation. Therefore, we have added ``as possible'' to paragraph (1) of this provision,now redesignated as andSection; 483.25(f). As with all other provisions inthis requirement, we have deleted from new andSection; 483.25(f)(2) the phrase``unless reasonable justification is documented'' and replaced it with``unless the resident's clinical condition demonstrates that such a patternwas unavoidable.'' <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (h): Naso-Gastric Tubes </ITAG>We proposed that a facility must ensure that a resident who has been ableto feed or partially feed himself or herself is not fed by naso-gastrictube unless reasonable justification is documented, and receives appropriatetreatment and services to prevent complications and to restore normal feedingfunction.<T3>Comment: </T3>Five commenters asserted that, in andSection; 483.25(h),many of the conditions requiring the use of naso-gastric tubes are conditionsthat are not reversible. Three commenters suggested that the title of theprovision be changed to ``Special Feeding Techniques'' since naso-gastrictubes are not the only enteral feeding tubes being used in facilities.Nine commenters objected to the narrow definition of complications andone commenter asked that pneumonia be specified as aspiration pneumonia.Seven commenters suggested that ``medical, nursing and nutritional'' beused to modify ``treatment and services'' for residents with naso-gastrictubes.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree that not all residents may have restorativepotential and we are revising paragraph (h), (now redesignated as andSection;435.25(g)) at paragraph (g)(2) to provide that a resident who is fed bynasogastric tube receives the ``appropriate treatment and services * ** to restore normal feeding function if possible.'' We have studied theissue of including other feeding techniques, gastrostomy, and parenteralfeeding. Although we agree with commenters that parenteral feeding couldbe include here, the intent of this provision is to include issues andcircumstances that are indicative of abuse. We do not believe that parenteralfeeding is a usual sign of neglect or abuse, and consequenlty, have notmade any revisions in response to these comments. We agree that aspirationpneumonia is a more accurate term and have included this in andSection; 483.25(g)(2).Finally, we believe that medical, nursing and nutritional practices areimplicit when we refer to ``treatment and services'' for residents withnaso-gastric tubes; therefore, no change is needed.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (i): Drug Therapy (Unnecessary Drugs)</ITAG>We proposed that the facility must ensure that each resident's drug regimenis free of unnecessary drugs, unnecessary dose levels, undue adverse consequences,and significant medication errors or significant medication error rates.<T3>Comment: </T3>About 20 commenters objected to andSection; 483.25(i).Some wanted us to define ``significant'' and ``unnecessary.'' A majorityobjected because the facility could not ensure these outcomes because thephysician has ultimate control over drug use. These commenters advocateddeleting entirely the provisions relating to unnecessary drugs, unnecessarydose levels, and undue adverse consequences and suggested moving the provisionfor medication errors to the pharmacy requirement.<T3>Response: </T3>We do not agree that provisions regarding ``unnecessarydrugs'' should be deleted and are redesignating this provision as paragraph(1). Increasing public attention is being focused by the media on the problemof treating behavioral problems with drug therapy, which extinguishes normalaffect in the resident and causes undue adverse consequences to the extentthat additional nursing staff is necessary to provide care. For example,excessive use of psychoactive drugs can cause a resident to become bedfastor chairfast and become more subject to pressure sores and contractures.``Unnecessary drugs'' are drugs that are given in excessive doses, forexcessive periods of time, without adequate monitoring, or in the absenceof a diagnosis or reason for the drug. An unnecessary drug is a drug forwhich monitoring data, or undue adverse consequences indicate that thedrug should be reduced or discontinued entirely. An unnecessary drug isalso one which is prescribed only in anticipation of an adverse consequenceof another prescribed drug.We are deleting the requirement that the resident's drug regimen remainfree of unnecessary dose levels and undue adverse consequences, since weare defining unnecessary drugs in terms of these factors.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (j): Accidents.</ITAG>There were no comments on this proposed provision. It is being redesignatedas andSection; 483.25(h) due to removal of prior provisions.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (k): Nutrition</ITAG>We proposed that a facility must ensure that a resident does not lose weightafter entering the facility without justifiable cause and receives a specialtherapeutic diet when there is a nutritional problem.<T3>Comment: </T3>Twenty seven respondents commented on the weight lossrequirement in andSection; 483.25(k). Several commenters suggested changingthe requirement to include measurable parameters of nutritional statuswith weight being one indicator. Other commenters recommended that theweight standard be based on a 10% loss of body weight within six monthsor less. The majority of commenters asked that, based on the comprehensiveassessment of the resident, the facility ensure the resident's weight isappropriate for age, sex and medical status. Two commenters asked thata sentence be added reflecting a resident's right of refusal to eat orbe fed.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree with the commenters who suggest that the regulationinclude other parameters of malnourishment besides weight loss. However,we do not think it would be appropriate to list all these parameters ina regulation. Instead we have modified this provision, now redesignatedas andSection; 483.25(i), to require the facility to maintain acceptableparameters of nourishment unless the resident's clinical condition demonstratesthat this is not possible. Acceptable parameters of nourishment includeweight loss as well as other indices such as clinical signs and symptomsof malnourishment and laboratory tests indicating malnourishment (e.g.,serum albumin levels). We do not anticipate that there will be many circumstancesin which the facility could allege that the maintenance of nutritionalparameters was not possible. The resident's right to refuse to eat or tobe fed is included under right to refuse treatment in andSection; 483.10(b)(4).<T3>Comments: </T3>Two commenters asked that we add to the opening paragraphof andSection; 483.25(k), a statement that facility action is ``based onthe comprehensive assessment of a resident.''<T3>Response: </T3>We agree that the nutrition provision must be basedon a comprehensive assessment and have revised it as the commenters suggested.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (l): Dehydration (Hydration)</ITAG>We proposed that the facility must ensure that each resident is providedwith sufficient fluid intake and electrolytes to maintain proper hydrationand health.<T3>Comments: </T3>The majority of commenters addressing this provisionquestioned the inclusion of electrolytes.<T3>Responses: </T3>We did not intend to imply that replacing electrolytesis a medical intervention. We have deleted ``electrolytes'' from the provisionredesignated as andSection;483.25(j) and refer only to sufficient fluid intake,to make our intent clearer. We are also changing the title of the provisionto ``hydration'' as suggested by commenters. The rights of a resident torefuse treatment is addressed in andSection;483.10(b)(4).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (m): Special Needs</ITAG>We proposed that a facility must ensure that residents receive proper treatmentand care for the following special needs: injections; parenteral fluids,colostomy or ileostomy care; tracheostomy care; tracheal suctioning, andrespiratory therapy.<T3>Commenters: </T3>Five commenters wanted the paragraph rewritten toreflect the fact that the facility must provide proper treatment and carewhen it accepts residents having those special care needs. The commentersbelieved that this is necessary since the intent of the proposal is notto require all nursing homes to provide all services.<T3>Response: </T3>This provision does not require that facilities admitresidents with these special needs. Therefore, we believe there is no needfor this change. However, we must emphasize that a facility may not discriminateagainst handicapped individuals as defined by section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we add podiatric careto the list of special needs.<T3>Response: </T3>We are adding podiatric care to the list of specialneeds in redesignated paragraph (k).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (n): Staff Treatment of Residents</ITAG>We proposed that a facility must develop and implement written policiesand procedures that prohibit mistreatment, neglect or abuse of residents.<T3>Comments: </T3>Commenters asked that andSection;483.24(n) include requirementsfor training of facility staff to make them aware of their responsibilitiesand orient them to the policies and procedures regarding mistreatment ofresidents. Commenters suggested deleting the introductory paragraph andparagraph (1), and moving the remainder to the administration requirement.Still other commenters stated this provision was unnecessary since it iscovered under the resident's bill of rights and State abuse laws.<T3>Response: </T3>We will implement nursing aide training in October 1990as required by section 4211 of OBRA '87, and this will include abuse andneglect issues. We agree that the residents' bill of rights establishesthe rights of residents. This provision directs the staff behavior to assurethat those rights are enforced. As part of our effort to restructure theseregulations logically, we are relocating this provision to andSection;483.13(c),Resident behavior and facility practices.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Section 483.13(c)(2) requires the facility to investigateall alleged violations of abuse, mistreatment, neglect and injuries ofunknown source and report the results of this investigation to the administratoror other officials.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We invite comment on the advisability of and additional provisionsthat would require the facility to report any convictions growing out ofsuch investigations to the Office of Inspector General for possible exclusionaction in accordance with regulations at 42 CFR Part 1001.</ITAG>Summary of Changes to andSection;483.25In summary, the major changes we are making to andSection;483.25 as proposedare as follows:andbullet; In the opening statement, we are replacing the phrase, ``highestpossible mental and physical functional status'' with ``highest practicablephysical, mental and psychosocial well being'';andbullet; In renamed paragraph (c), Pressure sores, we are replacing theterm ``decubitus ulcers'' with ``pressure sores,'' and removing the requirementthat the physician certify that pressure sores were reasonably avoidable;andbullet; We are retaining the substance of paragraph (d), Antipsychoticdrugs, but relocating it to paragraph (1), Drug therapy; andbullet; We are redesignating proposed paragraph (e), Urinary incontinence,as (d), linking the use of catheters to a resident's comprehensive assessment,and removing the physician certification requirement; andbullet; We are redesignating proposed paragraph (f), Contractures, asparagraph (e), revising the title to ``Range of motion,'' and eliminatingthe documentation requirement; andbullet; Paragraph (g) Psychosocial functioning, and paragraph (j), Accidents,are redesignated as paragraphs (f) and (h), respectively, with only minoreditorial clarifications;andbullet; We are eliminating the documentation requirement in paragraph(h), Nasogastric tubes, redesignating it as paragraph (g), and replacingit with the requirement that clinical conditions demonstrate that use ofa nasogastric tube was unavoidable; andbullet; We are redesignating proposed paragraph (i), Drug therapy, asparagraph (l) to include three regulatory requirements_use of unnecessarydrugs, use of antipsychotic drugs, and drug administration;andbullet; We are redesignating proposed paragraph (k), Nutrition, as paragraph(i) and replacing reliance on weight loss with reliance on maintainingacceptable parameters of nutritional status; andbullet; We are redesignating paragraph (m), Special needs, as paragraph(k) and adding podiatric care and prosthetics to the special needs forwhich residents must receive proper treatment; and andbullet; We are relocating proposed paragraph (n), Staff treatment of residents,to andSection; 483.13(c), Resident behavior and facility practices.Section 483.30 Nursing Services RequirementWe proposed three alternatives with regard to nursing services. In thefirst alternative, we proposed to require all facilities to meet 24 hournurse staffing requirements comparable to those currently required forSNFs, including a registered nurse (RN) on duty on the day shift at least8 hours a day, 7 days a week. This would be an increase in requirementsfor ICFs. In the second alternative, we proposed to retain the current SNF requirementsfor SNDs, and retain essentially the current, ICF requirements for ICFs.ICFs would be required to have an RN or a licensed practical nurse (LPN)or licensed vocational nurse on duty full time on the day shift, 7 daysa week. In the third alternative, we proposed to adapt the current SNF staffingrequirements to both SNFs and ICFs, but provide for a waiver of the requirementswhen an ICF can provide appropriate nursing care with a lower level ofstaffing.  We also proposed in all three alternatives that, unless prohibited in writingby the attending physician, the facility may permit each resident to retainhis or her drugs at bedside, and self-administer those drugs.  Paragraphs (a) Director of nursing services, (b) Charge nurse, and (c)Sufficient staff.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Concerning proposed andSection; 483.30(c), dealing withsufficiency of nursing staff, of the commenters that expressed a preferencefor a specific alternative, the majority favored alternative I, as bestmeeting the increasingly intensive and complex care needs of the nursinghome population. Alternative I would retain essentially the current staffingrequirements in SNFs and extend them to ICFs. A significant number of commenterssupported Alternative II, which leaves in place the existing requirementsin SNFs and ICFs, respectively, as being the most realistic option in viewof existing nurse shortages and cost constraints. A small minority of commentersexpressed support for Alternative III, but suggested that the waiver periodbe the period for which the facility is certified, rather than 6 months.A common concern expressed by many of the commenters was that HCFA hasnot ensured the funding to pay for costly changes such as nurse staffingupgrades that were required in the proposed rule.  <T3>Response: </T3>Since each of the three nurse staffing alternativesthat we proposed would essentially leave unchanged the existing nurse staffingrequirements for SNFs, most of the comments on this provision focused onthe various proposals' potential effect on facilities that are currentlyICFs. We believe that valid points were raised in connection with eachof he proposed alternatives. We agree with the commenters who favored alternativeI (imposing the current, higher SNF staffing requirements on ICFs), thatnurse staffing requirements must take into account the increasingly sophisticatedmedical needs of ICF residents. However, the advocates of alternative II(retaining the existing ICF staffing requirements) also are correct inpointing out that meeting more stringent nurse staffing requirements maysometimes be difficult for ICFs in view of existing shortages of qualifiednursing personnel.  In passing OBRA '87, Congress also considered these factors. It recognizedthe need for upgraded nurse staffing, by requiring nursing facilities (includingthose currently licensed as ICFs), effective October 1, 1990, to ``* ** provide 24-hour licensed nursing services which are sufficient to meetthe nursing needs of its residents * * *'' and to ``* * * use the servicesof a registered professional nurse for at least 8 consecutive hours a day,7 days a week'' (section 1919(b)(4)(C)(i) of the Act). At the same time,Congress indicated its intent that certain nursing facilities would betreated differently in terms of nurse staffing requirements, by creatingdiffering waiver provisions relating to nurse staffing for Medicare SNFsand for Medicaid nursing facilities.  Of the three proposed alternatives, we believe that alternative III (which,like alternative I, would impose the current SNF staffing requirementson ICFs, but would also allow for waiver of those requirements under certaincircumstances) comes the closest to achieving an acceptable balance betweenthe commenters' two major concerns: upgrading staffing requirements toaddress residents' increasingly complex medical needs, while making necessaryallowances for existing nurse shortages in a manner that does not compromiseresident health and safety. However, while some commenters indicated supportfor the general concept of staffing waivers, they expressed concern aboutindividual aspects of the specific waiver mechanism that was proposed underalternative III. For example, they indicated that the proposed 6 monthduration of the waiver should be changed, and suggested that the availabilityof prompt physician or nurse response in an emergency should be consideredin granting a waiver.  We believe that these commenters' concerns can be addressed by adoptinga waiver provision for nursing facilities consistent with the one containedin OBRA '87. This provision contains an annually-reviewed State waivermechanism under which either the 24-hour licensed nursing requirement orthe daily RN requirement (but not both) can be waived for a given nursingfacility. In deciding whether to grant (or renew) a waiver, the State mustconsider such factors as a facility's efforts to recruit appropriate personnel,the health and safety of the facility's residents, and the immediate availabilityof physician or RN response to a telephone request by the facility. Therefore,we are responding to commenters on the nurse staffing provision by essentiallyadopting alternative III, with a modification of that alternative's waivermechanism. This means that we will:  andbullet; Retain the existing nurse staffing requirements for SNFs, andapply them to ICFs as well. These requirements include provisions for anRN on the day shift 7 days a week, and an RN or LPN as charge nurse oneach tour of duty.andbullet; Retain the existing waiver mechanism for SNFs under Medicare (i.e.,under the conditions described in regulations at 42 CFR 405.1911, the dailyRN requirement can be waived to the extent that it would require an RNin the SNF for more than 40 hours per week). Until October 1, 1990, thiswaiver mechanism will also apply to Medicaid SNFs. andbullet; Adopt a waiver mechanism for ICFs, under which either the 24-hourlicensed nursing requirement or the daily RN requirement (but not both)can be waived for a given facility. In deciding whether to grant (or renew)a waiver, the State would consider such factors as a facility's effortsto recruit appropriate personnel, the health and safety of its residents,and the immediate availability of physician or RN response to the facility'stelephone requests. When the OBRA '87 provisions take effect on October1, 1990, this waiver mechanism will apply to all Medicaid nursing facilities,including those facilities that previously participated in the programas ICFs or as Medicaid SNFs. In addition, we are incorporating in the opening statement the OBRA '87requirement that a facility have sufficient nursing staff to provide nursingservices ``to attain or maintain the highest practicable physical, mentaland psychosocial well-being of each resident.'' We have also considered comments which indicated that States would havedifficulty obtaining additional funding under Medicaid necessary to paythe cost of additional nurse staffing in intermediate care facilities,and comments that nursing facilities would have difficulty in recruitingnurses on short notice. Accordingly, we have elected to make the new requirementseffective on October 1, 1990. Until that date, current SNF and ICF nursestaffing requirements will remain in effect. (We are relocating the SNFrequirements in andSection; 405.1124 to new andSection; 483.28, and the ICFrequirements in andSection;andSection; 442.302 and 442.339 to new andSection;483.29.) On October 1, 1990, the full range of OBRA '87 requirements willtake effect. After that date, 24-hour nursing will be required in all facilities.OBRA '87 will simultaneously create a change in the status of facilitieswith respect to nurse staffing waivers, with Medicare SNFs subject to oneset of requirements and Medicaid NFs (regardless of whether they have beenICFs or SNFs) subject to another set of requirements. Regarding the concern for availability of adequate funding to finance implementationof the upgraded staffing requirements, we note that section 1902(a)(13)of the Act currently requires State Medicaid agencies to use payment ratesthat are ``* * * reasonable and adequate to meet the costs which must beincurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities in order toprovide care and services in conformity with applicable State and Federallaws, regulations, and quality and safety standards * * *'' We believethat this provision requires that States reasonably reflect the cost ofthe mandated staffing upgrades in their ICF payment rates when they becomeeffective. Congress has reinforced this requirement in section 4211(b)of OBRA '87 by adding a provision specifically directed at payment fornursing facility services, effective for fiscal years beginning on or afterOctober 1, 1990. Under this provision, a State must submit for the Secretary'sapproval a State plan amendment for each fiscal year, specifically establishingthe appropriateness of its payment rates for nursing facility services. <T3>Comment: </T3>Most commenters expressed support for requiring 24-hournursing coverage by RNs; others recommended 24-hour coverage by licensedpersonnel. Commenters indicated that since the implementation of diagnosisrelated group (DRG) payments in hospitals, nursing home residents tendto be discharged from hospitals sooner, and require a higher level of care.Under these circumstances, they argue, merely requiring 24-hour coverageby LPNs and unspecified ``other'' personnel, as proposed in our three nursestaffing alternatives, is inadequate. Other commenters suggested that therequirement be clarified by requiring 24-hour coverage by nurses and othernursing personnel.<T3>Response: </T3>While we recognize that the intensity of nursing homeresidents' care needs have generally increased in recent years, we believethat requiring 24-hour RN coverage may not be feasible in view of the existingnurse shortage. However, we note that Congress in section 4211 of OBRA'87, has attempted to address this concern by requiring 24-hour coverageby licensed personnel in long-term care facilities. We believe that theOBRA provision represents an acceptable balance between the commenters'requests for upgraded nursing staff requirements and the current availabilityof nursing personnel and, therefore, we are incorprating it in these finalregulations in andSection; 483.30(a).<T3>Comment: </T3>Three commenters noted that actual, hands-on care isfurnished primarily by nurse aides rather than by RNs or LPNs. One suggestedthat the regulations specify aide-patient ratios rather than nurse-patientratios.<T3>Response: </T3>As noted above, we are amending the regulations to clarifythat the requirement in andSection; 483.30(a) for sufficient staff refersto licensed nurses and other nursing personnel, which includes nurse aides.We prefer not to rely on nurse-resident ratios because the number and skillsof nursing staff depend on the severity of the residents' condition. Theseverity or case-mix of the resident population is a much better determinantof sufficiency of nursing staff.<T3>Comment: </T3>Eighteen commenters indicated that we should requirein paragraph (a), Director of nursing services, that an RN serve as thedirector of nursing (DON) in ICFs as well as SNFs. Another commenter suggestedthat the regulations require a DON in the ICF seven days a week. One commenterexpressed support for allowing an LPN to serve as the DON in an ICF.<T3>Response: </T3>In response to the comments, we are restructuring andSection;483.30, and in new paragraph (b), we require that facilities designatean RN to serve as the DON in NFs and have a full time DON. We expect thatthe DON would act as a manager of the nursing staff; and envision thatin all instances the DON can also serve as the RN on the day shift at least5 of the 7 days per week.<T3>Comment: </T3>In proposed andSection; 483.30(b), which allows a DON toserve as charge nurse in small facilities, one commenter supported thisprovision as proposed. Others suggested that it be modified to incorporatea waiver mechanism, or to reflect such factors as the level of care thatresidents require or the facility's past compliance with the quality ofcare and quality of life requirements. Still others opposed allowing theDON to function as a charge nurse at all.<T3>Response: </T3>We are retaining this requirement as proposed, redesignatedas andSection; 483.30(b)(3) in this final rule, because we believe that thenecessity for facilities to comply with quality of care and sufficencyof nursing staff requirements that are in these regulations should be enoughto ensure that this provision is not used in inappropriate situations.<T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters stressed that nurse staffing waiversshould not be granted unless a facility is in compliance with the requirementsfor quality of life and quality of care, as determined by the previoussurvey. Another commenter argued that emphasis should be placed on eliminatingthe nurse shortage, rather than accommodating it by scaling back facilitystandards through waivers.<T3>Response: </T3>We believe that these concerns are adequately addressedby the waiver mechanism contained in section 4211 of OBRA '87 which, inpart, precludes a State from granting a nurse staffing waiver unless itdetermines that the nursing facility has made diligent efforts to recruitappropriate personnel, and that the waiver will not endanger the healthor safety of individuals staying in the facility. Therefore, we are includingthe OBRA '87 provision on nurse staffing waivers.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d): Self-Administration of Drugs</ITAG>The proposed rule, at andSection; 483.30(d), would allow residents to self-administerdrugs without a physician's authorization as long as they could securelystore these drugs and maintain a record of administration.<T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of those who commented on this provisionopposed it, maintaining that the vast majority of residents in nursinghomes were not mentally or physically capable of drug self-administration.They also maintained that this practice would be dangerous because residentswould be too free to take each others' drugs and the staff would have moreopportunity to pilfer drugs from residents. Other commenters were concernedbecause the proposed regulation would require a physician to document whyeach resident could not self-administer drugs. Assuming that most residentsare incapable of this task, the documentation by physicians would resultin a large paperwork burden. Of the commenters that supported the concept,many said that safeguards must be in place, such as physician authorizations,nurse supervision and facility oversight of storage and recordkeeping.<T3>Response: </T3>The commenters point out some very special problemswith allowing residents to self-medicate, but we remain committed to theprinciple of allowing residents as much independence and self-control aspossible.As a consequence, we have revised proposed andSection; 483.30(e) to preservethe right of residents to self-administer drugs. This right may only bewithdrawn by the facility's interdisciplinary team, and may only be withdrawnon a case by case basis when self-administration is considered unsafe forthe particular resident or other residents.If a drug self-administering resident makes an error in drug administration,the facility should reassess that resident's capability. We will instructour State agency surveyors who detect such errors that this should notcount against the facility as a medication error, but calls into questionthe judgment made by the facility in allowing self-administration for thatresident.As noted above, we have placed andSection; 483.30(e) under the revised Residentrights requirement, andSection; 483.10(o), Self administration of drugs.Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.30The major changes to andSection; 483.30 are as follows:andbullet; We are adding and reorganizing material to improve clarity;andbullet; In paragraph (a), Sufficient staff (redesignated from proposed(c)), we adopt the proposed requirement that a facility provide servicesby a sufficient number of licensed nurses and other personnel on a 24-hourbasis. We also require in paragraph (b) that, except when waived underparagraph (c), a facility must designate a licensed nurse to serve as chargenurse;andbullet; In new paragraph (b), Registered nurse, we provide that, unlesswaived under paragraph (c) or (d), a facility must use the services ofa registered nurse at least 8 hours a day, 7 days a week. Except when waivedunder paragraph (c) or (d), a facility must designate a registered nurseto serve as director of nursing on a full time basis; and the directorof nursing may serve as charge nurse only when the facility has an averageoccupancy of 60 or fewer residents;andbullet; In new paragraph (c), Nursing facilities: Waiver of requirementto provide licensed nurses on a 24-hour basis, we provide for waiver ofthe requirement that a facility provide a registered nurse for at least8 hours a day, 7 days a week, or licensed nurses on a 24-hour basis;andbullet; In new paragraph (d), SNFs: Waiver of the requirement to provideservices of a registered nurse for more than 40 hours a week, we providefor waiver of the requirement to provide services of a registered nursefor more than 40 hours a week;andbullet; The proposed paragraph (d), Drug administration, has been placedat andSection; 483.10(o), Self-administration of drugs. We are providingthat a facility must permit residents to Self-administer a drug when thefacility determines, in accordance with the comprehensive assessment, thata resident is a good candidate, when the resident demonstrates that heor she can securely store, safely administer and accurately record theadministration of drugs, and the facility reassesses the resident's abilityto self-administer drugs at least every 3 months.andbullet; Also at andSection; 483.60(a)(2), we provide that the facility maypermit unlicensed personnel to administer drugs if State law permits, butonly under the general supervision of a licensed nurse.andSection; 483.35 Dietary Services RequirementIn andSection; 483.35, we proposed that a facility must provide each residentwith a nourishing, palatable, well-balanced diet including modified andspecially prescribed diets.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a): Staff Qualifications</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Comments on staff qualifications are summarized below.Commenters_andbullet; Objected to the absence of qualifications for the individual responsiblefor food management or nutrition, and suggested that we specify qualificationsfor dietitians and dietary supervisors.andbullet; Urged us to maintain existing regulatory requirements at andSection;405.1125(a) applicable to a skilled nursing facility. These requirementsare that the facility maintain a full-time qualified dietetic service supervisor,who, if not a registered dietitian, functions with frequent, regularlyscheduled consultation from a person so qualified;andbullet; Requested that we define dietitian and dietary service supervisorunder the proposed staffing qualifications provision at andSection; 483.75(k);andbullet; Stated the belief that only a qualified dietitian can ensure anadequate diet for residents in these facilities;andbullet; Asserted that, with shorter average hospital stays under the prospectivepayment system, residents entering nursing homes require greater care andhave more complicated dietary needs;andbullet; Suggested adding a requirement that the facility employ sufficientsupport personnel competent to carry out the functions of the dieteticservice and require that food service personnel be on duty daily over aperiod of 12 or more hours, as specified in existing andSection; 405.1125(a).<T3>Response: </T3>The Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, Pub.L. 100-360, which clarifies the intent of sections 4201 and 4211 of OBRA'87, stated that the Secretary must ensure that the requirements for dietaryservices be at least as stringent as those in effect prior to OBRA '87.(Conference Report on the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988. H.R.Rep. 100-661, 100th Congress, 2nd Sess., page 269.) As a result of this,and the significant adverse response to the dietary staffing proposal,we are providing in paragraph (a) that the facility must employ a qualifieddietitian on a full-time, part-time, or consultant basis. We are eliminatingprofessional qualifications and credential requirements from the administrationrequirement, andSection; 483.75(k), and instead, at andSection; 483.35(a),we are providing that a qualified dietitian is one who is eligible forregistration by the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the AmericanDietitic Association, or who is qualified on the basis of education, training,or experience in identification of dietary needs, planning and implementationof dietary programs.We agree with the commenters that the sufficient staff requirement shouldbe restored, and we are adding this as a new paragraph (b), Sufficientstaff. We did not, however, restore the requirement for personnel to beon duty 12 hours per day. We believe this is basically a process requirementthat can inhibit the facility's ability to innovate and manage.The 14 hour time span between meals requirement in proposed andSection; 483.35(d),Frequency of meals (redesignated as paragraph (f) in this final rule),should be sufficient to guarantee that residents do not go hungry for longperiods of time.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraphs (b): Menus and nutritional adequacy; and (c): Therapeuticdiets</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters_andbullet; Objected to the requirement that menus must meet the nutritionalneeds of residents, be prepared in advance and be followed;andbullet; Suggested retention of the language at existing andSection; 405.1125(b),which specifies that menus are planned and followed in accordance withthe recommended dietary allowances (i.e., the Four Basic Food Groups) ofthe Food and Nutrition Board of the National Research Council, NationalAcademy of Sciences. They maintained that there must be a nationally recognizedstandard to follow in order to maintain cost effectiveness and ensure nutritionaladequacy;andbullet; Suggested maintaining menus (with correction of any change) onfile for 30-60 days for the purpose of resolving food complaints both forindividuals, families and resident groups, as they provide a source ofuseful documentation when comparing what residents say was served withwhat the menu stated. A few suggested that the menus be posted in a conspicuousplace so the residents as well as visitors could see what is served; andandbullet; Commenters suggested that, in addition to being prescribed bya physician, therapeutic diets should be planned with supervision or consultationfrom the dietitian; also, the facility should have readily available acurrent therapeutic diet manual approved by the dietitian.<T3>Response: </T3>In response to comments, we are expanding proposed andSection;483.35(b)(1) to provide that menus must meet the nutritional needs of residents``in accordance with the recommended dietary allowances of the Food andNutrition Board of the National Research Council, National Academy of Sciences.''Since we are relying on the facility to furnish an adequate diet for eachresident, we believe that this is an important national standard upon whichthe facility must rely. This requirement has been redesignated as andSection;483.35(c)(1).We consider requirements to maintain a record of menus for a period of30-60 days or to post meals in advance as overly burdensome on facilities.If the facility wishes to do either, we believe that it should be voluntaryand not as the result of a regulation. Perhaps a resident group, if oneexists, could work with the facility to bring about this objective if itwere mutually agreeable.Our objective is to focus on the outcome of a physician-prescribed therapeuticdiet, and in doing so, avoid specificity in how the facility achieves theoutcome. We do not want to prescribe what resources must be used in orderto accomplish the physician's diet order, but rather look to the facilityto use whatever appropriate resources it deems necessary to implement thetherapeutic diet prescribed by the physician. Therefore, we are not makingthe suggested changes.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraphs (d): Frequency of meals; and (e): Assistive devices</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters_andbullet; Were concerned that the proposed 14 to 16 hour time span betweenthe evening meal and breakfast the following day is too long a period.The alternatives suggested by commenters ranged from a minimum of 12 hoursup to a maximum of 15 hours;andbullet; Suggested that we define ``snack'' to ensure that it is nutritionallyadequate to allow an additional 2 hours between the evening meal and breakfast;andbullet; Objected to our requirement that snacks require the physician'spermission;andbullet; Suggested that the nursing department, rather than the dietarydepartment, should have primary responsibility for providing special eatingequipment and utensils, and assisting residents;andbullet; Suggested that we include requirements that the staff be trainedto assist residents in using special eating equipment.<T3>Response: </T3>In the frequency of meals provision, redesignated asandSection; 483.35(f) in this final rule, we are retaining the proposed timespan of 14 hours between the evening meal and the subsequent morning mealsince the commenters' suggestions for changing this provision did not providea consensus. In response to commenters' concerns, whenever a nourishingsnack is served at bed time, we are allowing up to 16 hours between a substantialevening meal and breakfast the following day if agreed to by the residentgroup.The comments convince us that, unless it is medically contraindicated,residents should be able to have snacks without a physician's order wheneverthey choose, and we are deleting the reference to the physician's permission.In revised andSection; 483.35(f)(3), we are requiring that the facility ``offer''snacks instead of ``serve'' snacks because this is more in keeping withour intent to provide a homelike atmosphere, which respects residents'discretion to accept or decline such foods.The assistive devices requirement, redesignated as andSection; 483.35(g)in this final rule, does not specify the facility staff required to assistresidents. We do not believe it is necessary to include such detail inregulation as long as the devices are provided. As noted under andSection;483.25(a), Activities of Daily Living, based on the comprehensive assessmentof the resident, the facility must ensure that a resident is given theappropriate treatment and ``services'' to maintain or improve his or herability to eat.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (f): Sanitary conditions</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters recommended reinstating the requirements ofexisting andSection; 405.1125(f), that dietary service personnel are freefrom communicable diseases and practice hygienic food handling techniques.When food service employees are assigned duties outside the dietary service,these duties must not interfere with the sanitation, safety or time requiredfor dietary work assignments.<T3>Response: </T3>In an effort to eliminate prescriptive requirements,we chose to eliminate the language suggested by commenters concerning foodservice employees when they are assigned duties outside the dietary service.However, we are retaining the language in proposed andSection; 483.35(f),redesignated as paragraph (h), regarding sanitary conditions as they relateto food. We are also including a provision at revised andSection; 483.65(b)(2),Infection control (redesignated from proposed andSection; 483.75(e)(4), Administration),which prohibits employees with a communicable disease or infected skinlesions from direct contact with residents' food, if direct contact willtransmit the disease.Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.35In summary, we are making the following changes from the proposed rule:andbullet; We are revising staffing in paragraph (a) to provide that a facilitymust employ a qualified dietitian either full-time, part-time, or on aconsultant basis. A qualified dietitian is defined as one who is eligiblefor registration by the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the AmericanDietetic Association, or who is qualified on the basis of education, training,or experience in identification of dietary needs, planning and implementationof dietary programs.andbullet; We are establishing a new paragraph (b), Sufficient staff, thatrequires a facility to employ sufficient support personnel competent tocarry out the functions of the dietary service.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (b), Menus and nutritional adequacy, redesignatedas (c), we retain the existing requirement that menus be in accordancewith the recommended dietary allowances of the Food and Nutrition Boardof the National Research Council, National Academy of Sciences.andbullet; We are establishing a new requirement on food preparation andservice as paragraph (d). The content of this provision was originallyproposed to be under the quality of life requirement as andSection; 483.15(d).andbullet; In proposed paragraph (d), Frequency of meals, redesignated as(f), we have modified the 16-hour period between evening meal and breakfastthe following day when a nourishing snack is provided, and replaced itwith the option for a resident group to make judgments concerning the mealspan and what constitutes a nourishing snack.andbullet; We are eliminating proposed andSection; 483.35(f)(4) since we wantto reduce paperwork burden and adherence to State and local laws is adequatelyaddressed at andSection; 483.75(b), Compliance with Federal, State, or locallaws.Section 483.40 Physician Services RequirementWe proposed that a physician must personally approve a recommendation thatan individual be admitted to a facility, and that each resident must remainunder the care of a physician, and if possible, designate a personal physician.<T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters_andbullet; Suggested that we clearly state in the opening statement thatit is always a resident's right to designate a personal physician;andbullet; Suggested that the opening statement include a requirement thatthe physician be granted access to any facility within the State in whichthe physician is licensed;andbullet; Indicated that it is unfair to hold the facility responsible forcompliance with requirements involving activities that must be performedby the physician, over whom the facility has little control;andbullet; Suggested that the facility be required to notify the Federalor State agency with jurisdiction over the physician's licensing when aphysician repeatedly fails to meet the provisions of this requirement:andbullet; Suggested that the regulations require the facility to expressto the physician any concerns it has about orders that it considers questionable,since the facility can be held accountable for the consequences of followingthe physician's orders.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree that the resident always has the right to designatea personal physician. This right is implicit in the resident rights requirementat andSection; 483.10(d), which provides that the resident has the rightto choose a personal physician. In andSection; 483.40, the phrase, ``andif possible, designate a personal physician'' in the opening statementis not intended to be a requirement (i.e., the resident is not requiredto designate a personal physician) but simply to permit designation ofone if he or she chooses to do so. Therefore, we are deleting the words``and, if possible, designate a personal physician'' from the opening statement,since it is more appropriately placed in interpretive guidelines than inregulations.As amended by OBRA '87, section 1819(c)(3)(A) of the Act (for MedicareSNFs) and section 1919(c)(3)(A) of the Act (for Medicaid nursing facilities)require that all participating facilities grant the resident's individualphysician immediate access to the resident. We believe that this provisionaddresses the commenter's concern, and we are incorporating it in the finalregulations in the new resident rights requirement, andSection; 483.10(k).Regarding the issue of facility responsibility for requirements that involveperformance by a physician, the nature of the survey and certificationprocess is such that our enforcement mechanism is primarily through thefacility itself rather than through the individual practitioners that servethe facility's residents. When a physician gives orders that the facilityconsiders questionable, the facility's responsibility is to ensure thatthese concerns are, in fact, raised with the physician. We believe thatthe individual staff members' business and professional codes already requirethem to question any orders which they believe to be inappropriate. OBRA'87 reinforces this responsibility, by adding new sections 1819(d)(4)(A)(for Medicare) and 1919(d)(4)(A) (for Medicaid) to the Act. These sectionsrequire the facility to comply not only with applicable Federal, Stateand local requirements, but also with ``accepted professional standardsand principles which apply to professionals providing services in sucha facility.'' We are modifying the applicable portions of the Administrationrequirement, andSection; 483.75 (b) and (c), to reflect this. We will lookto the written statements and codifications of recognized professionalorganizations when it is necessary to establish that a particular professionalstandard or principle is, in fact, ``accepted.''<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraphs (a): Physician supervision and (b): Physician visits</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Argued that a facility resident should not be required to be underthe care of a physician if he or she chooses to be under the care of anonphysician health care professional in lieu of physician care;andbullet; Expressed support for physician review of the resident's totalprogram of care, but noted that it is impractical to require the physicianto review the total program of care at each visit, since a resident's conditionmay sometimes require visits in addition to those normally required. Theysuggested that we require review of the total plan of care only duringthose visits required under the physician visit schedule in paragraph (c);andbullet; Suggested that we require the physician to date, as well as signprogress notes and orders at each visit;andbullet; Stated that unless we explicitly require the physician to haveface-to-face contact with the resident when he or she reviews the programof care, the physician might merely stop by the facility to review theresident's records without actually seeing the resident.<T3>Response: </T3>Under the provisions of section 1861(j)(4)(A) of theAct, every resident must be provided care under the supervision of a physician.We believe this indicates a Congressional intent that there be physicianinvolvement in the care of all residents in the facility.Based on the comments, we are revising paragraph (b) to require that thephysician review the total plan of care at each visit required in andSection;483.40(c), and to require that the physician sign and date progress notesat each visit. Since proposed paragraph (c) specifies that the resident``must be seen'' by a physician at prescribed time intervals, we do notbelieve other changes are needed.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraphs (c): Frequency of physician visits, and (d): Availabilityof physicians for emergency care  </ITAG><T3>Comment:</T3> In summary, commenters_  andbullet; Suggested eliminating the requirement to record the prescribedfrequency of physician visits in the resident's comprehensive care plan,since it is already specified in the regulations;  andbullet; Argued for flexibility in time periods between visits by usingterms such as ``monthly'' and ``every two months'' or, alternatively, allowinga variance of several days;  andbullet; Opposed the ICF physician visit schedule proposed in andSection;483.40(c)(2). One commenter supported it, while forty-four felt that 6to 12 months between visits is too infrequent, particularly for unstableresidents;  andbullet; Noted that the proposed visit schedule does not coincide withthe physician recertification schedule;  andbullet; Argued that physician visits should be based on an actual patientneed, request, or significant change in condition rather than on compliancewith a prescribed set of time intervals or the licensure of the facility(SNF versus ICF) in which the resident is located;  andbullet; Suggested that we require a medical evaluation and physical examinationwithin 48 hours of admission, as well as a physician visit at the timeof admission; and  andbullet; Expressed support for the provision on availability of physiciansfor emergency care, but suggested that we define what is meant by ``availability,''and require the facility to contact an absent physician's designated referralphysician before assuming the responsibility of assigning a physician. <T3>Response:</T3> After evaluating comments and taking into account changesmade by OBRA '87, we are revising paragraph (c). As commenters suggest,we are eliminating the proposed requirement at andSection; 483.40(c) to recordphysician visit requirements in the plan of care. We are also revisingparagraph (c)(3) to provide that ``a physician visit is considered timelyif it occurs not later than 10 days after the date the visit was otherwiserequired'' to provide an element of flexibility.  With respect to the comment concerning consistency of the visit scheduleswith the physician recertification requirements of section 1903(g)(6) ofthe Act, we note that this requirement has been repealed by OBRA '87. Section1919(b)(3)(C)(ii) of the Act, as added by OBRA '87, will require a reviewof the resident's assessment no less frequently than every three monthsfor nursing facility residents. In order to accommodate the commenters'concerns, and to make this requirement consistent with OBRA '87 residentassessment provisions, we are requiring, in andSection; 483.40(c)(2), physicianvisits for ICF residents at least once every 30 days for the first 90 daysand at least once every 90 days thereafter, with a ten-day variance, asspecified in andSection; 483.40(c)(3). However, we do not agree that thescheduling of the maximum time between physician visits should be donein accordance with criteria such as resident need, resident request, orsignificant resident change, because these concepts are subjective andnot definable for regulatory purposes. Finally, we note that, under theprovisions of OBRA '87, the Medicaid SNF-ICF distinction will cease asof October 1, 1990. In the interim, we will continue to base the applicablephysician visit schedule on the certification of the facility (SNF or ICF)in which the resident is located.  We believe that the comment regarding ``availability'' of physicians foremergency care is valid, but would be more appropriately incorporated inguidelines. Therefore, we will include it in guidelines when they are issued. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (e): Physician delegation of tasks  </ITAG><T3>Comment:</T3> In proposed andSection; 483.40(e), we would permit physiciandelegation to physician extenders, i.e., physician assistants and nursepractitioners, of tasks that the regulations do not otherwise require tobe performed by the physician personally. An overwhelming majority of commentersexpressed general support for permitting the delegation of tasks to physicianextenders; however, other commenters expressed specific concerns aboutthis provision. In summary, commenters_   andbullet; Were concerned about the interaction of this provision with proposedparagraph (b), which requires the physician personally to sign all orders,and with proposed paragraph (c), which requires the physician personallyto perform physician visits at the prescribed time intervals. The regulationsas proposed would effectively preclude these tasks from being delegatedto physician extenders. Supporters of delegation recommended_  <ITAG tagnum="15">_The physician extender be allowed to sign orders, leaving to individualState law the issue of personal countersignature by the physician;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_The delegation be limited in scope, and adequately supervised bythe physician;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Permitting physician visits to be delegated to physician extenders,arguing that studies have demonstrated that allowing physician extendersto perform routine visits may actually increase physician involvement,since the physician typically will give considerable weight to the physicianextender's determination that a personal physician visit is warranted ina particular instance;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Including clinical nurse specialists (who are now permitted by section4218 of OBRA '87 to perform the required certifications and recertificationsfor Medicaid nursing home residents) in the physician delegation provision. </ITAG>andbullet; Opposed allowing any delegation of tasks to physician extenderswhatsoever, claiming that it would represent a degradation in the qualityand amount of care given;  andbullet; Asked that we revise proposed andSection; 483.40(e)(1)(iii) to clarifythat physician supervision of a physician extender need not be direct,on-site supervision;  andbullet; Interpreted the language in andSection; 483.40(e)(2), regardingrequired tasks that a physician must ``personally'' perform, as neverthelesspermitting such tasks to be delegated to others, and merely requiring thatthe physician document the record on those occasions when he or she actuallydoes perform the task personally; and  andbullet; Noted that the requirement in proposed andSection; 483.75(k)(2)(ii)for a physician extender to have a current license or certification topractice in the State is too restrictive, and would preclude the use ofmany qualified individuals.  <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that, to the extent feasible, the regulationsshould be written in a manner that allows for the effective utilizationof physician extenders in the nursing home setting. For this reason, weare withdrawing our proposed requirement in andSection; 483.40(b) that allorders be signed by the physician personally. This means that under andSection;483.40(e)(2), requirements concerning physician signature or countersignatureof orders are determined by individual State law and facility policy. Weare also deleting the words ``responsibility for'' from andSection; 483.40(e)(2).This is to clarify that this provision involves delegating the actual performanceof tasks; however, the ultimate responsibility for delegated tasks remainswith the physician, as indicated in andSection; 483.40(e)(1)(iii).  We also believe that the regulations should be revised to permit at leastsome measure of delegation to physician extenders of the physician visitfunction. We remain concerned, however, that at least a minimal degreeof direct personal contact between physician and patient should be maintained,both at the point of admission to the facility and periodically duringthe course of the resident's stay. Therefore, in andSection; 483.40(c)(4)we require that the physician perform the initial visit personally, andin andSection; 483.40(c)(5), allow the physician the option of alternatingwith the physician extender in making subsequent required visits. Under andSection; 483.40(e)(1)(iii), as proposed, we require that the physicianextender be under supervision, not under the ``direct'' supervision, ofthe physician. Hence, this provision permits supervision by a physicianwho need not be on-site. However, contrary to one commenter's interpretationof the provision in andSection; 483.40(e)(2), this provision requires thatwhen personal performance of a particular task by a physician is specifiedin the regulations, performance of that task cannot be delegated to anyoneelse.We agree that the qualifications specified in the proposed Administrationrequirement andSection; 483.75 at paragraph (k), Staff qualifications, gobeyond those required in the existing regulatory definitions of physicianassistants and nurse practitioners at 42 CFR 491.2 (to which paragraph(e) cross-refers). We are not including proposed andSection; 483.75(k)(2)(ii)in these final regulations, and leave in place paragraph (e)'s cross-referenceto the existing definitions.Regarding the clinical nurse specialist authority conferred by section4218 of OBRA '87, we note that the authority that Congress extended toclinical nurse specialists under this provision is specifically limitedto the Medicaid program, and includes only the required certification andperiodic recertifications, and the establishment and review of the planof care. Congress chose not to authorize clinical nurse specialists toperform other physician functions under Medicaid, such as making requiredphysician visits or writing orders, or to perform any physician functionswhatsoever under Medicare. Further, the authority for clinical nurse specialiststo perform Medicaid certifications and recertifications is itself time-limited,and applies only during the period from July 1, 1988, to October 1, 1990.We do not believe that the current limited scope of the clinical nursespecialist provision in OBRA '87 provides sufficient basis for includingclinical nurse specialists in the physician delegation provision.Summary of Revisions to andSection; 483.40We are making the following changes to andSection; 483.40:andbullet; In paragraph (b), Physician visits, the physician must write,sign and date progress notes at each visit;andbullet; We are not including in paragraph (c), Frequency of physicianvisits, the proposed requirement that a facility record in the resident'scomprehensive care plan how often a physician must visit a resident;andbullet; We are revising the physician visit schedule for ICFs in paragraph(c) so that a resident must be seen by a physician at least once every30 days for the first 90 days after admission, and at least every 90 daysthereafter. A physician visit is considered timely if it occurs not laterthan 10 days after the date the visit was required;andbullet; Also in paragraph (c), with certain stated exceptions, all requiredphysician visits must be made by the physician personally. At the physician'soption, required visits after the initial visit may alternate between personalvisits by the physician and visits by a physician assistant or nurse practitionerin accordance with the delegation provision in paragraph (e).Section 483.45 Specialized rehabilitative services requirementWe proposed at andSection; 483.45 that facilities that provide rehabilitativeservices must either furnish them directly or arrange to obtain them froma provider of rehabilitative services. We included requirements dealingwith provision of services and qualifications.<T3>Comments: </T3>A large number of commenters asked that we specify thata facility must not retain a resident at the facility if a need for rehabilitativeservices develops and the facility will not provide or obtain the services.The NPRM had only prohibited the admission of residents in this situation.A few commenters further suggested that we require that all long-term carefacilities provide rehabilitative services.Several commenters suggested that we retain the current requirements forwritten administrative and patient care policies and progress reports.Many commenters recommended that we delete the section in the proposedregulation that refers to the requirements for outpatient physical therapyproviders since this subject is not pertinent to this regulation. Otherscommented that the title of this section is inappropriate. One commenterpointed out that the term ``speech pathology'' has been replaced by theterm ``speech-language pathology.''<T3>Response: </T3>In revised andSection; 483.45, we are clarifying thata facility must provide or obtain rehabilitative services to every residentit admits. This is required by current law (section 1861(j)(1)), as wellas by OBRA '87 (sections 1819(b)(4)(A)(i) and 1919(b)(4)(A)(i) of the Act).We are also describing the services included in this category (physicaltherapy, speech-language pathology and occupational therapy) and we arespecifying that they must be provided under the written order of a physician,by qualified individuals. Finally, we are deleting the references to therequirements for outpatient physical therapy providers.We are not reinstating requirements in existing regulations for writtenpolicies and progress reports because we do not believe that these areappropriate regulatory requirements under an outcome-oriented approach.We are requiring that all residents whose comprehensive assessment indicatesrehabilitation potential receive, and the facility provide or obtain, appropriaterehabilitative services.Summary of Revisions to andSection; 483.45We are making the following changes from the proposed rule:andbullet; We are revising the opening statement to provide that a facilitythat admits or retains residents who require rehabilitative services, suchas physical therapy, speech-language pathology, and occupational therapy,must provide or obtain these services;andbullet; In the opening statement, for clarity, we are explaining that``rehabilitative services'' include ``physical therapy, speech-languagepathology, and occupational therapy;'' andandbullet; We are revising paragraph (b) to provide that specialized rehabilitativeservices must be provided under the written order of a physician by qualifiedpersonnel.Section 483.50 Social services requirementWe proposed at andSection; 483.50 to require facilities to provide or arrangefor services to meet the psychosocial needs of residents as identifiedin each resident's comprehensive assessment. We also proposed that thefacility must establish liaison with community resources, which can assistin meeting those needs.<T3>Comments: </T3>Many commenters said that it is much more effectiveto have psychosocial services provided by facility employees than by consultantsor community agencies because consultants lack authority to assure thatneeded services are provided by the facility and may not devote ongoingattention to resolve problems as they arise. Many commenters pointed outthat the proposed requirement is in conflict with the recommendation madeby the IoM that facilities with 100 beds or more employ at least one full-timesocial worker and the similar requirement in section 1819(b)(7) of theAct, added by OBRA '87 for facilities with more than 120 beds. Commentersacknowledged the necessity of using consultants or agencies for socialservices in small and rural facilities and noted that this is reflectedin the IoM study and in OBRA '87.Many commenters recommended that the regulations specify the credentialsrequired of those providing social services and that we designate the individualresponsible for provision and coordination of social services. Most commenterswho discussed credentials said that it was not necessary for a social workerto have a master of social work (MSW) but indicated that a professionalwith a bachelor's degree in social work or in another applied human servicesfield would be sufficient. Commenters expressed concern that if credentialsare not specified, social services duties would be relegated to an ancillarypart of another job. Several commenters stated that nurses are alreadyoverburdened and could not assume this responsibility. In addition, commentersnoted that social services provided by unqualified personnel could havenegative outcomes.Many commenters suggested that we specify the duties of social workers,such as assessment, treatment and planning as well as training supportstaff and other facility staff to facilitate provision of social services.Few comments were received in response to our invitation in the preambleto the proposed rule for public comment as to whether a separate requirementfor social services should be included in the final regulation or whetherthese functions should be entirely integrated with other requirements.One commenter suggested that we integrate social services functions withother requirements. Another commenter said that we could put social servicesunder the resident's rights requirement. The other commenters that respondedto this issue were strongly in favor of retaining social services as aseparate requirement to assure that the quality of life and quality ofcare requirements are met. These commenters also indicated that we shouldrequire that a social worker provide these services.In the preamble we also asked what types of specific outcome measures mightbe used to evaluate this type of care. A number of commenters submittedlists of possible outcome criteria.<T3>Response: </T3>After considering comments, we are relocating socialservices as paragraph (a) under andSection; 483.15, Quality of Life, alongwith resident activities. Commenters convinced us that these services havesimilar objectives of supportive, maintenance and empowerment servicesand we reasoned that these were important quality of life issues. (Seepreamble discussion of andSection; 483.15(e), Activities)While existing section 1861(j)(15) of the Act states that the Secretarycannot require that medical social services be furnished in a SNF, a provisionin OBRA '87 requires that SNFs with more than 120 beds employ at leastone full-time social worker effective October 1, 1990. Consequently, wehave included separate provisions in this final regulation that will beeffective before and after October 1, 1990, the effective date of the OBRA'87 provision. We are providing that, before October 1, 1990, SNFs arenot required to furnish social services directly, but must meet the socialservice needs of its residents either by obtaining the services from anoutside source or by employing a social worker. We will not require socialwork services in ICFs before October 1, 1990.In this rule, we are specifying that a social worker must have a bachelorsdegree, or two years supervised experience in a health care setting, orsimilar professional qualifications. This requirement is consistent withIoM recommendations and with OBRA '87 requirements that will become effectiveon October 1, 1990. In the meantime, we invite public comment on how weshould define the meaning of the statutory requirement ``or similar professionalqualifications'' as it pertains to a bachelors degree in social services.We plan to publish a final rule on this subject before October 1, 1990.Summary of changes to proposed andSection; 483.50We are withdrawing the social services requirement as proposed, makingthe following changes, and relocating social services as paragraph (g)under andSection; 483.15, Quality of life.andbullet; In andSection; 483.15(g), we are requiring that social servicesbe provided by a qualified individual defined as an individual with a bachelorsdegree in social work or two years experience in a health care settingworking directly with patients or clients, or similar professional qualifications.andbullet; We are providing that before October 1, 1990, a SNF is not requiredto furnish social services directly, but must meet the social servicesneeds of its residents by either obtaining social services from an outsidesource, or providing the services directly.andbullet; Effective October 1, 1990, all facilities with more than 120 bedsmust employ a qualified social worker on a full-time basis.Section 483.55 Dental services requirementIn andSection; 483.55, we proposed that facilities assist residents in obtainingroutine and emergency dental care, and ensure that a dentist is availablein an advisory role to the nursing staff. The facility must have an agreementwith a dentist to provide dental services, maintain a list of availabledentists, and, if necessary, assist the resident in making appointmentsand in arranging for transportation to and from the dentist's office.<T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters had the following concerns. Commenterssuggested that_andbullet; We reinstate the current requirement that an advisory dentistparticipate in staff development training for nursing personnel;andbullet; Advisory dentists should conduct mouth assessments;andbullet; Dental referral lists should include only dentists willing totreat nursing facility residents, and those willing to accept Medicaidpayment;andbullet; We require prompt replacement of lost or damaged dentures; andandbullet; Emergency dental care should be available on a 24 hour basis.<T3>Response: </T3>For the interim period up to October 1, 1990, when theapplicable OBRA '87 provisions become effective, we are making final thedental services regulations as proposed, and adding a provision requiringfacilities to refer residents with lost or damaged dentures promptly toa dentist.Under section 4201 of OBRA '87, which was enacted after the NPRM was published,section 1819(b)(4)(A)(vi) of the Act was added to require that effectiveOctober 1, 1990, Medicare SNFs provide or obtain ``* * * routine and emergencydental services to meet the needs of each resident'' and specified thatthe SNF will not be required to furnish such services without additionalcharge. Section 4211 of OBRA '87 added section 1919(b)(4)(A)(vi) to theAct, which, effective October 1, 1990, requires Medicaid nursing facilitiesto provide or obtain ``* * * routine dental services (to the extent coveredunder the State plan) and emergency dental services to meet the needs ofeach resident.''We are implementing these provisions in revised regulations that will becomeeffective on October 1, 1990. The effect of these changes is that currentlyeffective regulations require merely that a facility assist its residentsin obtaining dental services on their own. However, effective October 1,1990, facilities will become directly responsible for the dental care needsof their residents, as specified in OBRA '87.Summary of Revisions to andSection;483.55 In addition to technical revisions, we are revising andSection;483.55 to_andbullet; Include, for the interim period beginning with the effective dateof these regulations up to October 1, 1990, the dental services requirementsas proposed in the NPRM, with an additional provision regarding referralof residents with lost or damaged dentures; and andbullet; Implement, effective October 1, 1990, the OBRA '87 provisionsunder which facilities are responsible for meeting the dental care needsof their residents, as specified in the law. andSection;483.60 Pharmacy services requirement This provision requires a facility to provide routine and emergency drugsand biologicals to its residents. <T3>Comment: </T3>The opening statement of the proposed rule states thatthe requirement that a facility have methods and procedures for dispensingand administering drugs and biologicals is based on a requirement of section1861(j)(7) of the Act for skilled nursing facilities (SNFs). Several commenterswrote in to say that they were confused which requirements applied to SNFsand which to ICFs. <T3>Response: </T3>We are retaining reference to section 1861(j)(7) ofthe Act dealing with methods and procedures for dispensing and administeringdrugs and biologicals. This provision will be effective for skilled nursingfacilities until October 1, 1990. There is and will be no similar provisionfor ICFs until October 1, 1990. After that date, we will use the wordingof OBRA '87 which deals with assuring the ``accuracy'' of pharmaceuticalservice, and this provision will apply to both skilled nursing and nursingfacilities. <T3>Comment: </T3>Existing SNF pharmacy and nursing services regulationsat andSection;405.1124(i), contain requirements for labeling and storageof drugs, which were deleted in the proposed rule because we thought thatthese issues were adequately addressed by State law. Six commenters didnot agree with that, and maintained that the laws in their States did notadequately address these issues. <T3>Response: </T3>In response to these comments, we are establishing newandSection;483.60(f), Labeling of drugs and biologicals, which reinstatesexisting requirements that drug labeling be in accordance with currentlyaccepted professional principles, and that labeling include appropriateaccessory and cautionary instructions and expiration date. Note that existingregulations only require an expiration date ``when applicable.'' Sincethe Food and Drug Administration now requires expiration dates on virtuallyall legend drugs, we have deleted the modifier ``when applicable.'' We are also reinstating current provisions that require the facility tolock all drugs and to separately lock schedule II Controlled Drugs listedin the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970. Wenote that residents who self-administer drugs in accordance with theserequirements will also have to store their drugs in locked compartments,but would not have to separately lock Schedule II controlled drugs. <T3>Comment: </T3>Existing regulations for skilled nursing facilities atandSection;405.1127(d) require a pharmaceutical services committee. The functionof this committee is to develop written policies and procedures for safeand effective drug therapy distribution, control and use. Regulations governingICFs do not have a provision for this committee. In the proposed rule,we deleted requirements for this committee and approximately 30 commentersexpressed opposition. These commenters maintained that this committee isessential to the coordination of the inter-disciplinary task of prescribing,dispensing, distributing and administering drugs and biologicals in long-termcare facilities. <T3>Response: </T3>Existing section 1861(j)(7) of the Act requires thefacility to develop ``methods and procedures for dispensing and administeringdrugs and biologicals.'' Section 1919(b)(4)(A)(iii), added by OBRA '87,requires ``procedures that assure the accurate acquiring, receiving, dispensingand administering of all drugs and biologicals'' effective October 1, 1990.Since commenters expressed a desire to have a formally established committeeto develop these procedures, we are reinstating the existing provisionsproviding for this committee in andSection;483.60 as a new paragraph (c),Pharmaceutical services committee. We note, however, that OBRA '87 alsorequires the facility to have a ``Quality Assessment and Assurance Committee.''When the regulations implementing this OBRA '87 provision become effectivein October, 1990 (see revised andSection;483.75(r)), we expect the functionsof the pharmaceutical services committee to be assumed by the quality assessmentand assurance committee, which would act as a ``committee of the whole.''<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a): Methods and Procedures. </ITAG><T3>Committee: </T3>Under andSection;483.60(a)(2) of the proposed rule, unlicensedpersonnel may administer drugs if State law permits this practice, thuscontinuing a similar requirement currently in SNF regulations at andSection;405.1124(g).Comments ranged from opposition to the idea of unlicensed personnel administeringdrugs, on the belief that only a registered nurse should perform this task,to recommendations for adequate training to administer drugs and supervisionby licensed personnel. <T3>Response: </T3>We continue to believe that the task of administeringsolid form oral doses is largely routine and mechanized, and valuable licensednurse resources can be better utilized in making direct resident care assessmentand judgments and providing care. We agree, however, that general supervisionby a licensed nurse when unlicensed personnel are administering drugs isdesirable and are making this revision. We are retaining the provisionallowing unlicensed personnel to administer drugs if State law permits.We are relocating this provision to andSection;483.10(o), Self administrationof drugs. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c): Drug regimen review </ITAG>Proposed 483.60(c) requires a pharmacist to conduct a monthly drug regimenreview and report any irregularities to the attending physician. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters were concerned about who should receive thepharmacists' reports of irregularities. They wanted reports to be sentto either the director of nursing, who could correct irregularities relatingto drug administration; the physician because only he could resolve issuesdealing with drug prescriptions; the administrator and the medical directorbecause they ultimately are responsible, or share responsibility for potentialdrug therapy problems. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that the pharmacist's reports should go tothe attending physician and the director of nursing, since they have directresident care responsibilities. We also believe that the director of nursing or the attending physician,or both, must act on the recommendations of the pharmacist, especiallywith regard to psychopharmacologic drug use, since the ultimate goal ofthe drug regimen review process is to optimize drug use in facilities andthat can only happen if action is taken, either to accept or reject recommendationsmade by the pharmacist. This provision is in accordance with the spiritof section 1919(c)(1)(D) of the Act, added by OBRA '87, which stronglyemphasizes efforts to control the abuse of psychopharmacologic drugs aschemical restraints. We are modifying the provision, designated as paragraph(e) in this final rule, accordingly. We believe it would be too prescriptive to require explicitly that drugreview reports go to the administrator and medical director. The facilitymay develop its own policy regarding whether these reports should be reviewedby these individuals.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> We plan to issue a proposed rule to implement the OBRA '87provision prohibiting the use of psychopharmacologic drugs except undercertain circumstances (physician's order, plan to reduce or eliminate symptomsand annual review by an outside consultant).</ITAG>Summary of revisions to andSection; 483.60In addition to minor editorial revisions, we are revising proposed andSection;483.60 as follows: andbullet; We are relocating the requirement that a facility may permit unlicensedpersonnel to administer drugs if State law permits from paragraph (a),Methods and procedures, to the requirement concerning nursing services,andSection; 483.10 under paragraph (o), Drug administration;andbullet; In new paragraph (c), Pharmaceutical services committee, we arerequiring facilities to have a pharmaceutical services committee whichdevelops written policies and procedures for safe and effective drug therapy,distribution and control; andbullet; We are renaming the supervision of services requirement. Its newname is Service Consultation. This term more accurately describes the rolepharmacists play in these facilities. This provision is now located atandSection; 483.60(d).andbullet; In paragraph (e), Drug regimen review, redesignated from (c),we require that the drug regimen of each resident be reviewed at leastonce a month by a licensed pharmacist, and any irregularities be reportedby the pharmacist to the attending physician or the director of nursing,or both; andbullet; In new paragraph (f), we provide that the facility must labeldrugs and biologicals in accordance with currently accepted professionalprinciples.andbullet; We are placing proposed andSection; 483.30(d)(2) regarding storageof self-administered drugs and biologicals in a new provision at andSection;483.10(o).andSection; 483.65 Infection control requirementThe provision requires that the facility provide a sanitary environment.Paragraph (a): General requirements<T3>Comment: </T3> Existing infection control regulations at andSection;405.1135 contain provisions for an infection control committee composedof representative professional staff with responsibility for overall infectioncontrol in the facility. Section 405.1135 requires the committee to establishpolicies and procedures for investigating, controlling, and preventinginfections in the facility, and monitors staff performance to ensure thatthe policies and procedures are executed. We deleted these provisions inthe proposed rule because the emphasis we wanted to place was on the actualperformance of a facility in providing care rather than on its capacityto perform. Twenty-six commenters thought that the infection control committeeshould be retained. <T3>Response:</T3> After review of the comments, we are creating a requirementfor an infection control program, under which the facility is responsiblefor establishing policies and procedures for investigating infections inthe facility. We note that sections 1819(b)(1)(B) (for Medicare) and 1919(b)(1)(B)(for Medicaid), as added by OBRA '87, require that each nursing facilityhave a quality assurance committee, effective October 1, 1990 (see revisedandSection; 483.75(r)). To avoid requirements for an excessive number oflimited purpose committees, we are removing the requirement for a separateinfection control committee. The quality assurance committee will becomea committee of the whole and carry out the functions of the infection controlprogram. We are also introducing a requirement at andSection; 483.65(b)(3) for handwashingby staff with direct resident contact when indicated by accepted professionalpractice. Our purpose in doing so is to state in more specific terms thebasic intent of a requirement that we originally proposed at andSection;483.65(a)(5). This provision, as proposed, would have required all personnelto follow aseptic and isolation techniques in accordance with acceptableprofessional practice. We are revising this requirement to focus on handwashingby staff with direct resident contact when indicated by accepted professionalpractice, in view of recent studies that have identified such handwashingas one of the basic, essential measures for preventing the spread of infectionin nursing homes. We will use the Guideline for Handwashing and HospitalEnvironmental Control, 1985, published by the Centers for Disease Controlof the Public Health Service, as the standard for accepted professionalpractice in this area. <T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed andSection; 483.65(a)(4) requires that residentswith infectious diseases be isolated in single rooms that are vented tothe outside, with a private toilet and handwashing facilities, and identifiedby precautionary signs. Eleven commenters believed that not all infectiousdiseases require isolation and that the regulations should be revised sothat facilities are not required to isolate patients unless their diseaserequires this precautionary measure. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with these comments. As noted in the previousresponse, we are reinstating the existing requirement for an infectioncontrol program, under which the facility has responsibility for overallinfection control. One of these responsibilities is to determine what formisolation should take given the resident's infection. Not all infectionsrequire isolation in single rooms vented to the outside, with a privatetoilet and handwashing facilities, thus we have deleted these requirementsat andSection; 483.65(b). <T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed andSection; 483.65 requires that the facilitymaintain a record of incidents and corrective actions related to infections.Eight commenters thought that this language was not clear enough and thatwe should define the words ``incidents'' and ``corrective actions''. <T3>Response: </T3>The requirement has been made a function of the infectioncontrol program. We do not wish to institute prescriptive regulatory requirements,but intend to elaborate further in interpretive guidelines. A facilityshould, for example, maintain a separate record on infections that identifieseach resident with an infection, gives the date of infection, the causativeagent, the organ or site of infection, and describes what precautionarymeasures were taken to prevent the spread of the infection within the facility.This log or record of infection will assist the facility in determiningpatterns of infection and potential correction measures. Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.65 We are making the following changes from the proposed rule: andbullet; We are replacing proposed paragraph (a), general requirements,with a new paragraph (a): Infection control program. We require a facilityto establish an infection control program under which it investigates,controls and prevents infections, decides on isolation procedures, andmaintains a record of incidents and corrective actions related to infections.andbullet; In paragraph (b)(1), we are not specifying what isolation proceduresshould be followed. andbullet; Paragraph (b)(2) (redesignated from proposed andSection; 483.75(e)(4))requires that a facility prohibit employees with symptoms or signs of acommunicable disease or infected skin lesions from direct contact withresidents or their food, if such direct contact will transmit the disease.andbullet; Paragraph (b)(3) provides that a facility must require staff towash their hands in accordance with accepted professional practice. andbullet; Proposed paragraph (b), Linens, is redesignated as paragraph (c).Section 483.70 Physical environment requirement Proposed andSection; 483.70 requires that the facility must be constructed,equipped and maintained to protect the health and ensure the safety ofresidents, personnel and the public. <T3>Comment: </T3>The comments on physical environment are summarized below.Commenters__ andbullet; Were opposed to permitting waivers of certain life safety codeprovisions; andbullet; Had a number of specific suggestions with regard to such environmentalfactors as temperature levels, pest control, smoke-free rooms, smoke detectors,fire drills, emergency power, and resident call systems; andbullet; Recommended a variety of additional structural changes, includingroom size and furnishings, and accessibility to the handicapped; andbullet; Suggested that resident rooms accommodate no more than two bedsper room; andbullet; Suggested that physical plant changes not be required in existingfacilities; andbullet; Requested clarification of the term, ``secure,'' in regard tocloset space; andbullet; Asked that we retain the existing SNF requirement that generallyprohibits the placement of blind, nonambulatory residents above the streetlevel floor if the facility is 2 or more stories and has a waiver of constructiontype or height, or is not of fire resistant construction; andbullet; Objected to the requirement for full visual privacy, stating thatmany facilities have privacy curtains that extend only to the end of thebed, and this is sufficient for privacy; others thought an outcome orientedapproach to privacy would give facilities more flexibility in meeting thisrequirement; andbullet; Objected to the term ``homelike,'' and asked that it be clarifiedor deleted since ``homelike'' may be incompatible with acceptable safetyand sanitation measures. <T3>Response: </T3>In responding to the comments we made changes to theregulations that are consistent with the Act and discussions of the issuesthat appeared in OBRA '87. Our responses to comments are summarized below.andbullet; Waivers of certain life safety code provisions are permitted bysection 1861(j)(13) of the current Act, and by sections 1919(d)(1)(B)(i)and 1819(d)(1)(B)(i) of the Act, as amended by OBRA '87. We do not havethe authority, therefore, to preclude the potential for waivers when appropriate.andbullet; The requirements for quarterly fire drills and smoke detectorsin facility corridors are included in the life safety code of the NationalFire Protection Association. andSection; 483.70(a) requires that facilitiesmeet the provisions of this code, in accordance with the Social SecurityAct. On April 7, 1988, we published final regulations at 53 FR 11504, whichincorporate by reference the 1985 edition of the National Fire ProtectionAssociation's Life Safety Code. andbullet; We are revising the Emergency power requirement to include therequirement that the emergency electrical power system must supply poweradequate at least for lighting all entrances and exits, equipment to maintainfire detection, alarm and extinguishing systems, and life support systemswhen the normal electrical supply is interrupted. andbullet; In the Dining and resident activities requirement, we are revisingthe regulation to require that nonsmoking areas be identified. andbullet; In the Resident call system provision, we are eliminating therequirement for a call system from common resident areas because commentersobjected to the expense of installing a system, and misunderstood the intentof the proposal. andbullet; We are not requiring that rooms accommodate only two beds becausethis would be too costly. Moreover, we believe that the general provisionfor privacy and the specific provision for privacy curtains on newly certifiedfacilities ameliorates the need to limit the number of beds per room. andbullet; We are also requiring that, in facilities initially certifiedafter the effective date of these regulations_ <ITAG tagnum="15">_The temperature range must be 71-81</ITAG>anddegrees; Fahrenheit. Asdiscussed below, this has been relocated to andSection; 483.15(h)(6); and<ITAG tagnum="15">_Each bed must have ceiling suspended curtains that extend aroundthe bed sufficiently to provide total visual privacy. We believe this issupported under current law and section 1919(c)(1)(A)(iii) of the Act asadded by OBRA '87. </ITAG>We plan to allow temperatures that exceed the upper range of 81 degreesFahrenheit for facilities in geographic areas of the country (primarilyat the northernmost latitudes) where that temperature is exceeded onlyduring rare, brief episodes of unseasonably hot weather. This interpretationwould apply in cases where it does not adversely affect resident healthand safety, and would enable facilities in areas of the country with relativelycold climates to avoid the expense of installing air conditioning equipmentthat would only be needed very infrequently.andbullet; We agree that facilities must provide handicapped accessibilityand have added it under the Administration requirement at andSection; 483.75(d).andbullet; With regard to the commenter who requested that physical plantchanges not be required in existing buildings, we emphasize that fire safetyregulations for all Medicare and Medicaid facilities have grandfather clauseprovisions that address that issue.andbullet; We do not agree with commenters who suggested amending the regulationsto specify that a facility may routinely inspect, monitor or clean outthe resident's closet space, because this would be in conflict with IoMrecommendations on privacy. However, we will permit facilities to inspectthe area when the facility has reason to believe that the items storedin the closet are a threat to the health and safety of other residents.andbullet; With regard to a provision prohibiting facilities from placinghandicapped residents above street level, we believe that specific regulatoryprovisions are unnecessary because a waiver of the LSC may be granted onlyif it does not affect the health and safety of all residents.andbullet; We are retaining the reference to a ``homelike'' environment becauseit deemphasizes the institutional setting by allowing residents to usepersonal belongings, and is consistent with a resident's right to receiveservices with reasonable accommodations of individual needs and preferences,as specified in the Resident rights requirement, andSection; 483.15(h).andbullet; We are relocating proposed requirement, Pest control program,from andSection; 483.15(b)(5) to andSection; 483.70(h), Other Environmentalconditions.andbullet; We are relocating proposed requirements in andSection; 483.70(h)(1)(2)and (3) to the Environmental quality of life provision, andSection; 483.15(h).andbullet; We are reorganizing proposed andSection; 483.70(h) to include thefollowing regulatory requirements:(1) Establish procedures to ensure that water is available to essentialareas when there is a loss of normal water supply.(2) Have adequate outside ventilation by means of windows, or mechanicalventilation or a combination of the two;(3) Equip corridors with firmly secured handrails on each side; and(4) Establish an effective pest control program in order to maintain thefacility free of pests and rodents.andbullet; We are not deleting the proposed requirement for a facility toensure that the premises are free of pests and rodents because we believethat the facility is accountable for maintaining sanitary conditions, andto eliminate this requirement would jeopardize residents' health and safety.Summary of Changes to andSection; 483.70In addition to technical changes discussed above, we are making the followingrevisions to proposed andSection; 483.70:andbullet; We are specifying in paragraph (b), Emergency power, that theemergency electrical power system must supply adequate power at least forlighting entrances and exits, fire detection equipment, alarms and extinguishingsystems, and life support systems when the normal electrical supply isinterrupted;andbullet; We are revising andSection; 483.70 to provide that in facilitiesinitially certified after the effective date of these regulations,_Each bed must have ceiling suspended curtains, which provide total visualprivacy (paragraph (d)(v)); and_Now located at andSection; 483.15(h)(6) temperature range of 71-81anddegrees;Fahrenheit must be maintained. We will specify in guidelines exceptionalcircumstances under which a facility may exceed the upper limit briefly;andbullet; In paragraph (g), Dining and resident activities, we require thatnonsmoking areas be identified;andbullet; We are adding new paragraph (h), Environment, which was originallyproposed as andSection; 483.15(b).Section 483.75 Administration requirementIn andSection; 483.75, we proposed a Level A requirement consisting of 22Level B requirements, 7 of which are required by the Act. The major commentsare as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a): Licensure</ITAG>In andSection; 483.75(a), we proposed that an SNF must be licensed in accordancewith State or local law, or approved by the State or local agency responsiblefor licensing such institutions. An ICF must be licensed under State lawto provide, on a regular basis, health-related care and services to individualswho do not require the degree of care that a hospital or SNF provides.This paragraph is closely related to paragraphs (b) and (c), Compliancewith Federal, State and local laws. (See the discussion of the Physicianservices requirement (andSection; 483.40) and the discussion of proposedparagraph (j) of this section (use of outside resources) regarding revisionsmade in paragraph (c) to reflect OBRA language on compliance with professionalstandards.)<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that we include a descriptionof the new nursing facility (NF) level of care introduced in OBRA 1987.Other commenters disagreed with the description of ICF care as limitedto that type of care that can be furnished only through institutional facilities.<T3>Response: </T3>OBRA 1987, in defining NF care, simply incorporatesthe existing statutory language defining SNF care and ICF care into a singledefinition, without altering the basic wording. Thus, in effect, the existingregulatory definitions of SNF care and ICF care, when taken together, alreadyconstitute a description of NF care. Since the ``nursing facility'' categorycreated by OBRA 1987 does not become operative as such until October 1,1990, we are retaining the current paragraph (a) distinction between SNFand ICF care for use in the interim period. The description of ICF careof andSection; 483.75(a)(2) is verbatim to what section 1905(c)(1) of theAct provides and essentially is included in the OBRA 1987 definition ofnursing facility care.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c): Governing Body</ITAG>We proposed that a facility must have a governing body or designated personfunctioning as a governing body that is legally responsible for establishing,implementing and making available to residents and the public written policiesregarding management and operation of the facility. The governing bodyappoints the administrator who is licensed by the State, and is responsiblefor management of the facility. The proposed provision contained detailedrequirements concerning access to ombudsmen or others who assist residents,including resident advisory councils.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters suggested that we define the qualificationsof the administrator, and specify the number of hours the administratoris employed in a facility.<T3>Response: </T3>Since we are emphasizing resident care outcomes anddeleting unnecessarily prescriptive requirements, we chose not to specifyin detail the responsibilities of the administrator nor the exact amountof hours he or she should be employed but rather allow the facility todetermine how the facility should be managed. We note, however, that ifa facility is substantially out-of-compliance with program requirements,it is ultimately the responsibility of the administrator of the facility.Based upon sections 1819(f)(4) and 1919(f)(4) of the Act, added by OBRA1987, we are developing a separate rule containing proposed standards forthe qualifications of administrators of skilled nurisng facilities andnursing facilities.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters were opposed to the requirement that wouldallow a facility to restrict access within State law to a designated ombudsman,and to authorized employees and agents of public agencies to normal visitinghours.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree with commenters, and note that Congress hasdealt with this issue in OBRA 1987, which creates a new section 1819(c)(3)of the Act (for Medicare) and a new section 1919(c)(3) (for Medicaid),dealing with access and visitation rights. These provisions distinguishbetween certain categories of individuals, who must be granted immediateaccess to residents, and other categories that are to be allowed reasonableaccess. Because we believe that these issues are within the scope of currentlaw, as well as OBRA 1987, we are incorporating the OBRA 1987 provisionsin these final regulations, and we are relocating these provisions on accessto andSection; 483.10, the requirement for protection of resident rightsat paragraph (k), access to the facility.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters did not object to the requirement that thegoverning body make available to residents information on Federal, Stateand local agencies responsible for enforcement of nursing home rules andadvocacy for residents, the results of Federal and State surveys, and thename, address and phone number of State survey office, ombudsman officeand legal service office. However, commenters noted that posting thesenotices detracts from a ``homelike'' environment, and they suggested thatthe facility should simply be required to post a notice that these documentsare available for review.<T3>Response: </T3>We agree with commenters, and in the final rule, weare providing that a resident has the right to examine the results of Federaland State surveys, and plans of correction, upon reasonable request. Sincethe issue concerns resident rights, we are relocating this provision toandSection; 483.10 at paragraph (g), Examination of survey results.<T3>Comment</T3>: Concerning our proposed requirement that a facility providespace, privacy, and a designated staff person to provide assistance, forresident advisory and family groups, commenters_andbullet; Suggested permitting the staff advisory person to attend councilmeetings;andbullet; Asked us to require facilities to facilitate establishment ofresident councils, to submit proposed policies affecting resident lifeto the council for review, and to respond to formal council recommendationswithin 2 weeks.<T3>Response</T3>: We do not require that facilities organize these groups,merely that when residents or family members desire such groups, the facilityprovide assistance. Because residents' need for assistance may vary fromone facility to another, we have altered the wording of this requirementto indicate that staff or visitors may attend only at the group's pleasure.This change should preserve the privacy right of group participants withoutnecessitating issuance of a formal invitation anytime assistance is needed.On the other hand, in situations where residents do not need or desirethe presence of a staff person for assistance, they have the right to organizeand conduct meetings on their own and invite of include whomever they wish.The interpretive guidelines will explain that normally the designated staffperson responsible for such assistance and liasion between the group andthe facility's administration would be the only staff person present duringresident or family group meetings_and only if the group requests such assistance.At andSection; 483.15(c), under the Participation in resident and familygroups provision of the quality of life requirement, in reponse to comments,we are implementing in essence the OBRA '87 provision that grants residentsthe right to organize and participate in resident groups in the facilityand the right of the resident's family to meet in the facility. In orderto facilitate this right, we believe the facility must allow these groupsto exist and provide space, privacy and staff support.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d): Institutional Planning</ITAG><T3>Comment</T3>: The proposed regulations at andSection; 483.75(d) requireeach facility to have an institutional plan and budget, and give detailedrequirements for their content. Several commenters felt that these requirementswere burdensome to facilities and could be deleted.<T3>Response</T3>: The content of proposed paragraph (d) (redesignatedas (f)) is required by section 1861(z) of the Act. Since the provisionis based on a statutory requirement, we cannot simply delete it. However,as of October 1, 1990 this requirement will be repealed in accordance withOBRA '87 provisions.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (e): Personnel Policies and Procedures</ITAG>In andSection; 483.75(e), we proposed that the facility must maintain currentrecords for each employee to support placement in an assigned position,ensure a safe and sanitary environment for residents and employees, provideor refer employees for periodic health examinations, and prohibit employeeswith symptoms of communicable disease from direct contact with residentsand food.<T3>Comment</T3>: Commenters suggested_andbullet; Retaining the existing requirements for written personnel policies;andbullet; Retaining the requirement for quarterly staffing reports;andbullet; Including personnel training records or screening procedures inemployee records; andandbullet; Clarification of terms or deletion of requirements for periodichealth examination of employees.<T3>Response</T3>: After reviewing the requirements contained in this provision,we have determined that certain requirements are already addressed elsewherein the regulations and, therefore, can be deleted, with other requirementsare more appropriately placed in other sections of the regulations. Weare deleting, therefore, the entire provision and replacing some of therequirements in other sections of Part 483 as follows:andbullet; The requirements of paragraph (e)(1), maintenance of sufficientinformation to support an employee's assigned placement, are already containedin andSection; 483.75(h), which requires a demonstration of job competencyby nurse's aides, and andSection; 483.25, which prescribes a series of qualitycare outcomes that require general staff competency.andbullet; The requirements of paragraph (e)(2), a safe and sanitary environment,are contained in andSection; 483.70(h), which requires a ``functional, sanitaryand comfortable environment''. We are adding the word ``safe'' to andSection;483.70(h). Accident prevention requirements are already contained in andSection;483.25(h).andbullet; We are deleting the requirements of paragraph (e)(3), periodichealth exams for employees, since we believe that andSection; 483.65(b) alreadyaddresses reasonable measures that facilities should take to prevent thetransmission of communicable diseases by employees.andbullet; The requirements of paragraph (e)(4), which prohibits employeeswith symptoms of communicable disease from resident or food contact, arenow incorporated into the infection control requirement, andSection; 483.65(b).We note that the IoM report specifically recommended that the requirementfor quarterly staffing report be eliminated. Therefore, we are not reinstatingthis requirement.With regard to employee training records or applicant screening procedures,we believe that the nurse aide training requirements introduced in OBRA'87 will, along with the survey process, assure the continued competenceof nurse aides; the competence of professional and technical personnelis addressed in licensure requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (f): Nurse Aide Training</ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed section 483.75(f) requires that the facilityprovide 80 hours of training for untrained aides before they are allowedto care for patients without direct supervision. The majority of respondentsapproved of the requirement for nurse aide training, while a minority thoughtthat the regulation should be more specific with regard to the contentof the training and emphasized that the training should combine theoryand clinical experience. Commenters_andbullet; Suggested allowing aides to work before they have completed 80hours of training;andbullet; Argued that training should be provided only in State approvedcourses or State accredited institutions;andbullet; Suggested that training take place in facilities that have anacceptable compliance history; andandbullet; Suggested that training be directed by a registered nurse.<T3>Response: </T3>OBRA '87 contains extensive provisions on nurse aidetraining, including the provision that a nurse aide cannot work in a facilityon or after January 1, 1990 for more than 4 months unless the individualhas completed a training and competency evaluation program, or a competencyevaluation program approved by the State.We have decided to delete our proposed requirement and to include the OBRA'87 provisions in this final rule, with the effective date specified inOBRA '87, January 1, 1990. To do otherwise would force facilities to comeinto compliance with one set of rules now and another set of rules in Januaryof 1990. We expect that facilities will begin immediately to prepare tomeet the OBRA '87 requirements and that this activity will have a positiveeffect on the quality of aide services during the interim.We are also including in this final rule the following OBRA '87 provisions,generally effective January 1, 1990 which are essentially self-executingdue to their explicit requirements:andbullet; Effective July 1, 1989, a facility must provide a competency evaluationprogram for currently employed nurse aides approved by the State;andbullet; A facility may not use any individual as a nurse aide for morethan 4 months unless the individual:(1) Has completed a training and competency evaluation program, or a competencyprogram approved by the State, and(2) Is competent to provide nursing and nursing related services;andbullet; Nurse aides who have not performed paid services for a continuousperiod of 24 months since the most recent completion of a training andcompetency evaluation program must undergo required retraining; and andbullet; Nurse aides must participate in required regular in-service educationby a facility.In this final rule, proposed paragraph (f) is being redesignated as paragraph(g).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (h): Notification of Changes</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.75(h) that, except in an emergency, a facilitymust notify promptly a resident's physician or other responsible personwhen there is an accident or a significant change in a resident's physical,mental or emotional status.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Recommended that only accidents that result in injury should bereported;andbullet; Suggested that abuse and neglect be included among the conditionsthat must be reported;andbullet; Noted that often no third party exists to be notified;andbullet; Requested clarification of terms or modifications of language;andandbullet; Suggested that accidents must be reported within 24 hours; changesin billings within 72 hours and 10-30 days' notice of transfer or dischargein non-emergency cases.<T3>Response: </T3>As a result of these and other comments, as discussedabove, we have moved paragraph (h), Notification of changes.andbullet; At andSection; 483.10(b)(10), we located the requirement that thefacility notify the resident's physician and any known legal representativeor family member within 24 hours of an accident or a significant changein the resident's physical or psychological status;andbullet; At andSection; 483.12(a)(4), we located the requirement that thefacility notify the resident and his or her family or representative atleast 30 days before the resident is transferred or discharged in non-emergencycases, except when__The health or safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;_The resident's health improves sufficiently to permit a more immediatetransfer;_Immediate transfer or discharge is required by a resident's urgent medicalneeds; or_A resident has not resided in the facility for 30 days.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (i): Resident Care Policies</ITAG>In andSection; 483.75(i), we proposed that a facility must have written residentcare policies that govern the continuing nursing care, and medical or otherservices furnished by the facility.<T3>Comments: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Suggested that the regulations be more specific;andbullet; Requested that a social work staff member be included on the policiesdevelopment team;andbullet; Suggested that the provision not require physician involvementin purely nursing policies; andandbullet; Suggested that resident care policy development and review applyto ICFs as well SNFs.<T3>Response: </T3>The SNF requirement that resident care policies be developedby a group of professionals is repealed by OBRA '87 effective October 1,1990. We have retained this current statutory requirement (found at section1861(j)(2) of the Act) but will terminate it on the effective date of theOBRA '87 provision, October 1, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="81">(j) Paragraph: Resident Finances</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.75(j) that a facility establish and maintaina system that assures a full and complete accounting of the resident'spersonal funds entrusted to the facility on the resident's behalf. Further,the system must preclude any commingling of resident funds with the fundsof any person other than another resident. The individual financial recordmust also be available on request to the resident or the legal representative.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Requested retention of the requirement in the current SNF regulationsthat facilities issue quarterly statements in addition to allowing theresident or his or her representative to inspect the record upon request;andbullet; Requested a full and complete accounting of all transactions accordingto generally accepted accounting principles;andbullet; Suggested retention of the prohibition, contained in the currentregulations, against commingling of a resident's funds with any other fundsof the facility, as well as with those of any person other than anotherresident;andbullet; Wanted no commingling of a resident's funds whatsoever, thus,requiring individual accounts for every resident rather than separate accountingof each resident's funds within a pooled account;andbullet; Contended that facilities are not required to accept managementof residents' personal funds but agreed that, if they do accept managementresponsibilities, Federal standards are appropriate;andbullet; Wanted the family to have access to the resident's financial records,as permitted under the current ICF regulations;andbullet; Asked us to implement the OBRA '87 requirements concerning managementof personal funds and requirements for facilities to post surety bondsand adhere to conveyance-upon-death requirements; andandbullet; Asked that we prohibit facilities from charging, other than throughtheir basic rate, for management of personal funds.<T3>Response: </T3>In these final regulations, we are revising the financialmanagement requirements placed on facilities and relocating them to andSection;483.10(c), Protection of resident funds. We are including OBRA '87 provisionsrequiring that the facility maintain a full and complete and separate accountingof each resident's personal funds entrusted to the facility, and make thisaccounting available to the resident or legal representative. This provisionis effective on the effective date of these regulations because we haveauthority to implement it under existing law. We are also implementingthose provisions of OBRA '87 that deal with residents' right to controltheir funds if they so choose. Full implementation of OBRA '87 residentfunds provisions will begin on October 1, 1990. We are not implementinga requirement for quarterly accounting of financial transactions becausewe did not propose this as a rule, it is not an OBRA '87 requirement, and,although this requirement did appear in the regulations at one time, ascommenters noted, its effective date was stayed indefinitely.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (k): Staff Qualifications</ITAG>We proposed at andSection; 483.75(k) to require staff qualifications fora number of staff categories.<T3>Comment: </T3>We received 128 comments on this issue, many of whichsuggested qualifications for activities and dietary professionals. Thesespecialties are discussed elsewhere in this preamble. The comments rangedfrom objections to Federal requirements on the basis that they may conflictwith State laws, to suggestions for further licensing requirements.<T3>Response: </T3>We are convinced by the comments that we should deferto State law concerning professional qualifications. The IoM also concludedthat it is inappropriate to prescribe detailed staffing standards. Therefore,we are eliminating from andSection; 483.75(i) (redesignated from (k)) thedetailed credential requirements for nursing facility staff.Instead, we are requiring that all professional staff be licensed, certifiedor registered in accordance with applicable State laws.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (l): Use of Outside Resources</ITAG>In proposed andSection; 483.75(l), a facility that does not employ a qualifiedperson to furnish a service must arrange with an outside person or agencyto provide that service. We proposed that the facility must assume responsibilityfor the quality and timeliness of the services furnished by an outsideresource.<T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters_ andbullet; Objected to the requirement that a facility assume responsibilityfor the quality of services furnished to its residents by an outside resource.  andbullet; Suggested that we use existing language from andSection; 405.1121(i)requiring the facility to assume professional and administrative responsibilityfor services furnished by an outside resource.   andbullet; Suggested that we require that the outside resource meet the samestandards that would be required of a facility employee.   <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that the facility must be responsible forthe quality of services furnished to its residents by an outside resource.If a facility does not believe it can assure the quality of services obtainedfrom a particular outside resource, it may obtain services from a differentsource whose quality it can assure, or it may furnish the services itself.Regarding the qualifications of outside resources, we note that OBRA '87requires that services provided by the facility, as well as services thatthe facility obtains from an outside source, must meet professional standardsof quality. We are modifying paragraph (2) of this provision to incorporatethis requirement. In this final rule, paragraph (l) has been redesignatedas paragraph (j).   <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (m): Medical Director  </ITAG>In andSection; 483.75(m), we proposed that a facility must designate a physician,registered nurse or other medical staff member to serve as medical director.The medical director is responsible for implementation of resident carepolicies, development and coordination of the resident treatment plan,and care delivered to each resident.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Summarized below are the major issues raised by commentersconcerning the medical director. Commenters_   andbullet; Objected to a nonphysician serving as medical director on thebasis that only a physician can educate facility staff on the care of specificproblems, and serve as a link between the facility and the larger healthcare community;   andbullet; Recommended that the position be abolished or required only inSNFs;   andbullet; Recommended that the position be required only in those ICFs withover 120 beds; and  andbullet; Expressed concern over possible conflict in terms of duties betweenthe medical director and the resident's primary physician (as well as othertrained professionals responsible for managing specific disciplines withinthe facility), and suggested that the medical director coordinate careprovided by attending physicians, but not develop treatment plans or providecare.   <T3>Response: </T3>In response to comments, we are making the followingrevisions to andSection;483.75(k) (redesignated from (m)). We are_   andbullet; Requiring that only a physician serve as medical director;   andbullet; Retaining the requirement for both SNFs and ICFs to have a medicaldirector since, under the final rule the Medical distinction between SNFand ICF services will be eliminated effective October 1, 1990. It is clearlyour intent, and in keeping with the IoM report, to eliminate as many distinctionsbetween SNF and ICF requirements as possible.   andbullet; Not retaining the proposed requirement that the medical directorbe responsible for development and coordination of the resident treatmentplan, and care delivered to each resident. Instead, we are requiring thatthe medical director be responsible for implementation of resident carepolicies, and the coordination of medical care in the facility. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (n): Laboratory Services</ITAG>We proposed that SNFs must provide or obtain clinical laboratory servicesto meet the needs of their residents.<T3>Comment: </T3>Proposed paragraph (n) also required that when a SNFprovides its own laboratory services, the services must meet the applicableconditions for coverage of the services furnished by independent laboratoriesspecified in 42 CFR Part 405, Subpart M. Some commenters thought that itwould be more reasonable for facilities to meet the conditions of participationfor hospital laboratories specified in andSection; 482.27.<T3>Response: </T3>We are unable to make the change suggested by commentersbecause we interpret section 1861(s)(11) of the Act as requiring a SNFthat furnishes its own laboratory services to meet the requirements forcertification as an independent laboratory. We are, however, developingproposed regulations for laboratory services that would be uniform forall providers.<T3>Comment: </T3>In proposed paragraph (n) (redesignated as (1) in thisfinal rule), we also provided that a facility that does not provide laboratoryservices must have an agreement to obtain those services from a physician'soffice, a participating hospital, SNF, or independent laboratory, whichis approved to provide these services under the Medicare program. Sevencommenters objected to allowing physicians' offices to do laboratory testingbecause they are not required to be certified for participation in theMedicare program.<T3>Response: </T3>We share the commenters' concerns, and are revisingthe redesignated paragraph (1) to read as follows: ``If the facility doesnot provide laboratory services on site, it must have an agreement to obtainthese services only from a laboratory that is approved for participationin the Medicare program either as a hospital or as an independent laboratory.''<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (p): Medical records (clinical records)</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(p) requires a facility to maintain medical recordson each resident in accordance with accepted professional standards andpractices. Generally, the facility must keep confidential all informationin a resident's records, and must permit each resident to inspect his orher records on request and provide copies on request.<T3>Comment: </T3>Summarized below are the major comments we received onmedical records.Commenters_andbullet; Suggested that the resident's physician be allowed to limit aresident's access to his or her medical record on the basis of medicalcontraindications;andbullet; Suggested we add reasonable timeframes for a facility to complywith a resident's request to inspect or provide photocopies of records;andbullet; Recommended retention of current medical record staff credentialrequirements in andSection; 405.1132(a);andbullet; Recommended retention of existing requirements in andSection; 405.1132(c) and (g), which describe the contents and the indexing of medical records,respectively;andbullet; Recommended that an exception to confidentiality be made in thecase of authorized State and Federal representatives who require residentinformation for State surveys;andbullet; Suggested that we include information in the medical record todetermine progress on meeting care plan goals.<T3>Response: </T3>In response to comments, in redesignated paragraph (n)we are_andbullet; Not limiting a resident's access to his or her records becausethat would be inconsistent with the resident's right to be fully informedof his or her health status, as provided in the resident's rights requirement,andSection; 483.10(b)(3);andbullet; Requiring that a facility provide a resident with a photocopyof records within 48 hours after a written request;andbullet; Not specifying qualifications for medical records personnel, tobe consistent with our approach to defer to State law;andbullet; Not adding further requirements for the contents of medical recordsor indexing so that facilities are left with some discretion in this area;andbullet; Not providing in this section for release of information of Federaland State representatives, since this is already addressed in 42 CFR Part405, Subpart S;andbullet; Substituting the term ``clinical records'' for ``medical records''.This is a technical change that also happens to be consistent with OBRA'87.andbullet; Adding to paragraph (n)(6) the requirement that the clinical recordcontain progress notes, as well as the results of any preadmission screeningconducted by the State.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (q): Disaster Preparedness</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(q) requires that the facility have written plansand procedures to meet all potential emergencies and disasters, and thatthe facility train employees in emergency procedures.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters suggested that we clarify training proceduresfor emergencies, while others argued that training should focus on frequentlyencountered types of emergencies. One commenter suggested that we requiremonthly fire drills, and add labor strikes to the list of emergencies.<T3>Response: </T3>We believe that training procedures are more appropriatelyplaced in guidelines rather than regulations. This list of emergenciesis not intended to be an all-inclusive list, but rather examples: therefore,we have not included labor strikes. Fire drills are already addressed inthe National Fire Protection Association standards, which require quarterlydrills on each shift. These provisions are incorporated by reference inthe Physical environment requirement, andSection; 483.70(a).<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (r): Transfer Agreement</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(r) requires that a facility have in effect awritten transfer agreement with one or more hospitals approved for participationunder Medicare and Medicaid. The facility must ensure that residents arenot involuntarily discharged or transferred to another facility exceptunder specified circumstances, and must notify a resident's representativeand physician of the tranfer.We also proposed that a facility must ensure that the resident is not involuntarilydischarged or transferred to another facility unless__A physician certifies that it is medically necessary;_The facility determines that it is necessary for the resident's welfareor the welfare of other residents;_The facility is going out of business; or_Except as prohibited by the Medicare and Medicaid programs, the resident'sbill has been unpaid.The facility must notify the resident and any representatives in writing__At least 3 days before the end of a bed hold period; and _Except in emergencies, 4 days before discharge or transfer from the facility.<T3>Comment: </T3>Regarding the portion of this provision on transfer agreements,the majority of commenters requested that we delete the requirement thata facility and the transfer hospital exchange information for determiningwhether the resident can be adequately cared for in a less expensive settingthan either the facility or the hospital. They argued that transferringpersonnel can only assure that the receiving facility is licensed to furnishthe appropriate level of care, and lack the expertise to analyze the coststructure of the transfer setting.<T3>Response: </T3>While we agree that this particular provision shouldnot be the primary mechanism for ensuring appropriateness of placement,we note that this requirement cannot simply be deleted, as it is takendirectly from section 1861(l)(2) of the Act, which currently applies onlyto SNFs. However, section 1919(a)(2) of the Act, as added by OBRA '87,extends that section's applicability to nursing facilities which, in additionto Medicaid SNFs, will also encompass those facilities currently categorizedas ICFs. While the proposed regulation appears to require that this typeof information be exchanged every time a transfer occurs, the wording ofthe statutory provision allows more flexibility. Therefore, we are revisingthis provision to clarify that information relating to whether care canbe adequately furnished in a less expensive setting need be exchanged onlywhen the transferring facility deems it appropriate. Paragraph (r) is beingredesignated as (p).<T3>Comment: </T3>In summary, commenters on the transfer and dischargeportion of this provision_andbullet; Urged that transfer and discharge requirements be relocated tothe resident rights requirement;andbullet; Complained that the time allowed for notification of transferand discharge was too short and proposed instead 30 days for nonemergencycases;andbullet; Suggested that verbal or phone notification followed by writtennotification, would be more practical;andbullet; Noted that Medicare policy may not permit a 4-day notice, as,for example, transfer or discharge must be completed within 3 days whenthere is a determination that skilled level of care is no longer necessary;andbullet; Suggested that the facility provide notification of the State'sbed hold policy at the beginning of a bed hold period rather than at theend;andbullet; Requested clarification of terms and editorial changes; andbullet; Requested that we require notice of inter-facility transfers also;andbullet; Suggested documentation of the need for transfer or dischargein the clinical record;andbullet; Suggested that concern for the welfare of others in the facilityshould be a legitimate cause for transfer or discharge;andbullet; Asked that we incorporate Medicare and Medicaid due process oflaw protections; andandbullet; Requested that we clarify to whom a resident may appeal.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to comments, we are_andbullet; Establishing transfer and discharge requirements as paragraph(a) under andSection; 483.12, Admission, transfer and discharge rights;andbullet; Retaining the language of the proposed rule, which requires thata resident be notified 4 days prior to transfer and discharge. The 30 daynotice requested by commenters would be too costly for providers at thistime. We will implement the OBRA '87 requirement for 30 days advance noticeon October 1, 1990;andbullet; Requiring documentation of the reason for transfer or dischargein the clinical record, in accordance with public comment;andbullet; Requiring that the attending physician determine that transferor discharge is necessary when the resident's medical needs or generalwelfare is involved;andbullet; Requiring that a facility physician may determine that transferor discharge is necessary when the health of individuals in the facilityis endangered;andbullet; Requiring written notice to a resident before a facility transfersor discharges a resident;andbullet; Requiring that a facility notify a resident and his or her representativesof the State's bed hold policy, if any, before transfers to a hospitalor for therapeutic leave;andbullet; Addressing notification of a change in room assignment under thequality of life requirement in andSection; 483.15(e), Accommodation of needs;andandbullet; Planning to implement a State appeals process for transfers anddischarges in a separate regulation.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (r): Quality Assessment and Assurance Committee</ITAG>Sections 1819(b)(1)(B) and 1919(b)(1)(B) of the Act, as amended by OBRA'87, require a quality assessment and assurance committee. Paragraph (r)implements this section of the law on October 1, 1990. In addition to thecommittee's statutory responsibility to oversee the quality of servicesin the facility, we expect it to act as a committee of the whole and assumethe responsibilities of the pharmaceutical services committee at andSection;483.60(c), the utilization review committee at andSection; 483.75(q), whoseexistence will be terminated September 30, 1990, and the infection controlprogram at andSection; 483.65.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (s): Utilization Review</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(s) requires that a SNF have in effect a utilizationreview (UR) plan that provides for the review of the medical necessityof services.<T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters recommended elimination of UR as a needlesspaperwork burden. Others requested clarification of various areas, suchas the review of extended duration stays.<T3>Response: </T3>We note that in OBRA '87, Congress has eliminated theUR requirement from the Act, as it pertains to SNFs. However, until repealof the SNF UR requirement becomes effective on October 1, 1990, the existingstatutory UR requirement at sections 1861(j)(8) and 1861(k) of the Actremains in effect for Medicare and Medicaid SNFs. While we are sympatheticto the concerns of those commenters who suggest that this provision shouldbe eliminated immediately from the regulations, we believe that until theOBRA '87 repeal of the SNF UR requirement becomes effective, the regulationsmust continue to reflect at least those requirements that are containedin existing law. Paragraph (s) is redesignated as (q).Regarding the suggestion to increase the maximum time interval permittedin the regulations for review of extended duration stays, we note thatsection 1861(k) of the Act does not prescribe a specific duration of staythat must be subject to review; therefore, we are revising the regulationsto allow each facility to make its own determination of what is appropriatein this regard.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (t): Disclosure of Ownership</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(t) requires facilities to comply with the disclosurerequirements of 42 CFR 420.206, Disclosure of persons having ownership,financial, or control interest.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that we revise paragraph (t)to reflect the disclosure of ownership requirements contained in OBRA '87,while another suggested that the provision be deleted.<T3>Response: </T3>Sections 4201 and 4211 of OBRA '87 amend the Act byadding new section 1819(d)(1)(B) (for Medicare) and section 1919(d)(1)(B)(for Medicaid) dealing with disclosure of ownership requirements. We haverevised paragraph (s) (redesignated from (t)) to reflect these requirements,effective October 1, 1990. In summary, revised paragraph (s) will requirefacilities to notify at the time of change the State agency when thereare changes in_andbullet; Individuals with ownership or control interest;andbullet; Officers, directors, agents or managing employees;andbullet; The corporation, association or other company responsible formanagement of the facility; orandbullet; The facility's administrator or director of nursing.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (u): Resident Participation</ITAG>We proposed that the facility must ensure resident participation in thefacility's policy and operational decision making.<T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters_andbullet; Almost unanimously opposed this provision because, in their opinions,many residents are too sick or mentally confused to sit through long boardor staff meetings, and most are usually uninformed of the issues;andbullet; Noted that discussions concerning other residents would violateconfidentiality requirements; andandbullet; Supported the use of resident and family councils as the vehiclefor involving residents in decisions affecting their care and life in thefacility.<T3>Response: </T3>We acknowledge that many of the points made by commenterscall into question the ability to implement this broadly stated requirement.Nonetheless, we feel it important that participation rights be available.We are revising this provision and including it under the quality of liferequirement at andSection; 483.15(c), to clearly give residents the rightto organize and participate in resident and family groups. We require ofthe facility that it allow such groups to exist, and, where they exist,to provide them with meeting space, privacy, and staff support. We believethis requirement is consistent with OBRA '87, which includes the rightof the resident and family to organize and participate in resident andfamily groups. The facility must also consult with, listen to, and actupon the recommendations of these groups.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (v): Independent Medical Evaluation and Audit</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 483.75(v) requires that a SNF cooperate in an effectiveprogram providing for independent medical evaluation and audit of the residentsin the facility, including medical evaluation of each resident's need forSNF care.<T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters suggested that we restore the provisionson medical care evaluation studies in existing regulations at 42 CFR 405.1137(c).Another suggested that this provision incorporate the inspection of careprocess.<T3>Response: </T3>OBRA '87 removes the statutory basis for this provision,section 1861(j)(12) of the Act, effective October 1, 1990. Therefore, wedo not believe it is appropriate to augment this provision by adding specificrequirements beyond those contained in the proposed regulations. Paragraph(v) is redesignated as (t).Summary of revisions to andSection; 483.75The following is a summary of the major changes to our proposal that weare making to andSection; 483.75 in response to comments.andbullet; We are making extensive revisions to proposed paragraph (c), Governingbody, paragraphs (4) and (5), to incorporate OBRA '87 provisions concerningfacility access, and relocating these provisions in the Protection of residentrights requirement, andSection; 483.10, paragraph (k), Access to the facility.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (c)(6), we are providing that a residenthas the right to examine the results of Federal and State surveys and plansof correction upon reasonable request, and relocating this provision tothe resident rights requirement, andSection; 483.10, paragraph (g), Examinationof survey results.andbullet; We are not making final proposed paragraph (e), Personnel Policiesand Procedures, and relocating requirements concerning communicable diseasesof employees to the Infection control requirement, andSection; 483.65, paragraph(b), Infection control program.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (h), Notification of changes, we are makingcertain revisions suggested by commenters, and relocating the contentsto the resident rights requirement, andSection; 483.10, paragraph (b)(10),Notification of changes.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (i), Resident care policies, we are removingthe specific SNF requirements in accordance with OBRA '87 provisions, andrelocating the contents in the requirement for Protection of resident rights,andSection; 483.12, paragraph (e), Resident care policies.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (j), Resident finances, we are adding therequirement that accounting be done ``according to generally accepted accountingprinciples,'' and relocating this provision to the resident rights requirement,andSection; 483.10, paragraph (c), Protection of resident funds.andbullet; We are removing the specific staff qualifications and credentialrequirements from proposed andSection; 483.75(k), (redesignated as paragraph(i)), and requiring instead that professional staff be licensed, certifiedor registered in accordance with State law.andbullet; We are requiring, in proposed paragraph (m), Medical director(redesignated as paragraph (k)), that only a physician serve as medicaldirector of a facility; and requiring that the medical director be responsiblefor implementation of resident care policies and the coordination of medicalcare in the facility.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (n), Laboratory services (redesignated asparagraph (1)), we are requiring that if a facility does not provide laboratoryservices on site, it must have an agreement to obtain these services onlyfrom a laboratory that is approved for participation in the Medicare programeither as a hospital or as an independent laboratory.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (p), Medical records (Clinical records redesignatedas paragraph (n)), we are requiring that a facility furnish a residentwith a photocopy of requested records within 48 hours after a resident'swritten request, and replacing the term, ``medical records'' with ``clinicalrecords.'' We are also adding the requirement that the clinical recordcontain progress notes.andbullet; We are revising proposed paragraph (r), Transfer and discharge,clauses (3), (4), and (5) to incorporate OBRA '87 provisions including30 day notice before transfer or discharge, effective October 1, 1990,and a 4 day notice as of the effective date of these regulations, and relocatingthe contents to the Admission, transfer and discharge rights requirement,andSection; 483.12 paragraph (a), Transfer and discharge.andbullet; We are redesignating the paragraphs within proposed paragraph(s), Utilization review (redesignated as paragraph (q)), and revising redesignatedparagraph (q)(2) to clarify when the facility must complete the extendedduration review.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (t), Disclosure of ownership (redesignatedas paragraph (s)), we are adding OBRA '87 requirements, effective October1, 1990, concerning a facility's obligation to notify the State agencywhen certain changes in ownership and management occur.andbullet; In proposed paragraph (u), Resident participation, we are incorporatingOBRA '87 provisions on the right of residents and family groups to organizeand participate, and relocating this provision to the quality of life requirement,andSection; 483.15, paragraph (c), Participation in resident and family groups.Payment ProvisionsSection 4211(b)(1) of OBRA '87 amends section 1902(a)(13) of the Act torequire a State to submit an assurance to the Secretary that its paymentrates to nursing facilities:<ITAG tagnum="21">take into account the costs of complying with subsections (b) (otherthan paragraph (3)(f) thereof), (c), and (d) of section 1919 and provide(in the case of a waiver under section 1919(b)(4)(C)(ii)) for an appropriatereduction to take into account the lower costs (if any) of the facilityfor nursing care.</ITAG>Section 1919(b)(3)(f) in the above quote refers to preadmission screeningfor mentally ill and mentally retarded individuals.Section 4211(b)(2) of OBRA '87 further provides certain timing requirementsfor State plan amendments to take into account the new provisions of section1919 of the Act, which are effective October 1, 1990. The Act providesthat each State must submit an amendment not later than April 1, 1990,to provide for an appropriate adjustment in payment amounts for nursingfacility services to be furnished during the year beginning October 1,1990. The Act requires that the Secretary review each of the amendmentsand, by September 30, 1990, approve or disapprove each of them. If an amendmentis disapproved, the State is required to submit a revised amendment meetingthe requirements. The absence of approval does not relieve the State ora nursing facility of any obligation or requirement under the Medicaidprogram.Section 4211(b)(1) of OBRA '87 also requires that the State provide forprocedures to make available to the public the data and methodology usedin establishing payment rates for nursing facilities. Consequently, weare revising andSection; 447.253(b)(1) to require that the methods and standardsused by the Medicaid agency to establish payment rates for nursing facilityservices take into account the costs of complying with the requirementsof Part 483 Subpart B (except for preadmission screening of individualswith mental illness and mental retardation under andSection; 483.20(f). Section1903(a)(2)(C) of the Act provides that 75 percent Federal financial participationis available for these costs under section 1919(e)(7) of the Act, and theseare considered Medicaid administrative costs and reimbursed as such). Themethods and standards must also provide for an appropriate reduction totake into account the lower costs (if any) of the facility for nursingcare under a waiver of the requirement to provide licensed nurses on a24-hour basis, under andSection; 483.30(c). The agency must also establishprocedures under which the data and methodology used in establishing paymentrates are made available to the public.We believe most States will need to submit amendments to their plans tomeet the requirements in andSection; 447.253(b)(1)(iii)(A). For example,a State that calculates prospective rates for long-term care facilitiesby trending forward a prior year cost base could not, we believe, providea satisfactory assurance concerning its current plan, since the State couldnot demonstrate how the additional costs of section 1919's requirements(e.g., increased staffing or new resident assessment programs) would beaccounted for under the present methodology. Moreover, a number of States'plans currently contain provisions that permit additional reimbursementor rate recalculation in order to recognize cost increases associated withcompliance with revised Fedeal or State standards. We expect that for sucha State to provide a satisfactory assurance, it must specify in its planprecisely how the additional costs will be taken into account in settingrates.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Crosswalk to Proposed Rule</ITAG>Due to the extensive rearrangement of the regulations from that originallyproposed, and the addition of numerous OBRA '87 provisions, we are includingthe following chart as a general guide to readers in identifying the sourceof the requirements in the final rule. The derivation table in Part VIof this preamble relates provisions of this final rule to existing regulations.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Final regulations</H1><H1>Source</H1>andSection;483.10 Residents rights:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Exercise of rights</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Right to be informed, includes notices of rights and services,and Admissions policy, Apply/Use Medicare/Medicaid benefits, and notificationof changes</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(b)</D><P>OBRA '87</P><P>OBRA '87</P><P>OBRA '87</P><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Protection of resident funds</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(c)</D><P>OBRA '87</P><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Free choice</ITAG><D>andSection;483.15(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Privacy and confidentiality</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(f)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Grievances</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Examination of survey results</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Work</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(g)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(i) Mail</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(h)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(j) Visitation Rights includes access to facility and visitation rights</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(i)</D><P>OBRA '87</P><ITAG tagnum="3">(k) Telephone</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(j)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(l) Personal property</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(l)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(m) Married couples</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(m)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(n) Self Administration of Drugs</ITAG><D>andSection;483.30(e)</D>andSection;483.12 Admission, Transfer and Discharge Rights:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Transfer and discharge</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.75(r)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Notice of bed-hold policy and readmission</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Equal access to quality of care</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Admissions policy, other than informing about Medicare and Medicaidapplication and use</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Resident care policies</ITAG><D>andSection;483.12(k)</D>andSection;483.13 Resident behavior and facility practices:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Restraint</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(d) and OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Abuse</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Staff treatment of residents</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(n)</D>andSection;483.15 Quality of life:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Dignity</ITAG><D>andSection;483.15(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Self-determination and participation</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(k)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Participation in resident and family groups</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(k) and andSection;483.75(u)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Participation in other activities</ITAG><D>andSection;483.10(k)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Accommodation of needs</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Activities</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.15(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Social Services</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Environmental quality of life</ITAG><D>andSection;483.15(b) and andSection;483.70(h)</D>andSection;483.20 Resident assessment:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Admission orders</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.20(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Comprehensive assessment</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.20(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Accuracy of assessments</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.20(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Comprehensive care plans</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.20(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Discharge summary</ITAG><D>andSection;483.20(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Preadmission screening for mentally ill and mentally retarded individuals</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D>andSection;483.25 Quality of care:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Activities of daily living</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Vision and hearing</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Pressure sores</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Urinary incontinence</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Range of motion</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(f)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Psychosocial functioning</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(g)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Naso-gastric trubes</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(h)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Accidents</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(j)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(i) Nutrition</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(k)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(j) Hydration</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(l)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(k) Special needs</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(m)</D><ITAG tagnum="13">(l) Drug therapy, includes:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="5">Unnecessary drugs</ITAG><D>andSection;483.25(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="5">Antipsychotic Drugs</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="5">Drug administration</ITAG><D>andSection;483.30(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;483.28 Nursing services_SNFs<D>andSection; 405.1124</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;483.28 Nursing services_ICFs<D>andSection; 442.302 and andSection;442.339</D></ITAG>andSection;4833.28 Nursing services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Sufficient staff</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Registered nurse</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Waiver of requirement to provide licensed nurses on 24-hr basis</ITAG><D/><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) NFs: Waiver of requirement to provide services of an RN for morethan 40 hours/week</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) SNFs: Waiver of requirement to provide services of an RN for morethan 40 hours/week</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D>andSection;483.35 Dietary services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Staffing</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.35(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Sufficient staff</ITAG><D>Comments</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Menus and Nutritional adequacy</ITAG><D>andSection;483.35(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Food</ITAG><D>andSection;483.15(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Therapeutic diets</ITAG><D>andSection;483.35(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Frequency of meals</ITAG><D>andSection;483.35(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Assistive devices</ITAG><D>andSection;483.35(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Sanitary conditions</ITAG><D>andSection;483.35(f)</D>andSection;483.40 Physician services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Physician supervision</ITAG><D>andSection;483.40(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Physician visits</ITAG><D>andSection;483.40(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Frequency of physicians visits</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Availability of physicians for emergency care</ITAG><D>andSection;483.40(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Physician delegation of tasks</ITAG><D>andSection;483.40(e)</D>andSection;483.45 Specialized rehabilitative services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Provision of services</ITAG><D>andSection;483.45(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Qualifications</ITAG><D>andSection;483.45(b)</D>andSection;483.55 Dental services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Advisory dentist</ITAG><D>andSection;483.50(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Outside services</ITAG><D>andSection;483.50(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Skilled nursing facilities</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Nursing facilities</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D>andSection;483.60 Pharmacy services:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Methods and procedures</ITAG><D/><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Procedures</ITAG><D>andSection;483.60(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Pharmaceutical services committee</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Service consultation</ITAG><D>andSection;483.60(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Drug regimen review</ITAG><D>andSection;483.60(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Labeling of drugs and biologicals</ITAG><D>andSection;483.60(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Storage of drugs and biologicals</ITAG><D>andSection;483.30(d)(2)</D>andSection;483.65 Infection control:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Infection control program</ITAG><D>andSection;483.65(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Prevention spread of infection</ITAG><D>andSection;483.65(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Linens</ITAG><D>andSection;483.65(b)</D>andSection;483.70 Physical environment:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Life safety from fire</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Emergency power</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Space and equipment</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Resident rooms</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Toilet facilities</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Resident call system</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(f)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Dining and resident activities</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(g)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Other environmental conditions</ITAG><D>andSection;483.70(h) and andSection;483.15(b)</D>andSection;483.75 Administration:<ITAG tagnum="3">(a) Licensure</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(b) Compliance with Federal State and locals laws before 10/1/90</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(c) Compliance with Federal State and local laws effective 10/01/90</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(d) Relationship to other HHS regulations</ITAG><D>Comments</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(e) Governing body</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(f) Institutional plan and budget</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(g) Required training of nurse aides</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(h) Proficiency of nurse aides</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.75(g)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(i) Staff qualifications</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(k)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(j) Use of outside resources</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(l)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(k) Medical director</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(m)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(l) Laboratory services</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(n)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(m) Radiology and other diagnostic services</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(o)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(n) Clinical records </ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(p)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(o) Disaster preparedness</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(q)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(p) Transfer agreement</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(q) Utilization review</ITAG><D>OBRA '87 and andSection;483.75(s)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(r) Quality assessment and assurance</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(s) Disclosure of ownership</ITAG><D>OBRA '87</D><ITAG tagnum="3">(t) Independent Medical evaluation and audit</ITAG><D>andSection;483.75(v)</D></ITAG>Waiver of Proposed RulemakingWe ordinarily publish notices of proposed rulemaking in the Federal Register,and offer the public an opportunity to comment on proposed rules. Suchnotices include a statement of the nature of the rulemaking proceeding,reference to the legal authority under which the rule is proposed, andthe terms or substance of the proposed rule or a description of the subjectsand issues involved. However, this requirement can be waived when we findgood cause that such a notice and comment procedure is impracticable, unnecessary,or contrary to the public interest, and incorporates a statement of thefinding and its reasons in the rule issued.With regard to the provisions of OBRA '87 that are self-executing, identifiedearlier in the preamble, we believe that issuance of these legislativechanges for notice and comment would be unnecessary and contrary to thepublic interest since they are being incorporated into these regulationsas they appear in the statute and are given an effective date as specifiedin OBRA '87, unless the provisions are otherwise authorized under currentlaw. Therefore, we find good cause to waive the proposed rulemaking procedurewith respect to these provisions.Regulatory Impact Statement<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Introduction</ITAG>Executive Order (E.O.) 12291 requires us to prepare and publish a finalregulatory impact analysis for any final rule that meets one of the E.O.criteria for a ``major rule''; that is, that would be likely to resultin: an annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more; a major increasein costs or prices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, State,or local government agencies, or geographic regions; or, significant adverseeffects on competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation,or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to compete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. In addition, we generally preparea final regulatory flexibility analysis that is consistent with the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C. 601 through 612), unless the Secretarycertifies that a final regulation would not have significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. For purposes of the RFA, wetreat all Medicare and Medicaid long term care providers as small entities.States and individuals are not small entities.The provisions contained in this rule are not expected to result in anannual economic impact of $100 million or more. However, the provisionswill affect a number of small and new providers. Those providers that wouldfind it difficult to compete under the final rule may view our final ruleas having a significant adverse effect on competition. Therefore, we haveprepared the following analysis, which is intended to conform to the objectivesof E.O. 12291 and the RFA.In preparing this analysis, we found it difficult to anticipate all thepotential impacts of these regulations. In the proposed rule publishedOctober 16, 1987 (52 FR 38582), we explained that, in general, the followingobservations of the IoM study on the cost implications of their recommendationsapplied also to the proposed rule. We believe that these observations applyto this final rule as well.<ITAG tagnum="21">The effects of the recommendations on the costs of regulation andon the costs of providing care to residents are not easily calculated fortwo reasons: (1) The quantitative and qualitative changes in behavior ofthe various actors in the system, and the effects on efficiency of theregulatory agencies and nursing homes, cannot be predicted on the basisof current data; (2) current data about staffing and costs in nursing homesand in state regulatory agencies are not available in sufficient detail;and (3) some immediate costs are likely to produce long-term savings thatcannot be estimated. Given these uncertainties, any estimates made_evenwith the assistance of a very elaborate cost model_would have to presenta wide range of costs to account for interactions of varying assumptions._(Page214)</ITAG>Subsequent to the publishing of the proposed rule, OBRA '87 was passedby Congress and signed into law on December 22, 1987. This legislationcovered many of the provisions that appeared in the proposed rule. Therefore,many of the provisions that we are adopting in this final rule are nowlegislative provisions.For example, nurse aide training requirements which are expected to substantiallyincrease costs, are a direct result of this legislation rather than theregulations. However, we believe that the increased training of personnelwill result in healthier residents, which will reduce costs in the longrun.The final changes for nursing services conform the regulations to manyof the legislative provisions that will be in effect. For the most part,costs would be incurred regardless of the promulgation of these regulations.These final regulations, however, do generate one area of cost in the requirementunder the resident rooms provision that each bed must have ceiling suspendedcurtains, which extend around the bed sufficiently to provide total visualprivacy. The cost involved in this requirement has been substantially minimizedby the fact that the requirement refers only to those facilities initiallycertified after the effective date of these regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Affected Entities</ITAG>As of September 1987, there were nearly 15,000 long term care facilitiesparticipating in either the Medicare or Medicaid program. Of this total,7,148 were participating in both Medicare and Medicaid. In addition tothe 7,148 long term care facilities, 1,977 SNFs were participating in Medicaidonly. A total of 5,600 ICFs were participating in Medicaid.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Effects on SNFs</ITAG>SNFs are currently required to meet the majority of the requirements includedin this final rule and therefore should have very little increased costs.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. Effects on ICFs</ITAG>There are several categories of ICFs: the hospital-based ICF; the ICF withsome SNF-certified beds; and the freestanding ICF that is usually a separateentity financially and physically. These rules will result in a greatercost increase for freestanding ICFs than for SNFs because many of the finalrequirements are not currently in effect for ICFs. ICFs that also maintainSNF residents should not be as adversely affected because many of thesefinal requirements must already be met for those SNF residents.The heaviest costs experienced by long term care facilities are staff costs,especially for nurses. The final requirements will significantly affectICFs that currently are relatively lightly staffed.In the proposed rule, we estimated costs for ICFs under Alternative 1,which required ICFs to meet nurse staffing requirements comparable to SNFs,to be approximately $100 million for increased nursing services. We wereunable to determine costs for Alternatives 2 and 3. However, we would expectthose costs to be somewhat lower, since Alternative 1's increased ICF staffingrequirements would either not be imposed (under Alternative 2) or couldbe waived under certain circumstances (under Alternative 3).In response to comments, we have adopted the essential elements of Alternative3; that is, upgraded staffing requirements for ICFs that can be waivedwhen circumstances warrant. The resulting provision is similar to thatof OBRA 87 which becomes effective for fiscal years beginning on or afterOctober 1, 1990. This regulatory requirement reads in part that the facilitymust have sufficient nursing staff to provide services to meet the needsof all residents in the facility as determined by resident assessmentsand individual plans of care. Specifically, some of the more costly requirementsare that facilities must provide services by a sufficient number of licensednurses and other nursing personnel on a 24 hour basis; and must use theservices of a registered professional nurse at least 8 consecutive hoursa day, 7 days a week. Further, a facility must designate a licensed nurseas charge nurse; and must designate a registered nurse to serve as thedirector of nursing seven days a week. The director of nursing may serveas a charge nurse only when the facility has an average occupancy of 60or fewer residents.Although these requirements will be costly for some facilities, we believethat the inclusion of a waiver in these final provisions will offset manyof these costs.<ITAG tagnum="81">E. Effect on States </ITAG>To the extent that these final rules result in higher costs in providinglong term care services, they will tend to increase State Medicaid expendituresfor those services. However, we believe there will be little or no increasedcost for State certification activities. Rather, these rules should benefitState certification agencies in that their reviews of SNFs and ICFs willbe simplified. Combining two reviews into one should result in a more cost-effectivereview system. The recently implemented Long-Term Care Survey Process hasalready intensified the focus on outcomes. The incremental changes flowingfrom this final rule will have minimal effects on States.<ITAG tagnum="81">F. Comments and Responses </ITAG><T3>Comments:</T3> Undoubtedly the major area of concern related to increasedcost was our estimate of $100 million for Alternative 1 under andSection;483.30, concerning nursing services. The general comment was that we hadgrossly underestimated this amount and that we needed to guarantee increasedallocations to cover these costs. <T3>Response:</T3> We have, in accordance with comments, adopted Alternative3 which requires a facility to provide 24-hour licensed nursing servicesthat are sufficient to meet the nursing needs of its residents and to usethe services of a registered nurse for at least 8 consecutive hours a day,7 days a week. As discussed in this preamble under the Response to Commentsconcerning andSection; 483.30, we believe that section 4211(b) of OBRA regardingpayment for nursing facility services will assure the appropriateness ofpayment rates. Furthermore, we believe that the waiver provision in thisfinal rule will reduce substantially our original cost estimates. <T3>Comment:</T3> Three commenters determined the costs to provide cubiclecurtains under the physical environment requirement to be about $50 million.This cost was estimated at $50-100 per bed for 500,000 beds; the numberof beds without full curtains being estimated to be about 50 percent ofthe total number of beds to fall under these requirements. <T3>Response:</T3> This final rule requires only facilities that are newlycertified on or after the effective date of these regulations to meet thisrequirement. This change from the proposed rule substantially reduces theestimated cost which was based on current beds without full visual enclosure.<ITAG tagnum="81">G. Conclusion </ITAG>Many persons commenting on costs recommended that we eliminate Alternative1 of the proposed rules in favor of some other, less costly approach. Webelieve that these final provisions accomplish the goal of limiting costs,through the provision of a waiver for nursing services under certain limitedconditions. We also believe that the total impact on residents will resultin improved quality of life and care. Further, we believe that the initialincreased costs for facilities will be balanced by the increased qualityof care resulting from the implementation of this final rule. Reporting Requirements Sections 483.10(b), 483.12 (a), (b), (c) and (e), 483.20 (a), (b), (d)and (e), 483.40(b), 483.45(b), 483.55(b), 483.60 (c) and (d), 483.65(a),483.75 (f), (j), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p), (q), and (s) of this final rulecontain information collections that are subject to Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) approval under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. Longterm care facilities must provide documentation to assure compliance withthe requirements in order to receive Federal funds for Medicare and Medicaid.Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto be 1,167,500 hours annually for approximately 15,000 facilities. (Comparablereporting burden for information collection requirements in existing regulationsis 2,585,300 hours annually.) A notice will be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> when approval for the reduced burden is obtained.Other organizations and individuals desiring to submit comments regardingthe burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing this burden, should send comments tothe agency officials specified in the <T2>``Address''</T2> section of this preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Derivation Table</ITAG>The following table identifies requirements in rules that these final rulessupercede that are most closely related to the new requirements of Part483.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s150,xs108,xs108,xs68</C> <H1>Subject</H1><H1>Part 483</H1><H1>Current Part 405</H1><H1>Current Part 442</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Basis, Scope Definition<D>483.1 (a) and (b) </D><D> </D><D>442.300</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.5</D><D>405.1101</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Resident Rights<D>483.10(a)(1)</D><D>405.1121(k)(5)</D><D>442.311(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(a)(3)</D><D>405.1121(k) following (14)</D><D>442.312</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(1)</D><D>405.1121(k)(1)</D><D>442.311(a)(1)^(3)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(2)</D><D>405.1121(k)(8)</D><D>442.310</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(3)</D><D>405.1121(k)(3)</D><D>442.311(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(5)</D><D>405.1121(k)(2)</D><D>442.311(a)(4)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(6)</D><D>......do</D><D>  Do.</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(7)</D><D>405.1121(m)</D><D>442.311(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(b)(10)</D><D>405.1121(j)</D><D>442.313</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(c)</D><D>405.1121(k)(6)</D><D>442.311(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(d)</D><D>405.1121(k)(3)</D><D>442.311(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(e)</D><D>405.1121(k)(8)</D><D>442.311(g)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(f)</D><D>405.1121(k)(5)</D><D>442.311(d)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(h)</D><D>405.1121(k)(10)</D><D>442.311(h)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(i)</D><D>405.1121(k)(11)-(12)</D><D>442.311(i)(2)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(j)</D><D>......do</D><D>442.311(i)(1)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(m)</D><D>405.1121(k)(13)</D><D>442.311(k)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.10(n)</D><D>405.1121(k)(14)</D><D>442.311(g)(5)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Admission, Transfer and Discharge Rights<D>483.12(a)</D><D>405.1121(k)(4)</D><D>442.311(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.12(b)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.12(c)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.12(d)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.12(e)</D><D>405.1121(l)</D><D>442.305</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Resident Behavior and Facility Practices<D>483.13(a)+(b)</D><D>405.1121(k)(7)</D><D>442.311(f), 442.308</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.13(c)</D><D>......do</D><D>442.311(f)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Quality of Life<D>483.15(a)</D><D>405.1121(k)(9)</D><D>442.311(g)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.15(b)+(d)</D><D>405.1121(k)(12)</D><D>442.311(j)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.15(f)</D><D>405.1131</D><D>442.345(a), (b) and (d)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.15(g)</D><D>405.1130</D><D>442.344</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.15(h)</D><D>405.1134(j)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Assessment<D>483.20(a)-(b)</D><D>405.1123(a), 405.1123(b), 405.1124(d), 405.1126(b), 405.1130</D><D>442.319, 442.341, 442.343, 442.344, 442.345</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.20(e)</D><D>405.1337(h)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.20(d)(3)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Quality of Care<D>483.25</D><D>405.1124(c)</D><D>442.342</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing Services<D>483.30</D><D>405.1124 (general)</D><D>442.338</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.30(a)</D><D>405.1124(c)</D><D>442.340</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.30(a)(2)</D><D>405.1124(b)</D><D>442.339(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.30(b)</D><D>405.1124(c)</D><D>442.339(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.30(b)(2)</D><D>405.1124(a)</D><D>442.339(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Dietary Services<D>483.35</D><D>405.1125 (general)</D><D>442.331</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(a)^(b)</D><D>405.1125(a)</D><D>442.332(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(c)</D><D>405.1125(b)</D><D>442.332(a)(1)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(e)</D><D>405.1125(c)</D><D>442.332(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(f)</D><D>405.1125(d)</D><D>442.331(a)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(g)</D><D/><D>442.331(c)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.35(h)</D><D>405.1125 (f) and (g)</D><D>442.331(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Physician Services<D>483.40</D><D>405.1123 (general)</D><D>442.346(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.40(a)^(c)</D><D>405.1123(b)</D><D>442.346(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.40(d)</D><D>405.1123(c)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Specialized Rehabilitation Services<D>483.45(a)</D><D>405.1126 (general)</D><D>442.343(a)^(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.45(b)</D><D>405.1126(d)</D><D>442.343(e)(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Dental Services<D>483.55</D><D>405.1129</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pharmacy Services<D>483.60 (a) and (b)</D><D>405.1127 (general)</D><D>442.335</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.60(c)</D><D>405.1127(d)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.60(d)</D><D>405.1127 (a), (b)</D><D>442.333</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.60(e)</D><D>405.1127(a)</D><D>442.336</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.60(f)</D><D>405.1127(c)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.60(g)</D><D>405.1125(i)</D><D>442.333(b)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Infection Control<D>483.65(a)-(b)</D><D>405.1135(a), (b), (f)</D><D>442.328(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.65(c)</D><D>405.1135(d)</D><D>442.327</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Physical Environment<D>483.70</D><D>405.1134</D><D>442.321-442.323</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(a)</D><D>......do</D><D>442.321</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(b)</D><D>405.1134(b)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(c)</D><D>405.1134(g), (h), (i) and (j)</D><D>442.328, 442.329</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(d)</D><D>405.1134(e)</D><D>442.324, 442. 325</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(e)</D><D>......do</D><D>442.326</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(f)</D><D>405.1134(d)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(g)</D><D>405.1134(g)</D><D>442.329</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.70(h)</D><D>405.1134(j)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Administration<D>483.75(a)</D><D>405.1120</D><D>442.315</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(b)</D><D>......do</D><D>442.251, 442.252</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(c)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(d)</D><D>405.1134(c)</D><D>442.330(a)(2)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(e)</D><D>405.1121(e)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(f)</D><D>405.1121(f)</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(g)</D><D>405.1121(h)</D><D>442.314</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(i)</D><D>405.1101</D><D>442.332, 442.333, 442.339, 442.343</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(j)</D><D>405.1121(i)</D><D>442.317</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(k) and (l) </D><D>405.1128</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(m)</D><D>......do</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(n)</D><D>405.1132</D><D>442.318</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(o)</D><D>405.1136</D><D>442.313</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(p)</D><D>405.1133</D><D>442.316</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>483.75(q)</D><D>405.1137</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>42 CFR Part 405 Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing Homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays. 42 CFR Part 442 Grant programs-health, Health facilities, Health professions, Health records,Medicaid, Nursing homes, Nutrition, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Safety. 42 CFR Part 447 Accounting, Administrative practice and procedure, Grant programs-health,Health facilities, Health professions, Medicaid, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas. 42 CFR Part 483 Grant programs-health, Health facilities, Health professions, Health records,Medicaid, Nursing homes, Nutrition, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Safety. 42 CFR Part 488 Health facilities, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements 42 CFR Part 489 Health facilities, Medicare 42 CFR Part 498 Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements <ITAG tagnum="76">CHAPTER IV_HEALTH CARE FINANCING ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHAND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG>42 CFR Chapter IV is amended as follows: A. The heading of Subchapter B is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER B_MEDICARE PROGRAM </ITAG>B. Part 405 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 405_FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE FOR THE AGED AND DISABLED </ITAG>1. The table of contents is amended by removing and reserving Subpart K.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_[Removed and Reserved] </ITAG>2. Subpart K (andSection;andSection; 405.1101 through 405.1137) is removedand reserved. <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER C_MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 442_STANDARDS FOR PAYMENT FOR SKILLED NURSING AND INTERMEDIATECARE FACILITY SERVICES </ITAG>C. Part 442 is amended as follows: 1. The authority citation for Part 442 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1102 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302),unless otherwise noted.</ITAG>2. The table of contents is amended by removing and reserving SubpartsD, E, and F. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2a. In Subpart A, andSection; 442.2, in the definition of ``immediate jeopardy,''the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR) or level A requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)''is substituted for the phrase ``(for SNFs) or standards (for ICFs and ICFs/MR).''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2b. In andSection; 442.13(b)(1), the phrase ``or level A requirements (forSNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the term ``standard.''3. In Subpart B, andSection; 442.30 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(1)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Provider Agreements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agreement as evidence of certification.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) The survey agency failed to apply the applicable certification requirementsunder Subparts B and D of Part 483, which sets forth the conditions ofparticipation for ICFs/MR;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>4. Section 442.101 is amended by revising paragraph (d)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Obtaining certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) The notice must indicate that one of the following provisions pertainsto the facility:(1) The facility meets the applicable requirements:(i) A SNF meets the requirements in each of the conditions of participationin Part 483, Subpart B of this chapter.(ii) A ICF meets the requirements in Suparts E and F of this part.(iii) A ICF/MR meets the requirements of Subpart E of this part and eachof the conditions of participation in Part 483, Subpart D of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. Section 442.105 is amended by revising the section heading and introductorytext to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certification with deficiencies: General provisions.</ITAG>If a survey agency finds a facility deficient in meeting the standardsand level B requirements (for SNFs and ICFs) specified under Subparts Band D of Part 483, the agency may certify the facility for Medicaid purposesunder the following conditions:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5a. In andSection; 442.105 (c)(1) and (d)(1), the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR)and level B requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the term``standards.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.117</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5b. In andSection; 442.117(a), the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR) or level A requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is substituted for the phrase ``(for SNFs) or standards(for ICFs and ICFs/MR).''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.118</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5c. In andSection; 442.118(a), the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR) or level A requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is substituted for the phrase ``(for SNFs) or standards(for ICFs and ICFs/MR).''5d. In andSection; 442.118(b)(1), the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR) or the levelA requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is substituted for the phrase ``(forSNFs) or the standards (for ICFs).''5e. In andSection; 442.118(b)(3)(i), the phrase ``(for ICFs/MR) or levelA requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is substituted for the phrase ``(forSNFs and ICFs/MR) or standards (for ICFs).''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 442.119</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5f. In andSection; 442.119, paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1) are amended by removingthe phrase ``conditions of participation (for SNFs and ICFs/MR)'' and addingin its place the phrase ``level A requirements (for SNFs and ICFs) andconditions of participation (for ICFs/MR)''; and by removing the phrase``or standards for ICFs.''<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_[Removed and reserved]</ITAG>6. Subpart D (andSection;andSection; 442.200 through 442.202) is removed andreserved.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_[Removed and reserved]</ITAG>7. Subpart E (andSection;andSection; 442.250 through 442.254) is removed andreserved.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_[Removed and reserved]</ITAG>8. Subpart F (andSection;andSection; 442.300 through 442.346) is removed andreserved.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 447_PAYMENTS FOR SERVICES</ITAG>D. Part 447 is amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 447 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 1102 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Payment for Inpatient Hospital and Long-Term Care FacilityServices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Payment Rates </ITAG>2. In Subpart C, andSection; 447.251 is amended by revising the definitionof ``long term care facility services'' as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 447.251</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Long-term care facility services'' means skilled nursing facility (SNF)services and intermediate care facility (ICF) services, including intermediatecare facility services for the mentally retarded (ICF/MR), and nursingfacility (NF) services.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. Section 447.253 is amended by adding a new paragraph (b)(1)(iii) andrepublishing the introductory text to paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 447.253</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Findings. </T3>Whenever the Medicaid agency makes a change in its methodsand standards, but not less often than annually, the agency must make thefollowing findings:(1) * * *(iii) With respect to nursing facility services_(A) Except for preadmission screening for individuals with mental illnessand mental retardation under andSection; 483.20(f) of this Chapter, the methodsand standards used to determine payment rates take into account the costsof complying with the requirements of Part 483 Subpart B of this Chapter;(B) The methods and standards used to determine payment rates provide foran appropriate reduction to take into account the lower costs (if any)of the facility for nursing care under a waiver of the requirement in andSection;483.30(c) of this Chapter to provide licensed nurses on a 24-hour basis;(C) The State establishes procedures under which the data and methodologyused in establishing payment rates are made available to the public.4. Section 447.255 is amended by revising paragraph (a) and republishingthe introductory text to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 447.255</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Related information.</ITAG>The Medicaid agency must submit, with the assurances described in andSection;447.253(a), the following information:(a) The amount of the estimated average proposed payment rate for eachtype of provider (hospital, SNF, ICF, ICF/MR, or nursing facility), andthe amount by which that estimated average rate increased or decreasedrelative to the average payment rate in effect for each type of providerfor the immediately preceding rate period;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. Section 447.272 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (b) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 447.272</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application of upper payment limits.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this section,aggregate payments by an agency to each group of health care facilities(that is, hospitals, SNFs, ICFs, ICFs for the mentally retarded (ICFs/MR,and nursing facilities) may not exceed the amount that can reasonably beestimated would have been paid for those services under Medicare paymentprinciples.(b) <T3>State operated facilities. </T3>In addition to meeting the requirementof paragraph (a) of this section, aggregate payments to each group of State-operatedfacilities (that is, hospitals, SNFs, ICFs, ICFs/MR, and nursing facilities)may not exceed the amount that can reasonably be estimated would have beenpaid under Medicare payment principles.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER E_STANDARDS AND CERTIFICATION</ITAG>E. Part 483 is amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 483 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1102, 1819 (a)-(d), 1861 (j) and (1), 1863, 1871,1902(a)(28), 1905 (a) and (c), and 1919 (a)-(d) of the Social SecurityAct (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395(i)(3) (a)-(d), 1395x (j) and (1), 1395hh, 1396a(a)(28),and 1396d(c) and 1396r (a)-(d)), unless otherwise noted.</ITAG>2. The heading of Part 483 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 483_CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LONG TERMCARE FACILITIES</ITAG>3. Subpart B is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Requirements for Long Term Care Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.1 Basis and scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.5 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.10 Level A requirement: Resident rights.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.12 Level A requirement: Admission, transfer and discharge rights.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.13 Level A requirement: Resident behavior and facility practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.15 Level A requirement: Quality of life.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.20 Level A requirement: Resident assessment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.25 Level A requirement: Quality of care.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.28 Level A requirement: Nursing services_Skilled nursing facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.29 Level A requirement: Nursing services_Intermediate care facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.30 Level A requirement: Nursing services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.35 Level A requirement: Dietary services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.40 Level A requirement: Physician services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.45 Level A requirement: Specialized rehabilitative services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.55 Level A requirement: Dental services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.60 Level A requirement: Pharmacy services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.65 Level A requirement: Infection control.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.70 Level A requirement: Physical environment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">483.75 Level A requirement: Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Requirements for Long Term Care Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis and scope.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Basis in legislation. </T3>(1) Section 1861(j) of the Act providesthat_(i) Skilled nursing facilities participating in Medicare must meet certainspecified requirements; and(ii) The Secretary may impose additional requirements if they are necessaryfor the health and safety of individuals to whom services are furnishedin the facilities.(2) Section 1902(a)(28) of the Act provides that skilled nursing facilitiesparticipating in Medicaid must meet the requirements contained in section1861(j) of the Act, except for the exclusion of institutions which areprimarily for the care and treatment of mental diseases.(3) Section 1905(c) of the Act provides that_(i) Intermediate care facilities participating in Medicaid must meet certainspecified requirements; and(ii) The Secretary may impose additional standards necessary for the properprovision of care.(4) Section 1919 (a)-(d) of the Act creates a new term, ``nursing facility''in the Medicaid program, which replaces the terms skilled nursing facilityand intermediate care facility effective October 1, 1990.(b) <T3>Scope. </T3>The provisions of this part contain the requirements thatan institution must meet in order to qualify to participate as a SNF inthe Medicare program, and, before October 1, 1990, as a SNF or ICF in theMedicaid program, and, effective October 1, 1990, as a nursing facilityin the Medicaid program. They serve as the basis for survey activitiesfor the purpose of determining whether a facility meets the requirementsfor participation in Medicare and Medicaid.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this subpart_``Facility'' means, unless otherwise indicated, a skilled nursing facility(SNF), an intermediate care facility (ICF) or a nursing facility (NF).``Facility'' may include a distinct part of a facility as specified inandSection; 440.40 or andSection; 440.150 of this chapter, but does not includean institution for the mentally retarded or persons with related conditionsdescribed in andSection; 440.150(c) of this chapter. For Medicare, a SNFmay not include any institution that is for the care and treatment of mentaldiseases (see Sec. 1861(j)(15) of the Act.) For Medicaid, a facility maynot include any institution that is for the care and treatment of mentaldiseases except for services furnished to individuals age 65 and over.This restriction does not apply to Medicaid SNFs and ICFs before October1, 1990 (see andSection; 1902(a)(28) of the Act).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Resident rights.</ITAG>The resident has a right to a dignified existence, self-determination,and communication with and access to persons and services inside and outsidethe facility. A facility must protect and promote the rights of each resident,including each of the following rights:(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Exercise of rights. </T3>(1) The resident hasthe right to exercise his or her rights as a resident of the facility andas a citizen or resident of the United States.(2) The resident has the right to be free of interference, coercion, discrimination,or reprisal from the facility in exercising his or her rights.(3) In the case of a resident adjudged incompetent under the laws of aState by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rights of the residentare exercised by the person appointed under State law to act on the resident'sbehalf. (b) <T3>Level B requirement: Notice of rights and services. </T3>(1) The facilitymust inform the resident both orally and in writing in a language thatthe resident understands of his or her rights and all rules and regulationsgoverning resident conduct and responsibilities during the stay in thefacility. Such notification must be made prior to or upon admission andduring the resident's stay. Receipt of such information, and any amendmentsto it, must be acknowledged in writing; (2) The resident has the right to inspect and purchase photocopies of allrecords pertaining to the resident, upon written request and 48 hours noticeto the facility; (3) The resident has the right to be fully informed in language that heor she can understand of his or her total health status, including butnot limited to, his or her medical condition; (4) The resident has the right to refuse treatment, and to refuse to participatein experimental research; and (5) The facility must_(i) Inform each resident who is entitled to Medicaid benefits, in writing,at the time of admission to the nursing facility or, when the residentbecomes eligible for Medicaid of_ (A) The items and services that are included in nursing facility servicesunder the State plan and for which the resident may not be charged; (B) Those other items and services that the facility offers and for whichthe resident may be charged, and the amount of charges for those services;and (ii) Inform each resident when changes are made to the items and servicesspecified in paragraphs (5)(i) (A) and (B) of this section. (6) The facility must inform each resident before, or at the time of admission,and periodically during the resident's stay, of services available in thefacility and of charges for those services, including any charges for servicesnot covered under Medicare or by the facility's per diem rate. (7) The facility must furnish a written description of legal rights whichincludes_ (i) A description of the manner of protecting personal funds, under paragraph(c) of this section; and (ii) A statement that the resident may file a complaint with the Statesurvey and certification agency concerning resident abuse, neglect, andmisappropriation of resident property in the facility. (8) The facility must inform each resident of the name, specialty and wayof contacting the physician responsible for his or her care. (9) Effective October 1, 1990, the facility must prominently display inthe facility written information, and provide to residents and potentialresidents oral and written information about how to apply for and use Medicareand Medicaid benefits, and how to receive refunds for previous paymentscovered by such benefits. (10) <T3>Notification of changes.</T3> (i) Except in a medical emergency orwhen a resident is incompetent, a facility must consult with the residentimmediately and notify the resident's physician, and if known, the resident'slegal representative or interested family member within 24 hours when thereis_(A) An accident involving the resident which results in injury;(B) A significant change in the resident's physical, mental, or psychosocialstatus;(C) A need to alter treatment significantly; or (D) A decision to transfer or discharge the resident from the facilityas specified in andSection; 483.12(a).(ii) The facility must also promptly notify the resident and, if known,the resident's legal representative or interested family member when thereis_(A) A change in room or roommate assignment as specified in andSection; 483.15(e)(2);or(B) A change in resident rights under Federal or State law or regulationsas specified in andSection; 483.10(b)(1).(iii) The facility must record and periodically update the address andphone number of the resident's legal representative or interested familymember.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Protection of Resident Funds.</T3> (1) The residenthas the right to manage his or her financial affairs and the facility maynot require residents to deposit their personal funds with the facility.(2) <T3>Management of personal funds.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, uponwritten authorization of a resident, the facility must hold, safeguard,manage and account for the personal funds of the resident deposited withthe facility, as specified in paragraphs (c)(3)-(8) of this section.(3) <T3>Deposit of funds.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990_(i) <T3>Funds in excess of $50.</T3> The facility must deposit any resident'spersonal funds in excess of $50 in an interest bearing account (or accounts)that is separate from any of the facility's operating accounts, and thatcredits all interest earned on the resident's account to his or her account.(ii) <T3>Funds less than $50.</T3> The facility must maintain a resident's personalfunds that do not exceed $50 in a non-interest bearing account or pettycash fund.(4) <T3>Accounting and records.</T3> Effective on [effective date of regulation],the facility must establish and maintain a system that assures a full andcomplete and separate accounting, according to generally accepted accountingprinciples, of each resident's personal funds entrusted to the facilityon the resident's behalf.(i) The system must preclude any commingling of resident funds with facilityfunds or with the funds of any person other than another resident.(ii) The individual financial record must be available on request to theresident or his or her legal representative.(5) <T3>Notice of certain balances.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, the facilitymust notify each resident that receives Medicaid benefits_(i) When the amount in the resident's account reaches $200 less than theSSI resource limit for one person, specified in section 1611(a)(3)(B) ofthe Act, and(ii) That, if the amount in the account, in addition to the value of theresident's other nonexempt resources, reaches the SSI resource limit forone person, the resident may lose eligibility for Medicaid or SSI.(6) <T3>Conveyance upon death.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, upon the deathof a resident with a personal fund deposited with the facility, the facilitymust convey promptly the resident's funds, and a final accounting of thosefunds, to the individual administering the resident's estate.(7) <T3>Assurance of financial security.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, thefacility must purchase a surety bond, or provide self-insurance to assurethe security of all personal funds of residents deposited with the facility.(8) <T3>Limitation on charges to personal funds.</T3> Effective October 1,1990, the facility may not impose a charge against the personal funds ofa resident for any item or service for which payment is made under Medicaidor Medicare.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Free choice.</T3> The resident has the right to_(1) Choose a personal attending physician;(2) Be fully informed in advance about care and treatment and of any changesin that care or treatment that may affect the resident's well-being; and(3) Unless adjudged incompetent or otherwise found to be incapacitatedunder the laws of the State, participate in planning care and treatmentor changes in care and treatment.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Privacy and confidentiality. </T3>The residenthas the right to personal privacy and confidentiality of his or her personaland clinical records.(1) Personal privacy includes accommodations, medical treatment, writtenand telephone communications, personal care, visits, and meetings of familyand resident groups, but this does not require the facility to providea private room;(2) Except as provided in paragraph (e)(3) of this section, the residentmay approve or refuse the release of personal and clinical records to anyindividual outside the facility;(3) The resident's right to refuse release of personal and clinical recordsdoes not apply when_(i) The resident is transferred to another health care institution; or(ii) Record release is required by law or third-party payment contract.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Grievances.</T3> A resident has the right to_(1) Voice grievances with respect to treatment or care that is, or failsto be furnished, without discrimination or reprisal for voicing the grievances;and(2) Prompt efforts by the facility to resolve grievances the resident mayhave, including those with respect to the behavior of other residents.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Examination of survey results.</T3> A residenthas the right to_(1) Examine the results of the most recent survey of the facility conductedby Federal or State surveyors and any plan of correction in effect withrespect to the facility. The results must be posted by the facility ina place readily accessible to residents; and(2) Receive information from agencies acting as client advocates, and beafforded the opportunity to contact these agencies.(h) <T3>Level B requirement: Work. </T3>The resident has the right to_(1) Refuse to perform services for the facility; (2) Perform services for the facility, if he or she chooses, when_ (i) The facility has documented the need or desire for work in the planof care; (ii) The plan specifies the nature of the services performed and whetherthe services are voluntary or paid; (iii) Compensation for paid services is at or above prevailing rates; and(iv) The resident agrees to the work arrangement described in the planof care. (i) <T3>Level B requirement: Mail. </T3>The resident has the right to privacyin written communications, including the right to_(1) Send and receive mail promptly that is unopened; and (2) Have access to stationery, postage and writing implements at the resident'sown expense. (j) <T3>Level B requirement: Access to Facility. </T3>(1) Until October 1,1990, the resident has the right to receive visitors and the facility mustallow access to the resident for such visitors at any reasonable hour.(2) Provisions in paragraphs (k)(vii) and (viii) of this section applyeffective October 1, 1990. (k) <T3>Level B requirement: Access and Visitation Rights. </T3>(1) The residenthas the right and the facility must provide immediate access to any residentby the following: (i) Any representative of the Secretary; (ii) Any representative of the State; (iii) The resident's individual physician; (iv) The State long term care ombudsman (established under section 307(a)(12)of the Older Americans Act of 1965); (v) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system for developmentallydisabled individuals (established under part C of the Developmental DisabilitiesAssistance and Bill of Rights Act); (vi) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system formentally ill individuals (established under the Protection and Advocacyfor Mentally Ill Individuals Act); (vii) Effective October 1, 1990, subject to the resident's right to denyor withdraw consent at any time, immediate family or other relatives ofthe resident; and (viii) Effective October 1, 1990, subject to reasonable restrictions andthe resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any time, others whoare visiting with the consent of the resident. (2) The facility must provide reasonable access to any resident by anyentity or individual that provides health, social, legal, or other servicesto the resident, subject to the resident's right to deny or withdraw consentat any time. (3) The facility must allow representatives of the State Ombudsman, describedin paragraph (k)(1)(iv) of this section, to examine a resident's clinicalrecords with the permission of the resident or the resident's legal representative,and consistent with State law.(l) <T3>Level B requirement: Telephone. </T3>The resident has the right tohave regular access to the private use of a telephone.(m) <T3>Level B requirement: Personal property. </T3>The resident has the rightto retain and use personal possessions, including some furnishings, andappropriate clothing, as space permits, unless to do so would infringeupon the rights or health and safety of other residents.(n) <T3>Level B requirement: Married couples. </T3>The resident has the rightto share a room with his or her spouse when married residents live in thesame facility and both spouses consent to the arrangement. (o) <T3>Level B requirement: Self-Administration of Drugs. </T3>Each residenthas the right to self-administer drugs unless the interdisciplinary team,as defined by andSection; 483.20(d)(2)(ii), has determined for each residentthat this practice is unsafe. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Admission, transfer and discharge rights.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Transfer and discharge_</T3>(1) <T3>Transfer and discharge requirements. </T3>The facility must permiteach resident to remain in the facility, and not transfer or dischargethe resident from the facility unless_(i) The transfer or discharge is necessary for the resident's welfare andthe resident's needs cannot be met in the facility;(ii) The transfer or discharge is appropriate because the resident's healthhas improved sufficiently so the resident no longer needs the servicesprovided by the facility;(iii) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;(iv) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be endangered;(v) The resident has failed, after reasonable and appropriate notice, topay for (or to have paid under Medicare or Medicaid) a stay at the facility.For a resident who becomes eligible for Medicaid after admission to a facility,the facility may charge a resident only allowable charges under Medicaid;or (vi) The facility ceases to operate.(2) <T3>Documentation. </T3>When the facility transfers or discharges a residentunder any of the circumstances specified in paragraphs (a)(1) (i) through(v) of this section, the resident's clinical record must be documented.The documentation must be made by_(i) The resident's physician when transfer or discharge is necessary underparagraph (a)(1)(i) or paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section; and (ii) A physician when transfer or discharge is necessary under paragraph(a)(1)(iv) of this section.(3) <T3>Notice before transfer. </T3>Before a facility transfers or dischargesa resident, the facility must_(i) Notify the resident and, if known, a family member or legal representativeof the resident of the transfer or discharge and the reasons;(ii) Record the reasons in the resident's clinical record; and(iii) Include in the notice the items described in paragraph (a)(5) ofthis section.(4) <T3>Timing of the notice. </T3>(i) Except when specified in paragraph (a)(4)(ii)of this section, the notice of transfer or discharge required under paragraph(a)(3) of this section must be made by the facility at least_(A) Effective on August 1, 1989, 4 days before the resident is transferredor discharged; and(B) Effective October 1, 1990, 30 days before the resident is transferredor discharged.(ii) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or dischargewhen_(A) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered, underparagraph (a)(1)(iii) of this section;(B) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered, underparagraph (a)(1)(iv) of this section;(C) The resident's health improves sufficiently to allow a more immediatetransfer or discharge, under paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section;(D) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the resident's urgentmedical needs, under paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section; or(E) A resident has not resided in the facility for 30 days.(5) <T3>Contents of the notice.</T3> For nursing facilities, the written noticespecified in paragraph (a)(3) of this section must include the following:(i) For transfers or discharges occurring on or after August 1, 1989_(A) The reason for transfer or discharge;(B) The effective date of transfer or discharge; and(C) The location to which the resident is transferred or discharged.(ii) For transfers or discharges occurring on or after October 1, 1989,a statement that the resident has the right to appeal the action to theState agency designated by the State for such appeals.(iii) For transfers or discharges occurring on or after October 1, 1990_(A) The name, address and telephone number of the State long term careombudsman;(B) For nursing facility residents with developmental disabilities, themailing address and telephone number of the agency responsible for theprotection and advocacy of developmentally disabled individuals establishedunder part C of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of RightsAct; and(C) For nursing facility residents who are mentally ill, the mailing addressand telephone number of the agency responsible for the protection and advocacyof mentally ill individuals established under the Protection and Advocacyfor Mentally Ill Individuals Act.(6) <T3>Orientation for transfer or discharge.</T3> A facility must providesufficient preparation and orientation to residents to ensure safe andorderly transfer or discharge from the facility.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Notice of bed-hold policy and readmission. (EffectiveOctober 1, 1990)</T3>_(1) <T3>Notice before transfer.</T3> Before a facility transfers a residentto a hospital or allows a resident to go on therapeutic leave, the facilitymust provide written information to the resident and a family member orlegal representative that specifies_(i) The duration of the bed-hold policy under the State plan, if any, duringwhich the resident is permitted to return and resume residence in the facility;and(ii) The facility's policies regarding bed hold periods, which must beconsistent with paragraph (b)(3) of this section, permitting a residentto return.(2) <T3>Notice upon transfer.</T3> At the time of transfer of a resident toa hospital or for therapeutic leave, a nursing facility must provide writtennotice to the resident and a family member or legal representative, whichspecifies the duration of the bed hold policy described in paragraph (b)(1)of this section.(3) <T3>Permitting resident to return to facility.</T3> A nursing facilitymust establish and follow a written policy under which a resident whosehospitalization or therapeutic leave exceeds the bed-hold period underthe State plan, is readmitted to the facility immediately upon the firstavailability of a bed in a semi-private room if the resident_(i) Requires the services provided by the facility; and(ii) Is eligible for Medicaid nursing facility services.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Equal access to quality care (Effective October1, 1990).</T3> (1) A facility must establish and maintain identical policiesand practices regarding transfer, discharge, and the provision of servicesunder the State plan for all individuals regardless of source of payment;(2) The facility may charge any amount for services furnished to non-Medicaidresidents consistent with the notice requirement in andSection; 483.10(a)(5)(i)describing the charges; and(3) The State is not required to offer additional services on behalf ofa resident other than services provided in the State plan.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Admissions policy (Effective October 1, 1990).</T3>(1) The facility must_(i) Not require a third party guarantee of payment to the facility as acondition of admission, or expedited admission, or continued stay in thefacility;(ii) Not charge, solicit, accept, or receive, in addition to any amountotherwise required to be paid under the State plan, any gift, money, donationor other consideration as a precondition of admission, expedited admissionor continued stay in the facility.(2) A facility must_(i) Not require residents or potential residents to waive their rightsto Medicare or Medicaid;(ii) Not require oral or written assurance that residents or potentialresidents are not eligible for, or will not apply for, Medicare or Medicaidbenefits.(3) States or political subdivisions may apply stricter admissions standardsunder State or local laws than specified in paragraphs (d)(1) and (2) ofthis section, to prohibit discrimination against individuals entitled toMedicaid benefits.(4) A facility may require an individual who has legal access to a resident'sincome or resources available to pay for facility care, to sign a contract,without incurring personal financial liability, to provide facility paymentfrom the resident's income or resources.(5) A nursing facility may charge a resident who is eligible for Medicaidfor items and services the resident has requested and received, and thatare not specified in the State plan as included in the term ``nursing facilityservices.''(6) A nursing facility may solicit, accept or receive a charitable, religiousor philanthropic contribution from an organization or from a person unrelatedto the resident, or potential resident, but only to the extent that thecontribution is not a condition of admission, expedited admission, or continuedstay in the facility.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Resident care policies.</T3> Until October 1,1990, the facility must have written resident care policies that governthe continuing nursing care, and medical or other services furnished bythe facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Resident behavior and facility practices.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Restraints.</T3> The resident has the right tobe free from any physical restraints imposed or psychoactive drug administeredfor purposes of discipline or convenience, and not required to treat theresident's medical symptoms.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Abuse.</T3> The resident has the right to be freefrom verbal, sexual, physical or mental abuse, corporal punishment, andinvoluntary seclusion.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Staff treatment of residents.</T3> The facilitymust develop and implement written policies and procedures that prohibitmistreatment, neglect or abuse of residents.(1) The facility must_(i) Not use verbal, mental, sexual, or physical abuse, including corporalpunishment, or involuntary seclusion; and(ii) Not employ individuals who have been convicted, of abusing, neglectingor mistreating individuals.(2) The facility must ensure that all alleged violations involving mistreatment,neglect or abuse, including injuries of unknown source, are reported immediatelyto the administrator of the facility or to other officials in accordancewith State law through established procedures.(3) The facility must have evidence that all alleged violations are thoroughlyinvestigated, and must prevent further potential abuse while the investigationis in progress.(4) The results of all investigations must be reported to the administratoror his designated representative or to other officials in accordance withState law within 5 working days of the incident, and if the alleged violationis verified, appropriate corrective action is taken.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Quality of life. </ITAG>A facility must care for its residents in a manner and in an environmentthat promotes maintenance or enhancement of each resident's quality oflife. (a) <T3>Level B requirement: Dignity.</T3> The facility must promote care forresidents in a manner and in an environment that maintains or enhanceseach resident's dignity and respect in full recognition of his or her individuality.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Self-determination and participation. </T3>Theresident has the right to_ (1) Choose activities, schedules, and health care consistent with his orher interests, assessments and plans of care; (2) Interact with members of the community both inside and outside thefacility; and (3) Make choices about aspects of his or her life in the facility thatare significant to the resident. (c) <T3>Level B requirement: Participation in resident and family groups.</T3>(1) A resident has the right to organize and participate in resident groupsin the facility; (2) A resident's family has the right to meet in the facility with thefamilies of other residents in the facility; (3) The facility must provide a resident or family group, if one exists,with private space; (4) Staff or visitors may attend meetings at the group's invitation; (5) The facility must provide a designated staff person responsible forproviding assistance and responding to written requests that result fromgroup meetings; (6) When a resident or family group exists, the facility must listen tothe views and act upon the grievances and recommendations of residentsand families concerning proposed policy and operational decisions affectingresident care and life in the facility. (d) <T3>Level B requirement: Participation in other activities.</T3> A residenthas the right to participate in social, religious, and community activitiesthat do not interfere with the rights of other residents in the facility.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Accommodation of needs.</T3> A resident has theright to_ (1) Reside and receive services in the facility with reasonable accommodationof individual needs and preferences, except when the health or safety ofthe individual or other residents would be endangered; and (2) Receive notice before the resident's room or roommate in the facilityis changed. (f) <T3>Level B requirement: Activities.</T3> (1) The facility must providefor an ongoing program of activities designed to meet, in accordance withthe comprehensive assessment, the interests and the physical, mental, andpsychosocial well-being of each resident. (2) The activities program must be directed by a qualified professionalwho_ (i) Is a qualified therapeutic recreation specialist who is_ (A) Licensed or registered, if applicable, by the State in which practicing;and (B) Eligible for certification as a therapeutic recreation specialist bya recognized accrediting body on August 1, 1989; or (ii) Has 2 years of experience in a social or recreational program withinthe last 5 years, 1 of which was full-time in a patient activities programin a health care setting; or (iii) Is a qualified occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant;or (iv) Has completed a training course approved by the State.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Social Services. </T3>(1)_ The facility must providemedically-related social services to attain or maintain the highest practicablephysical, mental or psychosocial well-being of each resident. (2) <T3>Skilled nursing facilities. </T3>(i) Until October 1, 1990, the facilitymust meet the social service needs of its residents by either obtainingsocial services from an outside source or by furnishing the service directly;and (ii) Effective October 1, 1990, a facility with more than 120 beds mustemploy a full-time qualified social worker. (3) <T3>Nursing facilities. </T3>Effective October 1, 1990, a facility withmore than 120 beds must employ a qualified social worker on a full-timebasis.(4) <T3>Qualifications of social worker. </T3>A qualified social worker isan individual with_(i) A bachelor's degree in social work; or (ii) Two years of social work supervised experience in a health care settingworking directly with individuals; or (iii) Similar professional qualifications. (h) <T3>Level B requirement: Environment. </T3>The facility must provide_(1) A safe, clean, comfortable and homelike environment, allowing the residentto use his or her personal belongings to the extent possible; (2) Housekeeping and maintenance services necessary to maintain a sanitary,orderly and comfortable interior; (3) Clean bed and bath linens that are in good condition; (4) Private closet space in each resident room, as specified in andSection;483.70(d)(2)(iv) of this section; (5) Adequate and comfortable lighting levels in all areas;(6) Comfortable and safe temperature levels. Facilities initially certifiedafter [the effective date of these regulations] must maintain a temperaturerange of 71-81 anddegrees;F; and (7) For the maintenance of comfortable sound levels. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Resident assessment.</ITAG>The facility must conduct initially and periodically a comprehensive, accurate,standardized, reproducible assessment of each resident's functional capacity.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Admission orders.</T3> At the time each residentis admitted, the facility must have physician orders for the resident'simmediate care.(b) <T3>Standard: Comprehensive assessments.</T3>(1) The facility must make a comprehensive assessment of a resident's needs,which_(i) Effective October 1, 1990, is based on a uniform data set specifiedby the Secretary and uses an instrument that is specified by the State;and(ii) Describes the resident's capability to perform daily life functionsand significant impairments in functional capacity.(2) The comprehensive assessment must include at least the following information:(i) Medically defined conditions and prior medical history;(ii) Medical status measurement;(iii) Functional status;(iv) Sensory and physical impairments;(v) Nutritional status and requirements;(vi) Special treatments or procedures;(vii) Psychosocial status;(viii) Discharge potential;(ix) Dental condition;(x) Activities potential;(xi) Rehabilitation potential;(xii) Cognitive status; and(xiii) Drug therapy.(3) [Reserved](4) <T3>Frequency.</T3> Assessments must be conducted_(i) For individuals admitted on or after [effective date of regulation],no later than 14 days after the date of admission;(ii) For individuals admitted on or after October 1, 1990, no later than4 days after the date of admission;(iii) For current residents of a facility, not later than October 1, 1991;(iv) Promptly after a significant change in the resident's physical ormental condition; and(v) In no case less often than once every 12 months.(5) <T3>Review of assessments.</T3> The nursing facility must examine eachresident no less than once every 3 months, and as appropriate, revise theresident's assessment to assure the continued accuracy of the assessment.(6) <T3>Use.</T3> The results of the assessment are used to develop, review,and revise the resident's comprehensive plan of care, under paragraph (d)of this section.(7) <T3>Coordination.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, the facility must coordinateassessments with any State-required preadmission screening program to themaximum extent practicable to avoid duplicative testing and effort.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Accuracy of assessments.</T3> (1) <T3>Coordination.</T3> (i) Each assessment must be conducted or coordinated,with the appropriate participation of health professionals.(ii) Effective October 1, 1990, each assessment must be conducted or coordinatedby a registered nurse who signs and certifies the completion of the assessment.(2) <T3>Certification.</T3> Each individual who completes a portion of theassessment must sign and certify the accuracy of that portion of the assessment.(3) <T3>Penalty for Falsification.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, an individualwho willfully and knowingly certifies (or causes another individual tocertify) a material and false statement in a resident assessment is subjectto civil money penalties. The implementing regulations for this statutoryauthority are located in Part 1003 of this chapter.(4) <T3>Use of independent assessors.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990 if a Statedetermines, under a survey or otherwise, that there has been a knowingand willful certification of false statements under paragraph (c)(3) ofthis section, the State may require (for a period specified by the State)that resident assessments under this paragraph be conducted and certifiedby individuals who are independent of the facility and who are approvedby the State.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Comprehensive care plans.</T3> (1) The facilitymust develop a comprehensive care plan for each resident that includesmeasurable objectives and timetables to meet a resident's medical, nursingand psychosocial needs that are identified in the comprehensive assessment.(2) A comprehensive care plan must be_(i) Developed within 7 days after completion of the comprehensive assessment;(ii) Prepared by an interdisciplinary team, that effective October 1, 1990,includes the attending physician, a registered nurse with responsibilityfor the resident, and other appropriate staff in disciplines as determinedby the resident's needs, and with the participation of the resident, theresident's family or legal representative, to the extent practicable; and(iii) Periodically reviewed and revised by a team of qualified personsafter each assessment.(3) The services provided or arranged by the facility must_(i) Meet professional standards of quality; and(ii) Be provided by qualified persons in accordance with each resident'swritten plan of care.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Discharge summary.</T3> When the facility anticipatesdischarge, a resident must have a discharge summary that includes_(1) A recapitulation of the resident's stay;(2) A final summary of the resident's status to include items in paragraph(b)(2) of this section, at the time of the discharge that is availablefor release to authorized persons and agencies, with the consent of theresident or legal representative; and(3) A post-discharge plan of care that developed with the participationof the resident and his or her family, which will assist the resident toadjust to his or her new living environment.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Preadmission screening for mentally ill individualsand individuals with mental retardation.</T3> (1) A nursing facility mustnot admit, on or after January 1, 1989, any new resident with_(i) Mental illness as defined in paragraph (f)(2)(i) of this section, unlessthe State mental health authority has determined, based on an independentphysical and mental evaluation performed by a person or entity other thanthe State mental health authority, prior to admission, whether_(A) Because of the physical and mental condition of the individual, theindividual requires the level of services provided by a nursing facility;and(B) If the individual requires such level of services, the individual requiresactive treatment for mental illness; or(ii) Mental retardation, as defined in paragraph (f)(2)(ii) of this section,unless the State mental retardation or developmental disability authorityhas determined prior to admission whether_(A) Because of the physical and mental condition of the individual, theindividual requires the level of services provided by a nursing facility;and(B) If the individual requires such level of services, the individual requiresactive treatment for mental retardation.(2) <T3>Definition.</T3> For purposes of this section_(i) An individual is considered to have ``mental illness'' if the individualhas a primary or secondary diagnosis of mental disorder (as defined inthe Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 3rd edition)and does not have a primary diagnosis of dementia (including Alzheimer'sdisease or a related disorder).(ii) An individual is considered to be ``mentally retarded'' if the individualis mentally retarded or a person with a related condition as describedin 42 CFR 435.1009.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Quality of care.</ITAG>Each resident must receive the necessary nursing, medical and psychosocialservices to attain and maintain the highest possible mental and physicalfunctional status, as defined by the comprehensive assessment and planof care. Each resident must receive and the facility must provide the necessarycare and services to attain or maintain the highest practicable physical,mental, and psychosocial well-being, in accordance with the comprehensiveassessment and plan of care.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Activities of daily living. </T3>Based on thecomprehensive assessment of a resident, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident's abilities in activities of daily living do not diminishunless circumstances of the individual's clinical condition demonstratethat diminution was unavoidable. This includes the resident's ability to_(i) Bathe, dress and groom;(ii) Transfer and ambulate;(iii) Toilet;(iv) Eat; and(v) To use speech, language or other functional communication systems.(2) A resident is given the appropriate treatment and services to maintainor improve his or her abilities specified in paragraph (a)(1) of this section;and(3) A resident who is unable to carry out activities of daily living receivesthe necessary services to maintain good nutrition, grooming, and personaland oral hygiene.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Vision and hearing. </T3>To ensure that residentsreceive proper treatment and assistive devices to maintain vision and hearingabilities, the facility must, if necessary, assist the resident_(1) In making appointments; and(2) By arranging for transportation to and from the office of a medicalpractitioner specializing in the treatment of vision or hearing impairmentor the office of a professional specializing in the provision of visionor hearing assistive devices.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Pressure sores. </T3>Based on the comprehensiveassessment of a resident, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident who enters the facility without pressure sores does notdevelop pressure sores unless the individual's clinical condition demonstratesthat they were unavoidable; and(2) A resident having pressure sores receives necessary treatment and servicesto promote healing, prevent infection and prevent new sores from developing.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Urinary Incontinence. </T3>Based on the resident'scomprehensive assessment, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident who is incontinent of bladder receives the appropriate treatmentand services to restore as much normal bladder functioning as possible;(2) A resident who enters the facility without an indwelling catheter isnot catheterized unless the resident's clinical condition demonstratesthat catheterization was necessary; and(3) A resident who is incontinent of bladder receives appropriate treatmentand services to prevent urinary tract infections and to restore as muchnormal bladder function as possible.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Range of motion. </T3>Based on the comprehensiveassessment of a resident, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident who enters the facility without a limited range of motiondoes not experience reduction in range of motion unless the resident'sclinical condition demonstrates that a reduction in range of motion isunavoidable; and(2) A resident with a limited range of motion and/or receives appropriatetreatment and services to increase range of motion to prevent further decreasein range of motion.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Psychosocial functioning. </T3>Based on the comprehensiveassessment of a resident, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident who displays psychosocial adjustment difficulty, receivesappropriate treatment and services to achieve as much remotivation andreorientation as possible; and(2) A resident whose assessment did not reveal a psychosocial adjustmentdifficulty does not display a pattern of decreased social interaction and/orincreased withdrawn, angry, or depressive behaviors, unless the resident'sclinical condition demonstrates that such a pattern was unavoidable.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: </T3><T3>Naso-gastric tubes. </T3>Based on the comprehensive assessment of aresident, the facility must ensure that_(1) A resident who has been able to eat enough alone or with assistanceis not fed by naso-gastric tube unless the resident's clinical conditiondemonstrates that use of a naso-gastric tube was unavoidable; and(2) A resident who is fed by a naso-gastric or gastrostomy tube receivesthe appropriate treatment and services to prevent aspiration pneumonia,diarrhea, vomiting, dehydration, metabolic abnormalities, and nasal-pharyngealulcers and to restore, if possible, normal feeding function.(h) <T3>Level B requirement: Accidents. </T3>The facility must ensure that_(1) The resident environment remains as free of accident hazards as ispossible; and(2) Each resident receives adequate supervision and assistive devices toprevent accidents.(i) <T3>Level B requirement: Nutrition. </T3>Based on a resident's comprehensiveassessment, the facility must ensure that a resident_(1) Maintains acceptable parameters of nutritional status, such as bodyweight and protein levels, unless the resident's clinical condition demonstratesthat this is not possible; and(2) Receives a therapeutic diet when there is a nutritional problem.(j) <T3>Level B requirement: Hydration. </T3>The facility must provide eachresident with sufficient fluid intake to maintain proper hydration andhealth.(k) <T3>Level B requirement: Special needs. </T3>The facility must ensure thatresidents receive proper treatment and care for the following special services:(1) Injections;(2) Parenteral and enteral fluids;(3) Colostomy, ureterostomy or ileostomy care;(4) Tracheostomy care;(5) Tracheal suctioning;(6) Respiratory care;(7) Podiatric care; and(8) Prostheses.(l) <T3>Level B requirement: Drug Therapy.</T3>_(1) <T3>Unnecessary drugs</T3>. Each resident's drug regimen must be free fromunnecessary drugs. (2) <T3>Antipsychotic Drugs. </T3>Based on a comprehensive assessment of aresident, the facility must ensure that_ (i) Residents who have not used antipsychotic drugs and are not given thesedrugs unless antipsychotic drug therapy is necessary to treat a specificcondition; and (ii) Residents who use antipsychotic drugs receive gradual dose reductions,drug holidays or behavioral programming, unless clinically contraindicatedin an effort to discontinue these drugs.(m) <T3>Level B requirement: Medication Errors</T3>. The facility must ensurethat_ (1) It is free of significant medication error rates; and (2) Residents are free of any significant medication errors. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.28 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Nursing services-skilled nursing facilities.</ITAG>The requirements of this section are effective through September 30, 1990.The skilled nursing facility provides 24-hour service by licensed nurses,including the services of a registered nurse at least during the day tourof duty 7 days a week. There is an organized nursing service with a sufficientnumber of qualified nursing personnel to meet the total nursing needs ofall patients in the facility. (See andSection; 405.1911(a) regarding waiverof the 7-day registered nurse requirement.) (a) <T3>Level B requirement: Director of nursing services. </T3>The directorof nursing services is a qualified registered nurse employed full-timewho has, in writing, administrative authority, responsibility, and accountabilityfor the functions, activities, and training of the nursing services staff,and serves only one facility in this capacity. If the director of nursingservices has other institutional responsibilities, a qualified registerednurse serves as her assistant so that there is the equivalent of a full-timedirector of nursing services on duty. The director of nursing servicesis responsible for the development and maintenance of nursing service objectives,standards of nursing practice, nursing policy and procedure manuals, writtenjob descriptions for each level of nursing personnel, scheduling of dailyrounds to see all patients, methods for coordination of nursing serviceswith other patient services, for recommending the number and levels ofnursing personnel to be employed, and nursing staff development (see andSection;405.1121(h)). (b) <T3>Level B requirement: Charge nurse. </T3>A registered nurse, or a qualifiedlicensed practical (vocational) nurse, is designated as charge nurse bythe director of nursing services for each tour of duty, and is responsiblefor supervision of the total nursing activities in the facility duringeach tour of duty. The director of nursing services does not serve as chargenurse in an facility with a average daily total occupancy of 60 or morepatients. The charge nurse delegates responsibility to nursing personnelfor the direct nursing care of specific patients during each tour of duty,on the basis of staff qualifications, size and physical layout of the facility,characteristics of the patient load, and the emotional, social, and nursingcare needs of patients. (c) <T3>Level B requirement: Twenty-four-hour nursing service. </T3>The facilityprovides 24-hour nursing services which are sufficient to meet total nursingneeds and which are in accordance with the patient care policies developedas provided in andSection; 405.1121(1). The policies are designed to ensurethat each patient receives treatments, medications, and diet as prescribed,and rehabilitative nursing care as needed; receives proper care to preventdecubitus ulcers and deformities, and is kept comfortable, clean, well-groomed,and protected from accident, injury, and infection, and encouraged, assisted,and trained in self-care and group activities. Nursing personnel, includingat least one registered nurse on the day tour of duty 7 days a week, licensedpractical (vocational) nurses, nurse aides, orderlies, and ward clerks,are assigned duties consistent with their education and experience andbased on the characteristics of the patient load. Weekly time schedulesare maintained and indicate the number and classifications of nursing personnel,including relief personnel, who worked on each unit for each tour of duty.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Nursing services_intermediate care facilities.</ITAG>The requirements of this section are effective through September 30, 1990.(a) The ICF must have staff on duty 24 hours a day sufficient in numberand qualifications to carry out the policies, responsibilities, and programsof the ICF.(b) The ICF must have a registered nurse or a licensed practical or vocationalnurse to supervise the ICF's health services full time, 7 days a week,on the day shift.(c) The nurse must have a current license to practice in the State.(d) If the ICF employs a licensed practical or vocational nurse to supervisehealth services, the ICF must have a formal contract with a registerednurse to consult with the licensed practical or vocational nurse at regularintervals, but not less than 4 hours each week.(e) To be qualified to serve as a health services supervisor, a licensedpractical or vocational nurse must_(1) Be a graduate of a State-approved school of practical nursing;(2) Have education or other training that the State authority responsiblefor licensing practical nurses considers equal to graduation from a State-approvedschool of practical nursing; or(3) Have passed the Public Health Service examination for waivered licensedpractical or vocational nurses.(f) The ICF may employ as charge nurse an individual who is licensed bythe State in a category other than registered nurse or licensed practicalor vocational nurse if_(1) The individual has completed a training program to get the licensethat included at least the same number of classroom and practice hoursin all nursing subjects as in the program of a State-approved school ofpractical or vocational nursing; and(2) The State agency responsible for licensing the individual submits areport to the Medicaid agency comparing State licensed practical nurseor vocational nurse course requirements with those for the program completedby the individual.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Nursing services.</ITAG>Effective October 1, 1990, the facility must have sufficient nursing staffto provide nursing and related services to attain or maintain the highestpracticable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being of each resident,as determined by resident assessments and individual plans of care.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Sufficient staff. </T3>(1) The facility must provideservices by sufficient numbers of each of the following types of personnelon a 24-hour basis to provide nursing care to all residents in accordancewith resident care plans:(i) Except when waived under paragraph (c) of this section, licensed nurses;and(ii) Other nursing personnel.(2) Except when waived under paragraph (c) of this section, the facilitymust designate a licensed nurse to serve as a charge nurse on each tourof duty.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Registered nurse. </T3>(1) Except when waivedunder paragraph (c) or (d) of this section, the facility must use the servicesof a registered nurse for at least 8 consecutive hours a day, 7 days aweek.(2) Except when waived under paragraph (c) or (d) of this section, thefacility must designate a registered nurse to serve as the director ofnursing on a full time basis.(3) The director of nursing may serve as a charge nurse only when the facilityhas an average daily occupancy of 60 or fewer residents.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Nursing facilities: Waiver of requirement to providelicensed nurses on a 24-hour basis. </T3>A facility may request a waiverfrom either the requirement that a nursing facility provide a registerednurse for at least 8 consecutive hours a day, 7 days a week, as specifiedin paragraph (b) of this section, or the requirement that a nursing facilityprovide licensed nurses on a 24-hour basis, including a charge nurse asspecified in paragraph (a) of this section, if the following conditionsare met:(1) The facility demonstrates to the satisfaction of the State that thefacility has been unable, despite diligent efforts (including offeringwages at the community prevailing rate for nursing facilities), to recruitappropriate personnel;(2) The State determines that a waiver of the requirement will not endangerthe health or safety of individuals staying in the facility; (3) The State finds that, for any periods in which licensed nursing servicesare not available, a registered nurse or a physician is obligated to respondimmediately to telephone calls from the facility; (4) A waiver granted under the conditions listed in paragraph (c) of thissection is subject to annual State review; and (5) Effective October 1, 1990, in granting or renewing a waiver, a facilitymay be required by the State to use other qualified, licensed personnel.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: SNFs: Waiver of the requirement to provide servicesof a registered nurse for more than 40 hours a week. </T3>(1) The Secretarymay waive the requirement that a SNF provide the services of a registerednurse for more than 40 hours a week, including a director of nursing specifiedin paragraph (b) of this section, if the Secretary finds that the facility_(i) Is located in a rural area and the supply of skilled nursing facilityservices in the area is not sufficient to meet the needs of individualsresiding in the area; (ii) Has one full-time registered nurse who is regularly on duty at thefacility 40 hours a week; and (iii) Either_(A) Has only patients whose physicians have indicated (through physicians'orders or admission notes) that they do not require the services of a registerednurse or a physician for a 48-hour period; or (B) Has made arrangements for a registered nurse or a physician to spendtime at the facility, as determined necessary by the physician, to providenecessary skilled nursing services on days when the regular full-time registerednurse is not on duty. (2) A waiver of the registered nurse requirement under paragraph (d)(1)of this section is subject to annual renewal by the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirements: Dietary Services.</ITAG>The facility must provide each resident with a nourishing, palatable, well-balanceddiet that meets the daily nutritional and special dietary needs of eachresident. (a) <T3>Level B requirement: Staffing. </T3>The facility must employ a qualifieddietitian either full-time, part-time, or on a consultant basis. (1) If a qualified dietitian is not employed full-time, the facility mustdesignate a person to serve as the director of food service.(2) A qualified dietitian is one who is qualified based upon either registrationby the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the American Dietetic Association,or on the basis of education, training, or experience in identificationof dietary needs, planning and implementation of dietary programs.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Sufficient staff.</T3> The facility must employsufficient support personnel competent to carry out the functions of thedietary service.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Menus and nutritional adequacy. </T3>Menus must_(1) Meet the nutritional needs of residents in accordance with the recommendeddietary allowances of the Food and Nutrition Board of the National ResearchCouncil, National Academy of Sciences; (2) Be prepared in advance; and(3) Be followed.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Food.</T3> Each resident receives and the facilityprovides_(1) Food prepared by methods that conserve nutritive value, flavor andappearances;(2) Food that is palatable, attractive, and at the proper temperature;(3) Food prepared in a form designed to meet individual needs; and(4) Substitutes offered of similar nutritive value to residents who refusefood served.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Therapeutic diets. </T3>Therapeutic diets mustbe prescribed by the attending physician.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Frequency of meals.</T3>(1) Each resident receivesand the facility provides at least three meals daily, at regular timescomparable to normal mealtimes in the community.(2) There must be no more than 14 hours between a substantial evening mealand breakfast the following day, except as provided in (4) below.(3) The facility must offer snacks at bedtime daily.(4) When a nourishing snack is provided at bedtime, up to 16 hours mayelapse between a substantial evening meal and breakfast the following dayif a resident group agrees to this meal span and a nourishing snack isserved.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Assistive devices.</T3> The facility must providespecial eating equipment and utensils for residents who need them.(h) <T3>Level B requirement: Sanitary conditions.</T3> The facility must_(1) Procure food from sources approved or considered satisfactory by Federal,State, or local authorities;(2) Store, prepare, distribute, and serve food under sanitary conditions;and(3) Dispose of garbage and refuse properly.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Physician services. </ITAG>A physician must personally approve a recommendation that an individualbe admitted to a facility. Each resident must remain under the care ofa physician. (a) <T3>Level B requirement: Physician supervision.</T3> The facility mustensure that_ (1) The medical care of each resident is supervised by a physician; and(2) Another physician supervises the medical care of residents when theirattending physician is unavailable. (b) <T3>Level B requirement: Physician visits.</T3> The physician must_ (1) Review the resident's total program of care, including medicationsand treatments, at each visit required by paragraph (c) of this section;(2) Write, sign and date progress notes at each visit; and (3) Sign all orders.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Frequency of physician visits.</T3> Physicianvisits must conform to the following schedule: (1) For skilled nursing facilities, the resident must be seen by a physicianat least once every 30 days for the first 90 days after admission, andat least once every 60 days thereafter. (2) For nursing facilities (and for intermediate care facilities untilOctober 1, 1990), the resident must be seen by a physician at least onceevery 30 days for the first 90 days after admission, and at least onceevery 90 days thereafter. (3) A physician visit is considered timely if it occurs not later than10 days after the date the visit was required. (4) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(5) of this section, all requiredphysician visits must be made by the physician personally. (5) At the option of the physician, required visits after the initial visitmay alternate between personal visits by the physician and visits by aphysician assistant or nurse practitioner in accordance with paragraph(e) of this section. (d) <T3>Level B requirement: Availability of physicians for emergency care.</T3>The facility must provide or arrange for the provision of physician services24 hours a day, in case of an emergency. (e) <T3>Level B requirement: Physician delegation of tasks.</T3> (1) Exceptas specified in paragraph (e)(2) of this section, a physician may delegatetasks to a physician assistant or nurse practitioner who_ (i) Meets the applicable definition in andSection; 491.2 of this chapter;(ii) Is acting within the scope of practice as defined by State law; and(iii) Is under the supervision of the physician. (2) A physician may not delegate a task when the regulations specify thatthe physician must perform it personally, or when the delegation is prohibitedunder State law or by the facility's own policies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Specialized rehabilitative services.</ITAG>A facility must provide or obtain rehabilitative services, such as physicaltherapy, speech-language pathology, and occupational therapy, to everyresident it admits.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Provision of services. </T3>If specialized rehabilitativeservices are required in the resident's comprehensive plan of care, thefacility must_(1) Provide the required services; or (2) Obtain the required services from an outside resource in accordancewith andSection; 483.75(j) of this part, from a provider of specialized rehabilitativeservices.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Qualifications. </T3>Specialized rehabilitativeservices must be provided under the written order of a physician by qualifiedpersonnel.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Dental services.</ITAG>The facility must assist residents in obtaining routine and 24-hour emergencydental care.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Advisory dentist.</T3> Until October 1, 1990,the facility must ensure that a dentist is available in an advisory roleto the nursing staff.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Outside services. </T3>Until October 1, 1990,the facility must_(1) Have an agreement, which meets the requirements of andSection; 483.75(j)of this part, with a dentist to provide dental services;(2) Maintain a list of available dentists for residents who do not havea private dentist;(3) If nesessary, assist the resident_(i) In making appointments; and (ii) By arranging for transportation to and from the dentist's office;and (4) Promptly refer residents with lost or damaged dentures to a dentist.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Skilled nursing facilities. </T3>(1) EffectiveOctober 1, 1990, the facility must provide or obtain from an outside resource,in accordance with andSection; 483.75(j) of this part, routine and emergencydental services.(2) An SNF may charge a resident an additional amount for emergency dentalservices.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Nursing facilities.</T3> Effective October 1,1990, the facility must provide or obtain from an outside resource, inaccordance with andSection; 483.75(j) of this part, the following dentalservices to meet the needs of each resident:(1) Routine dental services (to the extent covered under the State plan);and(2) Emergency dental services.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Pharmacy services.</ITAG>The facility must provide routine and emergency drugs and biologicals toits residents, or obtain them under an agreement described in andSection;483.75(j) of this part.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Methods and procedures.</T3> (1) Until October1, 1990, skilled nursing facilities must establish methods and proceduresfor dispensing and administering drugs and biologicals.(2) The facility may permit unlicensed personnel to administer drugs ifState law permits; but only under the general supervision of a licensednurse.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Procedures.</T3> Effective October 1, 1990, afacility must provide pharmaceutical services (including procedures thatassure the accurate acquiring, receiving, dispensing, and administeringof all drugs and biologicals) to meet the needs of each resident.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Pharmaceutical services committee.</T3> (1) UntilOctober 1, 1990, the facility must have a pharmaceutical services committee(or its equivalent), which develops written policies and procedures forsafe and effective drug therapy, distribution, control, and use.(2) The committee is comprised of at least the pharmacist, the directorof nursing services, the administrator, and one physician.(3) The committee oversees pharmaceutical service in the facility, makesrecommendations for improvement, and monitors the service to ensure itsaccuracy and adequacy.(4) The committee meets at least quarterly and documents its activities,findings, and recommendations.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Service consultation.</T3> The facility must employor obtain the services of a licensed pharmacist who(1) Provides consultation on all aspects of the provision of pharmacy servicesin the facility;(2) Establishes a system of records of receipt and disposition of all controlleddrugs in sufficient detail to enable an accurate reconciliation; and(3) Determines that drug records are in order and that an account of allcontrolled drugs is maintained and periodically reconciled.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Drug regimen review.</T3> (1) The drug regimenof each resident must be reviewed at least once a month by a licensed pharmacist.(2) The pharmacist must report any irregularities to the attending physicianor the director of nursing, or both, and these reports must be acted upon.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Labeling of drugs and biologicals.</T3> The facilitymust label drugs and biologicals in accordance with currently acceptedprofessional principles, and include the appropriate accessory and cautionaryinstructions, and the expiration date.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Storage of drugs and biologicals.</T3> (1) Inaccordance with State and Federal laws, the facility must store all drugsand biologicals in locked compartments under proper temperature controls,and permit only authorized personnel to have access to the keys.(2) The facility must provide separately locked, permanently affixed compartmentsfor storage of controlled drugs listed in Schedule II of the ComprehensiveDrug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 and other drugs subject toabuse, except when the facility uses single unit package drug distributionsystems in which the quantity stored is minimal and a missing dose canbe readily detected.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Infection control.</ITAG>The facility must establish and maintain an infection control program designedto provide a safe, sanitary, and comfortable environment in which residentsreside and to help prevent the development and transmission of diseaseand infection.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Infection control program.</T3> The facility mustestablish an infection control program under which it_(1) Investigates, controls and prevents infections in the facility;(2) Decides what procedures, such as isolation, should be applied to anindividual resident; and(3) Maintains a record of incidents and corrective actions related to infections.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Preventing spread of infection.</T3> (1) Whenthe infection control program determines that a resident needs isolationto prevent the spread of infection, the facility must isolate the resident.(2) The facility must prohibit employees with a communicable disease orinfected skin lesions from direct contact with residents or their food,if direct contact will transmit the disease.(3) The facility must require staff to wash their hands after each directresident contact for which handwashing is indicated by accepted professionalpractice.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Linens. </T3>Personnel must handle, store, process,and transport linens so as to prevent the spread of infection.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Physical environment.</ITAG>The facility must be designed, constructed, equipped and maintained toprotect the health and safety of residents, personnel and the public.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Life safety from fire. </T3>Except as providedin paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(3) of this section, the facility must meet theapplicable provisions of the 1985 edition of the Life Safety Code of theNational Fire Protection Association (which is incorporated by reference).Incorporation of the 1985 edition of the National Fire Protection Association'sLife Safety Code (published February 7, 1985; ANSI/NFPA) was approved bythe Director of the Federal Register in accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552(a)and 1 CFR Part 51 that govern the use of incorporations by reference.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Code is available for inspection at the Office ofthe Federal Register Information Center, Room 8301, 1110 L Street NW.,Washington, DC. Copies may be obtained from the National Fire ProtectionAssociation, Batterymarch Park, Quincey, Mass. 02209. If any changes inthis code are also to be incorporated by reference, a notice to that effectwill be published in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>(1) A facility is considered to be in compliance with this requirementas long as the facility_(i) On November 26, 1982, complied, with or without waivers, with the requirementsof the 1967 or 1973 editions of the Life Safety Code and continues to remainin compliance with those editions of the Code; or(ii) On May 9, 1988, complied, with or without waivers, with the 1981 editionof the Life Safety Code and continues to remain in compliance with thatedition of the Code.(2) After consideration of State survey agency findings, HCFA, or in thecase of intermediate care facilities, the State survey agency may waivespecific provisions of the Life Safety Code which, if rigidly applied,would result in unreasonable hardship upon the facility, but only if thewaiver does not adversely affect the health and safety of residents orpersonnel.(3) The provisions of the Life Safety Code do not apply in a State whereHCFA finds, in accordance with applicable provisions of section 1861(j)(13)of the Act, that a fire and safety code imposed by State law adequatelyprotects patients, residents and personnel in long term care facilities.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Emergency power. </T3>(1) An emergency electricalpower system must supply power adequate at least for lighting all entrancesand exits, equipment to maintain the fire detection, alarm and extinguishingsystems, and life support systems in the event the normal electrical supplyis interrupted.(2) When life support systems are used, the facility must provide emergencyelectrical power with an emergency generator (as defined in NFPA 99, HealthCare Facilities) that is located on the premises.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Space and equipment. </T3>The facility must_(1) Provide sufficient space and equipment in dining, health services,recreation, and program areas to enable staff to provide residents withneeded services as required by these standards and as identified in eachresident's plan of care; and(2) Maintain all essential mechanical, electrical, and patient care equipmentin safe operating condition.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Resident rooms. </T3>Resident rooms must be designedand equipped for adequate nursing care, comfort and privacy of residents.(1) Bedrooms must_(i) Accommodate no more than four residents;(ii) Measure at least 80 square feet per resident in multiple residentbedrooms, and at least 100 square feet in single resident rooms;(iii) Have direct access to a corridor;(iv) Be designed or equipped to assure full visual privacy for each resident;(v) In facilities initially certified after August 1, 1989, each bed musthave ceiling suspended curtains, which extend around the bed to providetotal visual privacy, in combination with adjacent walls and curtains;(vi) Have at least one window to the outside; and(vii) Have a floor at or above grade level.(2) The facility must provide each resident with_(i) A separate bed of proper size and height for the convenience of theresident;(ii) A clean, comfortable mattress; (iii) Bedding appropriate to the weather and climate; and (iv) Functional furniture appropriate to the resident's needs, and individualcloset space in the resident's bedroom with clothes racks and shelves accessibleto the resident. (3) HCFA, or in the case of a facility participating as a skilled nursingfacility under Medicaid only or as an intermediate care facility, or anursing facility after Octoer 1, 1990, the survey agency may permit variationsin requirements specified in paragraphs (d)(1) (i) and (ii) of this sectionrelating to rooms in individual cases when the facility demonstrates inwriting that the variations_ (i) Are required by the special needs of the residents; and (ii) Will not adversely affect residents' health and safety.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Toilet facilities. </T3>Each resident room mustbe equipped with or located near toilet and bathing facilities. (f) <T3>Level B requirement: Resident call system. </T3>The nurse's stationmust be equipped to receive resident calls through a communication systemfrom_(1) Resident rooms; and(2) Toilet and bathing facilities.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Dining and resident activities. </T3>The facilitymust provide one or more rooms designated for resident dining and activities.These rooms must_(1) Be well lighted;(2) Be well ventilated, with nonsmoking areas identified;(3) Be adequately furnished; and(4) Have sufficient space to accommodate all activities.(h) <T3>Level B requirement: Other environmental conditions. </T3>The facilitymust provide a safe, functional, sanitary and comfortable environment forresidents, staff and the public. The facility must_(1) Establish procedures to ensure that water is available to essentialareas when there is a loss of normal water supply;(2) Have adequate outside ventilation by means of windows, or mechanicalventilation or a combination of the two; and(3) Equip corridors with firmly secured handrails on each side.(4) Maintain an effective pest control program so that the facility isfree of pests and rodents.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.75 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level A requirement: Administration.</ITAG>A facility must be administered in a manner that enables it to use itsresources effectively and efficiently to attain or maintain the highestpracticable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being of each resident.(a) <T3>Level B requirement: Licensure. </T3>(1) A skilled nursing facilitymust be_(i) Licensed in accordance with State or local law if that law requiresit; or(ii) Approved by the State or local agency responsible for licensing suchinstitutions, as meeting the applicable licensing standards.(2) Until October 1, 1990, an intermediate care facility must be licensedunder State law to provide, on a regular basis, health-related care andservices to individuals who do not require the degree of care and treatmentwhich a hospital or skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, butwho because of their mental or physical condition require care and services(above the level of room and board) which can be made available to themonly through institutional facilities.(b) <T3>Level B requirement: Compliance with Federal, State and local laws.</T3>Until October 1, 1990, the facility must be in compliance with allapplicable provisions of Federal, State and local laws, regulations andcodes pertaining to health, safety, sanitation, and research.(c) <T3>Level B requirement: Compliance with Federal, State and local lawsand professional standards, effective October 1, 1990. </T3>The facilitymust operate and provide services in compliance with all applicable Federal,State, and local laws, regulations and codes, and with accepted professionalstandards and principles that apply to professionals providing servicesin such a facility.(d) <T3>Level B requirement: Relationship to other HHS regulations. </T3>Inaddition to compliance with the regulations set forth in this subpart,facilities are obliged to meet the applicable provisions of other HHS regulations,including but not limited to those pertaining to nondiscrimination on thebasis of race, color, or national origin (45 CFR Part 80), nondiscriminationon the basis of handicap (45 CFR Part 84), nondiscrimination on the basisof age (45 CFR Part 91), protection of human subjects of research (45 CFRPart 46), and fraud and abuse (42 CFR Part 455). Although these regulationsare not in themselves considered requirements under this part, their violationmay result in the termination or suspension of, or the refusal to grantor continue payment with Federal funds.(e) <T3>Level B requirement: Governing body:</T3> (1) The facility must havea governing body, or designated persons functioning as a governing body,that is legally responsible for establishing and implementing policiesregarding the management and operation of the facility; and(2) The governing body appoints the administrator who is_(i) Licensed by the State; and(ii) Responsible for management of the facility.(f) <T3>Level B requirement: Institutional plan and budget:</T3> Until October1, 1990, skilled nursing facilities must develop an overall plan and budgetthat meets the following requirements:(1) Provides for an annual operating budget which includes all anticipatedincome and expenses, but need not include an item-by-item identificationof the components of each type of anticipated expenditure or income;(2) Provides for a capital expenditures plan for at least a 3-year period,including the year to which the operating budget described in paragraph(1) of this section is applicable. This plan must identify in detail theanticipated sources of financing for, and the objectives of, each anticipatedexpenditure in excess of $600,000, or such lesser amount as may be establishedby the State in which the SNF is located, related to the acquisition ofland, the improvement of land, buildings, and equipment, and the replacement,modernization, and expansion of the buildings and equipment which would,under generally accepted accounting principles, be considered capital items;(3) Provides that the plan is submitted to the State agency designatedunder section 1122(b) of the Act, or if no such agency is designated, tothe appropriate health planning agency in the State, except when a facilityis exempt from section 1122 review under section 1122(j) of the Act (see42 CFR Part 100);(4) Is reviewed and updated by the facility at least annually; and(5) Is prepared, under the direction of the governing body of the institutionby a committee consisting of representatives of the governing body, theadministrative staff, and the medical staff of the institution.(g) <T3>Level B requirement: Required training of nurse aides_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule.</T3> Effective January 1, 1990, a facility must not useany individual working in the facility as a nurse aide for more than 4months, on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or other basis, unless:(i) That individual has completed a training and competency evaluationprogram, or a competency evaluation program approved by the State, and(ii) That individual is competent to provide nursing and nursing relatedservices.(2) <T3>Competency evaluation programs for current employees.</T3> EffectiveJuly 1, 1989, a facility must provide, for individuals used as nurse aides,a competency evaluation program approved by the State, and preparationnecessary for the individual to complete the program by January 1, 1990.(3) <T3>Competency.</T3> Effective January 1, 1990, a facility must permitan individual to serve as a nurse aide or provide services of a type forwhich the individual has not demonstrated competence only when_(i) The individual is in a training and competency evaluation program ora competency evaluation program approved by the State; and(ii) The facility has asked and not yet evaluated a reply from the Stateregistry for information concerning the individual.(4) <T3>Required retraining.</T3> Effective January 1, 1990, when an individualhas not performed paid nursing or nursing-related services for a continuousperiod of 24 consecutive months since the most recent completion of a trainingand competency evaluation program, the facility must require the individualto complete a new training and competency evaluation program.(5) <T3>Regular in-service education.</T3> Effective January 1, 1990, the facilitymust provide regular performance review and regular in-service educationto ensure that individuals used as nurse aides are competent to performservices as nurse aides. In-service education must include training forindividuals providing nursing and nursing-related services to residentswith cognitive impairments.(6) <T3>Definition of nurse aide.</T3> For purposes of this section, the term,``nurse aide,'' means any individual providing nursing or nursing-relatedservices to residents in a facility. This definition does not include anindividual who volunteers to provide such services without pay.(h) <T3>Level B requirement: Proficiency of Nurse aides.</T3> The facilitymust ensure that nurse aides are able to demonstrate competency in skillsand techniques necessary to care for residents' needs, as identified throughresident assessments, and described in the plan of care.(i) <T3>Level B requirement: Staff qualifications. </T3>(1) The facility mustemploy on a full time, part time, or consultant basis those professionalsnecessary to carry out the provisions of these conditions of participation.(2) Professional staff must be licensed, certified or registered in accordancewith applicable State laws.(j) <T3>Level B requirement: Use of outside resources. </T3>(1) If the facilitydoes not employ a qualified professional person to furnish a specific serviceto be provided by the facility, the facility must have that service furnishedto residents by a person or agency outside the facility under an arrangementdescribed in section 1861(w) of the Act or an agreement described in paragraph(j)(2) of this section.(2) Arrangements or agreements pertaining to services furnished by outsideresources must specify in writing that the facility assumes responsibilityfor_(i) Obtaining services that meet professional standards and principlesthat apply to professionals providing services in such a facility; and(ii) The timeliness of the services.(k) <T3>Level B requirement: Medical director.</T3> (1) The facility must designatea physician to serve as medical director.      (2) The medical director is responsible for_      (i) Implementation of resident care policies; and       (ii) The coordination of medical care in the facility.      (1) <T3>Level B requirement: Laboratory services.</T3> (1) The facility mustprovide or obtain clinical laboratory services to meet the needs of itsresidents. The facility is responsible for the quality and timeliness ofthe services.      (i) If the facility provides its own laboratory services, the servicesmust meet the applicable conditions for coverage of the services furnishedby independent laboratories specified in Subpart M of Part 405 of thischapter;      (ii) If the facility provides blood bank and transfusion services, it mustmeet the applicable conditions for_      (A) Independent laboratories specified in Subpart M of Part 405 of thischapter; and       (B) Hospitals specified in andSection; 482.27(d) of this subchapter;     (iii) If the laboratory chooses to refer specimens for testing to anotherlaboratory, the referral laboratory must be approved for participationin the Medicare program either as a hospital or an independent laboratory;     (iv) If the facility does not provide laboratory services on site, it musthave an agreement to obtain these services only from a laboratory thatis approved for participation in the Medicare program either as a hospitalor as an independent laboratory.      (2) The facility must_      (i) Provide or obtain laboratory services only when ordered by the attendingphysician;      (ii) Promptly notify the attending physician of the findings;      (iii) Assist the resident in making transportation arrangements to andfrom the source of service, if the resident needs assistance.      (iv) File in the resident's clinical record signed and dated reports ofclinical laboratory services.      (m) <T3>Level B requirement: Radiology and other diagnostic services.</T3>(1) The skilled nursing facility must provide or obtain radiology and otherdiagnostic services to meet the needs of its residents. The facility isresponsible for the quality and timeliness of the services.      (i) If the facility provides its own diagnostic services, the servicesmust meet the applicable conditions of participation for hospitals containedin andSection; 482.26 of this subchapter.      (ii) If the facility does not provide diagnostic services, it must havean agreement to obtain these services from a provider or supplier thatis approved to provide these services under Medicare.      (2) The facility must_      (i) Provide or obtain radiology and other diagnostic services only whenordered by the attending physician;       (ii) Promptly notify the attending physician of the findings;      (iii) Assist the resident in making transportation arrangements to andfrom the source of service, if the resident needs assistance; and      (iv) File in the resident's clinical record signed and dated reports ofx-ray and other diagnostic services.(n) <T3>Level B requirement: Clinical records.</T3> (1) The facility must maintainclinical records on each resident in accordance with accepted professionalstandards and practices that are_(i) Complete;(ii) Accurately documented;(iii) Readily accessible; and(iv) Systematically organized.(2) Clinical records must be retained for_(i) The period of time required by State law; or(ii) Five years from the date of discharge when there is no requirementin State law; or,(iii) For a minor, three years after a resident reaches legal age underState law.(3) The facility must safeguard clinical record information against loss,destruction, or unauthorized use;(4) The facility must keep confidential all information contained in theresident's records, regardless of the form or storage method of the records,except when release is required by_(i) Transfer to another health care institution;(ii) Law;(iii) Third party payment contract; or(iv) The resident.(5) The facility must_(i) Permit each resident to inspect his or her records on request; and(ii) Provide copies of the records to each resident no later than 48 hoursafter a written request from a resident, at a photocopying cost not toexceed the amount customarily charged in the community.(6) The clinical record must contain_(i) Sufficient information to identify the resident;(ii) A record of the resident's assessments;(iii) The plan of care and services provided; and(iv) Effective October 1, 1989, the results of any preadmission screeningconducted by the State; and(v) Progress notes.(o) <T3>Level B requirement: Disaster and emergency preparedness.</T3> (1)The facility must have detailed written plans and procedures to meet allpotential emergencies and disasters, such as fire, severe weather, andmissing residents.(2) The facility must train all employees in emergency procedures whenthey begin to work in the facility, periodically review the procedureswith existing staff, and carry out staff drills using those procedures.(p) <T3>Level B requirement: Transfer agreement.</T3> (1) In accordance withsection 1861(l) of the Act, the facility must have in effect a writtentransfer agreement with one or more hospitals approved for participationunder the Medicare and Medicaid programs that reasonably assures that_(i) Residents will be transferred from the facility to the hospital, andensured of timely admission to the hospital when transfer is medicallyappropriate as determined by the attending physician; and(ii) Medical and other information needed for care and treatment of residents,and, when the transferring facility deems it appropriate, for determiningwhether such residents can be adequately cared for in a less expensivesetting than either the facility or the hospital, will be exchanged betweenthe institutions.(2) The facility is considered to have a transfer agreement in effect ifthe facility has attempted in good faith to enter into an agreement witha hospital sufficiently close to the facility to make transfer feasible.(q) <T3>Level B requirement: Utilization review. </T3>Before October 1, 1990,a skilled nursing facility must have in effect a utilization review planthat applies to services furnished by the facility to individuals entitledto Medicare benefits.(1) The plan must provide for the review, on a sample or other basis, ofthe medical necessity of the services, to promote the most efficient useof available health facilities and services. The facility must includereviews of_(i) Admissions to the institutions;(ii) Duration of stays for a continuous period of extended duration, tobe specified by the facility; and(iii) Professional services, including drugs and biologicals furnished.(2) The extended duration review must be made as promptly as possible aftereach day specified under paragraph (q)(1)(ii) of this section, and in noevent later than one week following such day.(3) The review committee must be composed of_(i) A staff committee of the institution composed of two or more physicans,of which at least two must be physicians as defined in andSection; 410.20(b)of this chapter, with or without participation of other professional personnel;or(ii) A group outside the facility, which is similarly composed and whichis_(A) Established by the local medical society and some or all of the SNFsin the locality; or(B) If no such group exists, a group that is approved by HCFA.(4) If it is impracticable for a facility to have a properly functioningutilization review committee because of the small size of the institutionor because of lack of an organized medical staff, then the review committeemust be composed as described in paragraph (3)(ii) of this section ratherthan paragraph (3)(i).(5) HCFA will require that the facility use Medicaid utilization reviewprocedures instead of the procedures specified in this section if HCFAdetermines that the Medicaid utilization review procedures are superiorin effectiveness to the Medicare procedures.(6) Before a finding that any further stay in the facility is not medicallynecessary, the review committee must consult with the individual's attendingphysician.(7) When the review committee finds that any further stay in the facilityis not medically necessary, the committee must notify promptly_(i) The institution;(ii) The individual; and(iii) the individual's attending physician.(r) <T3>Level B requirement: Quality assessment and assurance. </T3>(1) EffectiveOctober 1, 1990, a facility must maintain a quality assessment and assurancecommittee consisting of_(i) The director of nursing services;(ii) A physician designated by the facility; and (iii) At least 3 other members of the facility's staff.(2) The quality assessment and assurance committee_(i) Meets at least quarterly to identify issues with respect to which qualityassessment and assurance activities are necessary; and(ii) Develops and implements appropriate plans of action to correct identifiedquality deficiencies.(s) <T3>Level B requirement: </T3><T3>Disclosure of ownership.</T3>(1) The facility must comply with the disclosure requirements of andSection;andSection;420.206 and 455.104 of this chapter.(2) Effective October 1, 1990, the facility must provide written noticeto the State agency responsible for licensing the facility at the timeof change, if a change occurs in_(i) Persons with an ownership or control interest, as defined in andSection;andSection;420.201 and 455.101 of this chapter;(ii) The officers, directors, agents, or managing employees;(iii) The corporation, association, or other company responsible for themanagement of the facility; or(iv) The facility's administrator or director of nursing. (3) The notice specified in paragraph (s)(2) of this section must includethe identity of each new individual or company. (t) <T3>Level B requirement: Independent medical evaluation and audit. </T3>BeforeOctober 1, 1990, a SNF must cooperate in an effective program which providesfor a regular program of independent medical evaluation and audit of theresidents in the facility to the extent required by the programs in whichthe facility participates (including medical evaluation of each resident'sneed for SNF care). <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 488_SURVEY AND CERTIFICATION PROCEDURES </ITAG>F. Part 488 is amended as follows: 1. The authority citation for Part 488 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1814, 1861, 1865, 1866, 1871, 1880, 1881and 1883 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f, 1395x, 1395bb,1395cc, 1395hh, 1395qq, 1395rr and 1395tt). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>1a. In andSection; 488.1, in the definition of ``certification,'' the phrase``, requirements (for SNFs and ICFs),'' is added after the phrase ``conditionsof participation.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>1b. In andSection; 488.3, the phrase ``and requirements for SNFs and ICFs''is added to the heading of the section after the phrase, ``Conditions forcoverage''. 1c. In andSection; 488.3(a)(2), the phrase ``or level A requirements (forSNFs)'' is added after the phrase ``applicable conditions.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>2. In andSection; 488.18, paragraph (a), the phrase ``or requirements (forSNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation,''.3. In andSection; 488.18, paragraph (a), the phrase ``or level A requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation''.3a. In andSection; 488.18, paragraphs (a) and (b), the phrase ``or levelA requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``compliancewith the conditions'' wherever it appears. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>4. In andSection; 488.20, paragraphs (a) and (c), the phrase ``or requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5. In andSection; 488.24, paragraphs (a) and (b), the phrase ``or level Arequirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditionsof participation.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.26 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>6. In andSection; 488.26 paragraph (a), the phrase ``or level A requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation.''6a. In andSection; 488.26, paragraph (a), the phrase ``and requirements (forSNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``various standards within eachcondition.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.28 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. In andSection; 488.28, paragraph (a), the phrase ``or Level B requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``standards in the conditionsof participation''.8. In andSection; 488.28, paragraph (b), the phrase ``or Level B requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the term ``standards.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>9. In andSection; 488.50, paragraph (a), introductory text, the phrase ``LevelB requirements'' is substituted for the term ``standards.''10. In andSection; 488.50, paragraph (b), the phrase ``Level B requirements(s)''is substituted for the term ``standard(s).''11. In andSection; 488.50, paragraphs (d) introductory text and (e), thephrase ``Level B requirements'' is substituted for the term ``standards''and the phrase ``Level B requirement'' is substituted for the term ``standard.''<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 489_PROVIDER AGREEMENTS UNDER MEDICARE</ITAG>G. Part 489 is amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 489 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1861, 1862(h), 1864, 1866, and 1871 ofthe Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395x, 1395y(h), 1395aa, 1395cc,and 1395hh) and sec. 602(k) of Pub. L. 98-21 (42 U.S.C. 1395ww note).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. In Subpart A, andSection; 489.3, in the definition of ``immediate jeopardy,''the phrase ``level A requirements'' is substituted for the term ``conditionsof participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>3. In andSection; 489.10, paragraphs (a)(1) and (b), the phrase ``or requirements(for SNFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>3a. In andSection; 489.13, paragraph (a), the phrase ``conditions of participationor level A requirements (for SNFs)'' is substituted for the term ``standards.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>4. In andSection; 489.15, paragraphs (b) and (d)(2)(ii), the phrase ``levelA requirements'' is substituted for the term ``conditions of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5. In Subpart E, andSection; 489.53, paragraph (a)(3), the phrase ``or requirements(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``conditions of participation.''6. In andSection; 489.53, paragraph (b)(1), the phrase ``level A requirement''is substituted for the phrase ``condition of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. In Subpart F, andSection; 489.60, paragraph (a) introductory text, thephrase ``level A requirement'' is substituted for the term ``conditionof participation.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.62 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>8. In andSection; 489.62, paragraph (a), the term ``requirements'' is substitutedfor the phrase ``conditions of participation.''9. In andSection; 489.62, paragraph (c), the phrase ``level A and level Brequirements'' is substituted for the phrase ``the conditions of participationor standards.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.64 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>9a. In andSection; 489.64, paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1), the phrase ``levelA requirements'' is substituted for the phrase ``the conditions of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 498_APPEALS PROCEDURES FOR DETERMINATIONS THAT AFFECT PARTICIPATIONIN THE MEDICARE PROGRAM</ITAG>H. Part 498 is amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 498 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 205(a), 1102, 1869(c) 1871, and 1872 of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 405(a), 1302, 1395ff(c), 1395hh and 1395ii, unlessotherwise noted).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 498.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. In Subpart A, andSection; 498.3, paragraphs (d)(1) and (2), the phrase``or level A requirements (for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase``conditions of participation.''2a. In andSection; 498.3, paragraph (d)(10), the phrase ``or a level A requirement(for SNFs and ICFs)'' is added after the phrase ``a condition of participation.''<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program No. 13.773, MedicareHospital Insurance, No. 13.774, Medical Assistance Program.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: December 7, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William L. Roper,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Health Care Financing Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: January 18, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1697 Filed 1-27-89; 12:10 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4120-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>